SEVERE  STORMS  AND  REDUCING  THEIR  IMPACT 

ON  COMMUNITIES

S.  HRG.  109–370

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON DISASTER PREVENTION AND 

PREDICTION

OF THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

JUNE  29,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

26–822 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2006

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  DISASTER  PREVENTION  AND  PREDICTION 

JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina,  Chairman 
TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska,  Ranking 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 29, 2005 ...............................................................................
Statement of Senator DeMint .................................................................................
Statement of Senator E. Benjamin Nelson ............................................................
Statement of Senator Vitter ....................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Ahlberg, Doug, Director, Lincoln-Lancaster County Emergency Management ..
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Levitan, Dr. Marc L., Director, Louisiana State University Hurricane Center/
Charles  P.  Siess,  Jr.  Associate  Professor  of  Civil  and  Environmental  Engi-
neering ..................................................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Mayfield,  Max,  Director,  Tropical  Prediction  Center/National  Hurricane  Cen-
ter, National Weather Service .............................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
McCarthy,  Dennis,  Director,  Office  of  Climate,  Water  and  Weather  Services, 
National Weather Service ....................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Reinhold,  Timothy  A.,  Ph.D.,  Vice  President  of  Engineering,  Institute  for 
Business & Home Safety .....................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Sallenger,  Jr.,  Asbury  H.,  Oceanographer,  U.S.  Geological  Survey  Center 
for Coastal and Watershed Studies ....................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Walsh, Bill, Director of Meteorology/Chief Meteorologist, WCSC Live 5 News .
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Response to Written Questions Submitted by Hon. Jim DeMint to: 

Timothy A. Reinholdt .......................................................................................
Max Mayfield ....................................................................................................

Response to Written Questions Submitted to Dennis McCarthy by: 

Hon. Daniel K. Inouye ......................................................................................
Hon. E. Benjamin Nelson ................................................................................
Hon. Ted Stevens ..............................................................................................

Page 
1
1
4
2

50
52

35
38

5
7

13
15

42
44

19
21
32
34

67 
57

61
62
59

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

SEVERE  STORMS  AND  REDUCING  THEIR 

IMPACT  ON  COMMUNITIES 

WEDNESDAY,  JUNE  29,  2005

SUBCOMMITTEE ON DISASTER PREVENTION AND 
PREDICTION, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:30  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Jim  DeMint,
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. JIM DEMINT,

U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH CAROLINA 

Senator  DEMINT.  Good  afternoon,  everyone.  I  want  to  thank  all 
of you for joining us at this hearing to discuss and examine the im-
pact  of  severe  weather  on  our  communities,  and  what  the  citizens 
and  government  can  do  to  lessen  its  impact.  As  we’re  all  aware, 
hurricanes  and  tornadoes  have  a  devastating  impact  on  our  com-
munities.  South  Carolina  witnessed  the  impact  of  Mother  Nature 
most severely when Hurricane Hugo made a direct hit on Charles-
ton  in  1989.  The  devastation  to  homes,  businesses,  and  families 
was  widespread.  Fortunately,  we’ve  learned  some  important  les-
sons  from  these  storms,  we’re  starting  to  see  our  preparation  for 
the  storms  improve,  and  we’re  seeing  the  accuracy  of  the  Weather 
Service’s predictions improve. 

While  we’ve  come  a  long  way  from  where  we  were  in  1989, 
there’s still a lot that needs to be done. Too many homes and busi-
nesses  have  not  incorporated  disaster-resistant  technologies  into 
their  buildings,  numerous  communities  have  gutted  out  the  build-
ing  codes  that  encourage  builders  and  developers  to  adopt  tech-
nologies  that  will  protect  life  and  property  when  a  storm  rolls  in. 
In the past few decades, the Weather Service has dramatically im-
proved its predictions of both hurricanes and tornadoes. The hurri-
canes,  we’ve  seen  the  accuracy  of  landfall  predictions  improve  sig-
nificantly. Now, this is crucial for states like South Carolina where 
each mile of coastline evacuated can cost hundreds of thousands of 
dollars. 

We’ve  also  seen  tornado  predictions  increase  by  minutes,  and  a 
few  minutes  can  mean  the  difference  between  getting  to  a  tornado 
shelter  and  being  stuck  in  your  home.  Each  improvement  trans-
lates  directly  into  saved  lives.  While  the  improvements  have  been 
impressive,  there  are  still  places  where  we  can  do  better.  We  need 
a better idea of the impact on beaches and rivers of hurricane land-

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

2

fall,  NOAA  needs  to  improve  its  forecasting  of  hurricane  intensity. 
When the Weather Service estimates the intensity of the hurricane 
too  high,  they  unnecessarily  trigger  evacuations,  and  this  costs 
residences, businesses and governments money. When they forecast 
too low, lives are placed in jeopardy. 

I’m looking forward to hearing from Mr. Mayfield, Mr. McCarthy, 
and Dr. Sallenger on how their agencies plan to improve the prod-
ucts they provide to the taxpayer, in addition to the predictions and 
forecasts generated by the USGS and the Weather Service. The pri-
vate sector, state, and local governments play an equally important 
role in ensuring that our communities are prepared, and able to re-
spond to severe storms. The engineering community and insurance 
industry  have  a  crucial  role  to  play  in  encouraging  the  incorpora-
tion  of  disaster-resistant  technologies  into  homes  and  businesses 
that can provide strong incentives to businesses and individuals to 
become better prepared for disasters. We also need to recognize the 
important  role  that  broadcast  meteorologists  play  in  commu-
nicating to our communities during disasters. 

For  Charleston,  South  Carolina,  Bill  Walsh  is  the  man  the  com-
munity  turns  to  when  they  need  to  know  how  to  prepare  for  big 
storms,  and  after  the  storms  when  the  power  is  down,  Bill  Walsh 
and  his  colleagues  along  with  the  broadcast  community  are  often 
the  only  points  of  information  for  devastated  communities.  I  look 
forward  to  the  comments  of  our  witnesses  this  afternoon.  This 
hearing  and  the  one  earlier  this  month  are  providing  valuable  in-
sights  that  will  help  inform  the  Committee  as  to  how  we  begin  to 
draft legislation to reauthorize the Weather Service. While the Na-
tion has the best weather prediction in the world, we can and must 
do  better.  Our  coasts  are  seriously  exposed  to  the  impact  of  major 
storms,  and  we  need  to  improve  the  quality  of  both  hurricane 
tracks and intensity forecasts. I will be looking at what can be done 
legislatively  to  help  improve  these  conditions  and  additionally,  as 
we  consider  this  reauthorization,  I  will  work  proactively  to  assure 
that  all  the  assets  in  America’s  weather  prediction  community, 
business, government and academia work together. 

As  the  annual  hurricane  season  shows  us,  weather  has  a  pro-
found  impact  on  the  lives  and  the  economy  of  our  coastal  commu-
nities. I will be working to ensure that the Federal Government de-
livers to the taxpayer the best weather services possible. 

Again, thank you for appearing before this Committee, and I will 

turn to Senator Vitter for his opening comments. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID VITTER,

U.S. SENATOR FROM LOUISIANA 

Senator  VITTER.  Chairman  DeMint,  thank  you  for  holding  this 
hearing  today  on  the  impact  of  severe  storms  on  our  communities. 
I  also  appreciate  the  very  hard  work  of  Tom  Jones  on  your  staff, 
as he has helped put this hearing together; and Mr. Chairman, you 
may be interested to know that Tom wanted such a realistic experi-
ence  today,  that  he  asked  me  to  get  hurricanes  up  from  Pat 
O’Brien’s  in  the  French  Quarter  in  New  Orleans  for  refreshment. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  VITTER.  For  those  of  you  who  don’t  know,  these  are  the 

high octane rum drinks served in the French Quarter. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

3

On a more serious note, I’m afraid, if you look at some of our dis-
aster  policy  in  this  country,  it  seems  as  if  officials  who  put  it  to-
gether  were  sipping  a  lot  of  hurricanes,  because  I  think  it  is  fun-
damentally  flawed,  Mr.  Chairman,  in  one  basic  way—our  general 
policy  toward  disasters  is  reactive,  instead  of  proactive.  We  spend 
billions  of  dollars  after  a  disaster,  instead  of  spending  millions  of 
dollars  to  prevent  many  of  the  harmful  effects  of  a  disaster  from 
ever occurring. 

We have some graphics here that will be put up behind me, and 
this  isn’t  a  simulation  of  World  War  III,  or  The  Day  After  Tomor-
row movie, or Atlantis—although one day it could be Atlantis—this 
is  a  real,  computer-generated  model  of  the  impact  of  a  hurricane 
hitting  New  Orleans.  (The  National  Weather  Service  models  have 
determined  the  following  Category  III  storm,  which  as  you  know, 
is  not  the  worst  imaginable.  It  would  place  over  20  feet  of  water 
in  some  inland  areas  of  Plaquemines  Parish,  populated  areas,  and 
14 feet of water in the City of New Orleans.) 

A  Category  IV  storm,  one  step  up,  would  put  over  24  feet  of 
water in some inland areas of Plaquemines Parish, and over 18 feet 
of  water  in  New  Orleans.  A  Category  V  storm,  the  worst  case  sce-
nario,  would  put  over  28  feet  of  water  in  some  inland  areas  of 
Plaquemines  Parish,  and  over  23  feet  of  water  in  New  Orleans. 
And it’s really not a question of ‘‘if ’’, it’s a question of ‘‘when’’. 

The  inundation  of  our  homes  and  businesses  would  be  a  historic 
national  disaster,  but  the  full  tragedy  would  be  the  loss  of  up  to 
100,000  lives,  as  predicted  by  the  National  Weather  Service.  Let 
me  make  a  point  again—this  is  not  some  wild  speculation,  this  is 
a  valid,  scientific  model  from  the  National  Weather  Service  saying 
that up to 100,000 lives would be lost as a result of this sort of hur-
ricane hit on New Orleans. 

To  make  this  point  even  more  real,  I  would  note  that  the  City 
of  New  Orleans  had  thousands  of  body  bags  ready  for  Hurricane 
Ivan  last  year.  As  we  will  hear  today  from  the  Director  of  the  Na-
tional  Hurricane  Center,  Max  Mayfield,  and  Dr.  Arnold,  areas  like 
New Orleans and Key West are nearly impossible to evacuate with 
the  advance  warning  technologies  we  have  now,  and  the  inad-
equate infrastructure in place in those areas today. 

Director Mayfield and Mr. Sallenger correctly state in their testi-
mony that we experience an average of 20 deaths a year and spend 
an average of $5.1 billion a year to respond to storms, all after the 
fact.  In  Louisiana  we  have  plans  in  place  to  prevent  much  of  that, 
to  try  to  avoid  much  of  that  before  the  fact.  The  Southeast  Lou-
isiana Flood Control Program, Lake Pontchartrain, New Orleans to 
Venice,  Alexandria  to  the  Gulf,  West  Bank,  West  Shore  and  Lou-
isiana  Coastal  Area  Programs,  all  of  these  are  established  pro-
grams  that  are  designed  to  prevent  hurricane  and  storm  damage 
and  the  loss  of  life.  Yet,  every  year  we  fight  for  funds  just  to  keep 
these efforts afloat and moving on inch by inch. Instead of spending 
those  millions  now,  instead  we’re  going  to  spend  billions,  literally, 
billions—many,  many  billions—after  the  fact,  and  lose  up  to 
100,000  lives  in  New  Orleans.  Again,  this  is  a  fundamentally 
flawed  approach  to  disasters,  and  I  look  forward  to  our  witnesses 
talking about that today. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

4

Finally, a number of our panelists will discuss wind damage, our 
lack of attention to this important issue and the effect this has had 
on  our  recovery  costs,  and  I’m  also  very  anxious  to  hear  all  of  the 
witnesses  thoughts  and  recommendations  about  this.  Thank  you, 
again, Mr. Chairman, for your leadership. 

Senator  DEMINT.  Senator,  excellent  remarks.  I  would  turn  to 
Senator Nelson for his opening remarks before I introduce the pan-
elists. 

STATEMENT OF HON. E. BENJAMIN NELSON,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEBRASKA 

Senator BEN NELSON. Thanks, Mr. Chairman, thanks to our pan-
elists  today,  we  appreciate  very  much  your  being  here,  obviously 
coming  from  a  state  that  is  in  the  Northern  end  of  Tornado  Alley. 
Severe  weather  forecasting  is  of  great  interest  to  me,  and  of  great 
importance to my constituents in the State of Nebraska. 

I  would  first  like  to  recognize  the  efforts  of  NOAA  and  the  Na-
tional  Weather  Service  in  improving  our  forecasting  abilities.  It’s 
amazing to me that only 20 years ago there was absolutely no lead 
time for tornado warnings, and over the last 10 years the National 
Weather Service has increased the warning lead time for tornadoes 
to  an  average  of  13  minutes.  That  increase  in  lead  time  leads  to 
a decrease in deaths and injuries from tornadoes. Earlier this year, 
I  visited  our  local  National  Weather  Service  station  in  Valley,  Ne-
braska just west of Omaha. I planned this trip near the 30th anni-
versary of a devastating tornado that hit Omaha in 1975 and killed 
three people. I wanted to see what advances had been made in pre-
dicting  and  responding  to  tornadoes,  and  I  must  say  that  I  was 
very  impressed.  During  my  visit,  I  was  informed  that  in  1975  it 
took  5  minutes  just  to  process  a  warning  before  it  could  be  issued. 
Now it takes under a minute, again, saving minutes means saving 
lives.  I  believe  we  need  to  continue  our  commitment  and  invest-
ment in further improving our forecasting capabilities. The exciting 
advances in technologies which will allow us to better forecast tor-
nadoes,  to  more  accurately  pinpoint  where  a  tornado  is  likely  to 
touch  down,  and  to  allow  longer  lead  time  for  warnings  is  crucial 
to  the  safety  of  our  citizens.  These  advances  in  technologies  also 
hold better promise for tracking hurricanes and predicting their in-
tensity  as  well,  again,  information  that  is  vital  to  protecting  lives. 
I  applaud  the  collaboration  between  the  National  Weather  Serv-
ice,  the  National  Hurricane  Center  and  the  media  for  not  only 
warning  people  of  impending  severe  weather,  but  also  providing 
the  information  they  need  as  to  how  they  should  respond  in  order 
to remain safe. 

The  education  efforts  you’ve  all  undertaken  so  that  individuals 
can  take  more  personal  responsibility  at  ensuring  their  safety  is 
key  to  reducing  fatalities  and  injuries  during  severe  weather.  Pro-
tecting lives will always be our number one priority, and it requires 
keeping up with technology, which is why I stress the need for con-
tinuing investment in our forecasting capabilities. Imagine the loss 
of life that we would have had in Omaha, a highly populated area, 
during  that  devastating  tornado  back  in  1975  if  we  had  depended 
on  the  prediction  and  warning  technology  that  was  available  in 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

5

1913, when a tornado ripped through Omaha and killed 168 people. 
It is worth the investment. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

Senator DEMINT. Thank you, Senator. 
Appearing  before  the  Subcommittee  this  afternoon,  Dr.  Max 
Mayfield.  Mr.  Mayfield  is  Director  of  the  National  Hurricane  Cen-
ter, he will outline the Center’s work to improve the quality of the 
Nation’s  hurricane  forecast.  Joining  him  is  Mr.  Dennis  McCarthy, 
Director  of  Climate,  Water  and  Weather  Services  at  the  National 
Weather  Service.  Mr.  McCarthy  will  be  discussing  severe  weather, 
and specifically the impact of tornadoes. 

Finally, on this panel is Dr. Abby Sallenger, Oceanographer from 
the United States Geological Survey Center for Coastal and Water-
shed Studies. Dr. Sallenger will discuss the inland impact of hurri-
canes  on  beaches  and  rivers.  With  that,  we’ll  start  with  Mr. 
Mayfield. I think if we’re running these lights, the green will indi-
cate  you’re  in  good  shape,  the  yellow  means  you  probably  need  to 
start slowing down, and red means you’re out of time. 

Thank you, sir, Mr. Mayfield. 

STATEMENT  OF  MAX  MAYFIELD,  DIRECTOR,  TROPICAL
PREDICTION  CENTER/NATIONAL  HURRICANE  CENTER,
NATIONAL WEATHER SERVICE 
Mr.  MAYFIELD.  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee,  I’m  Max  Mayfield,  Director  of  the  Tropical  Prediction 
Center  and  National  Hurricane  Center.  I’m  pleased  to  be  here 
today to discuss NOAA’s role in researching, forecasting and warn-
ing  the  public  about  hurricanes.  The  National  Hurricane  Center 
has  been  the  centerpiece  of  our  Nation’s  hurricane  forecast  and 
warning  program  for  50  years.  Our  mission  is  to  save  lives,  miti-
gate  property  loss  and  improve  economic  efficiency  by  issuing  the 
best  watches,  warnings  and  forecasts  of  hazardous  tropical  weath-
er,  and  by  increasing  the  public’s  understanding  of  these  hazards. 
Until  2004,  we  experienced  relatively  few  hurricane  landfalls  in 
this  country,  and  in  particular,  very  few  major  hurricanes.  Our 
good  fortune  ended  last  year  when  six  hurricanes  hit  the  United 
States  and  three  of  those  were  major  hurricanes.  We  have  already 
entered into a period of heightened hurricane activity. This activity 
in  the  Atlantic  is  cyclical  with  the  multiple  decades,  and  since  the 
mid-1990s,  this  activity  has  increased  sharply,  and  this  period  of 
heightened activity could last another 10 to 20 years. 

Great progress has been made in forecasting the track of tropical 
cyclones  over  the  past  half  century,  our  track  forecast  errors  have 
been  cut  approximately  in  half  in  the  last  15  to  20  years.  Our  5 
day forecast is as good as the 3 day forecast was just 15 years ago. 
These  advances  are  largely  the  result  of  improvements  made  in 
operational,  numerical  weather  prediction,  aided  by  investments 
and increasingly sophisticated computers, and advances in satellite 
observations  over  otherwise  data-sparse  oceanic  regions  where 
tropical  cyclones  are  spawned.  An  important  part  of  the  success 
story  is  also  the  Gulf  Stream  IV  aircraft  following  the  highly  suc-
cessful  NOAA  Hurricane  Resource  Division  Program.  Congress  ap-
propriated funds to obtain this jet in the mid-1990s. Data collected 
now  by  the  Gulf  Stream  IV  result  in  36  to  48  hour  forecast  im-
provements  averaging  near  20  percent,  when  tropical  cyclones 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

6

threaten further gains in forecast skill through to improvements in 
science  and  technology  are  essential,  however,  enhanced  hurricane 
information  will  not  by  itself  be  enough  if  the  information  is  not 
communicated to the at-risk public in a manner that can effect the 
best  preparedness  actions,  in  addition  to  reaching  out  to  the  gen-
eral public through the media, our website, and other routes. We’ve 
trained  local,  state,  national  and  international  emergency  man-
agers  on  the  limitations  of  hurricane  forecasting,  and  their  proper 
use  of  our  products  through  workshops.  In  fact,  we’ve  trained  over 
1,000  emergency  managers  in  the  last  14  years.  Storm  surge  has 
caused most of this country’s tropical cyclone-related fatalities, and 
represents  the  greatest  risk  for  large  loss  of  life  in  this  country. 
The  plans  for  hurricane  evacuation  along  the  Atlantic  and  Gulf 
Coast  are  based  on  our  storm  surge  calculations,  and  our  storm 
surge  program  and  the  resulting  evacuation  plans  are  credited 
largely  with  the  dramatic  decrease  in  the  loss  of  life  due  to  storm 
surge in the United States. 

Now, while we have made significant progress in hurricane fore-
casting  warnings,  we  have  much  more  work  to  do  from  a  scientific 
standpoint.  The  gaps  in  our  capabilities  fall  into  two  broad  cat-
egories. Number one is our ability to assess the current state of the 
hurricane  and  its  environment,  that’s  the  analysis,  and  number 
two, our ability to predict the hurricane’s future state, the forecast. 
Analysis is the starting point of the forecast process, to improve the 
analysis  in  tropical  cyclones,  we  need  to  enhance  our  observation 
network. Many of the enhancements required to improve hurricane 
analyses,  particularly  over  the  data-sparse  ocean  areas  will  be  ad-
dressed  through  such  programs  as  the  Global  Earth  Observation 
Systems, or GEOSS, a 10-year international endeavor, of which the 
United States is a member, and NOAA, a key participant. Further 
additional  observation  improvements  will  be  realized  with  funding 
from  the  supplemental  hurricane  bill  passed  last  year,  including 
seven data buoys recently deployed, and the sensors to be installed 
on Air Force hurricane hover aircraft. 

The accuracy of our tropical cyclone forecast is closely tied to im-
provements  in  computer-based,  numerical  weather  prediction  mod-
els.  The  United  States  Weather  Research  Program’s  Joint  Hurri-
cane  Test  Bed  was  recently  formulated  and  established  at  the  Na-
tional Hurricane Center to facilitate the transfer of new technology, 
research  results  and  observation,  or  advances  for  improved  oper-
ational tropical cyclone analysis and prediction. 

Thus far we’re very pleased with the results of the Test Bed, the 
projects implemented have made quantifiable enhancements in our 
operations.  In  addition,  the  National  Weather  Service  Environ-
mental  Modeling  Center  is  leading  development  of  a  sophisticated, 
high-resolution  computer  model,  intended  to  improve  hurricane  in-
tensity  and  rainfall  forecasts.  This  new  model  is  scheduled  to  be-
come operational in the year 2007. 

In  conclusion,  we  have  come  a  long  way  in  hurricane  prediction 
to meet the challenge of reducing the risk to our Nation from trop-
ical  cyclones,  we  must  continue  to  improve  our  forecast  and  warn-
ings,  and  continue  our  public  education  efforts.  I  thank  you  for 
your support, and I will be happy to answer any questions, if I can. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Mayfield follows:]

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MAX MAYFIELD, DIRECTOR, TROPICAL PREDICTION CENTER/

NATIONAL HURRICANE CENTER, NATIONAL WEATHER SERVICE 

7

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I  am  Max  Mayfield,  Director 
of  the  Tropical  Prediction  Center/National  Hurricane  Center  (TPC/NHC).  The  Na-
tional  Hurricane  Center  is  a  part  of  the  National  Weather  Service  (NWS),  of  the 
National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  in  the  Department  of 
Commerce.  I  am  pleased  to  be  here  today  to  discuss  NOAA’s  role  in  researching, 
forecasting, and warning the public about hurricanes. 

The  National  Hurricane  Center  (NHC)  has  been  the  centerpiece  of  our  Nation’s 
hurricane  forecast  and  warning  program  for  50  years.  Our  mission  is  to  save  lives, 
mitigate property loss, and improve economic efficiency by issuing the best watches, 
warnings,  and  forecasts  of  hazardous  tropical  weather,  and  by  increasing  the 
public’s  understanding  of  these  hazards.  Today,  I  would  like  to  provide  some  back-
ground on our hurricane program, discuss current activities, and outline some of our 
goals for the future. 

According  to  a  2003  report  published  by  the  American  Geophysical  Union,  the 
NHC,  along  with  our  public  and  private  sector  partners,  saves  the  lives  of  close  to 
200 people per year in the United States alone from hurricanes, tropical storms and 
tropical  depressions  collectively  known  as  tropical  cyclones.  Since  our  efforts  began 
in  the  1950s,  we  have  reduced  tropical  cyclone  mortality  in  the  United  States  by 
about  90  percent.  Saving  lives  is  paramount,  but  it  is  also  important  to  recognize 
the  enormous  physical  and  economic  damage  caused  in  our  country  by  tropical  cy-
clones.  The  impact  of  hurricanes  in  the  United  States  alone  is  an  average  of  20 
deaths and $5.1 billion in property damage each year. 

Public  confidence  in  the  NHC  is  high.  A  2003  customer  satisfaction  survey  con-
ducted  by  Claes  Fornell  International  indicated  87  percent  of  the  respondents  ap-
proved of the quality and usefulness of our products and services. Respondents also 
rated  our  improvements  over  the  past  five  years  at  86  out  of  100.  These  scores  are 
among  the  highest  reported  among  Federal  Government  agencies  on  similar  ques-
tions,  and  reflect  the  significant  gains  we  have  made  in  analyzing  and  forecasting 
tropical  cyclones.  For  example,  our  track  forecast  errors  have  been  cut  approxi-
mately  in  half  in  the  past  15–20  years  due  to  advances  in  weather  forecast  models 
enabling us to meet our Government Performance and Results Act (GPRA) perform-
ance measure every year. 

We  were  honored  last  year  to  have  President  Bush  visit  our  facility  to  thank  our 
staff  for  their  work  during  the  very  active  2004  hurricane  season.  I  would  like  to 
express  our  appreciation  to  the  Administration  and  Congress  for  their  continuing 
support, highlighted by the Supplemental Hurricane Bill passed last year. The sup-
plemental  appropriation  provided  funding  for  additional  observing  systems  (data 
buoys  and  observing  sensors  to  be  installed  on  U.S.  Air  Force  hurricane  reconnais-
sance  aircraft),  computer  model  development  and  supporting  research,  and  is  al-
ready  beginning  to  pay  dividends.  The  new  weather  buoys  we  were  able  to  deploy 
because of the supplemental funding helped define the early characteristics of Trop-
ical Storm Arlene. 

The combination of improved forecasting, better communications, advanced emer-
gency  management  practices,  and  an  aggressive  education  program  have  contrib-
uted  to  a  period  of  relatively  few  tropical  cyclone  related  deaths  in  this  country. 
However,  with  more  than  half  of  the  U.S.  population  residing  in  coastal  watershed 
counties, we are more vulnerable to a hurricane catastrophe today than at any time 
in our Nation’s history. Despite our progress in tracking and forecasting storms, we 
have much work still to do. To meet the challenge of reducing the risk to our Nation 
from tropical cyclones, we must continue to improve our forecasts and warnings, and 
continue our outreach and public education efforts. 
Our Challenge 

Until 2004 we experienced relatively few hurricane landfalls in this country in re-
cent  decades  and,  in  particular,  very  few  ‘‘major’’  hurricanes—those  of  Category  3 
or  higher  on  the  Saffir-Simpson  hurricane  scale  (Category  1–5).  Our  good  fortune 
ended last year when six hurricanes hit the United States, and three of those were 
major hurricanes. 

We have entered a period of heightened hurricane activity. On average, ten trop-
ical  storms  form  during  the  Atlantic  hurricane  season,  with  6  becoming  hurricanes 
and 2–3 becoming major hurricanes. However, tropical cyclone activity in the Atlan-
tic is cyclical, with a time period of multiple decades. During the 1940s through the 
1960s,  we  experienced  an  above  average  number  of  major  hurricanes,  and  during 
the period from the 1970s into the mid-1990s we experienced fewer hurricanes than 
average.  Since  the  mid-1990s,  activity  increased  sharply  and  this  period  of  height-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

8

ened  activity  could  last  another  10–20  years.  In  fact,  there  have  been  more  hurri-
canes  during  the  past  ten  years  than  in  any  other  ten-year  period  since  records 
began in 1851.

Figure 1. Number of Atlantic basin major hurricanes for the period 1944–2004.
This  increased  level  of  hurricane  activity  is  occurring  against  a  backdrop  of  a 
large  and  rapidly  growing  coastal  population  in  this  country  as  identified  by  the 
2000  Census  conducted  by  the  DOC  Census  Bureau.  Coastal  populations  are  di-
rectly  threatened  by  tropical  cyclones,  and  are  largely  unfamiliar  with  the  dev-
astating  impacts  of  these  storms.  About  85  percent  of  coastal  residents  have  never 
experienced  the  core  of  a  major  hurricane.  Population  growth  increases  the  overall 
risk by stressing the already crowded, and in some places overwhelmed, evacuation 
routes. 
NHC Structure and Support 

The  NHC  has  a  staff  of  41,  including  six  hurricane  forecasters  and  support  staff. 
Our area of responsibility encompasses the Atlantic Ocean, Gulf of Mexico and Car-
ibbean, as well as the Eastern Pacific Ocean east of 140° W. The central Pacific from 
140° W to the international dateline is monitored by the NWS Central Pacific Hurri-
cane Center located in Hawaii. The NHC staff is extremely dedicated and, in 2004, 
worked tirelessly to provide the forecasts necessary during the very active hurricane 
season.  Some  individuals  worked  for  many  weeks  without  a  day  off  to  ensure  fore-
casts and warnings were issued and our mission was upheld. 

The NHC depends on numerous critical research and operational activities inside 
and  outside  NOAA,  including  NWS’  Environmental  Modeling  Center  (EMC),  the 
Geophysical  Fluid  Dynamics  Laboratory  (GFDL)  and  the  Hurricane  Research  Divi-
sion  (HRD)  in  NOAA’s  Office  of  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Research,  as  well  as  the 
NWS’s Central Operations, which is responsible for the computing infrastructure to 
run  the  forecast  models.  We  also  rely  on  the  Department  of  Defense—in  particular 
the  U.S.  Air  Force  Reserve  Command’s  53rd  Weather  Reconnaissance  Squadron 
‘‘Hurricane  Hunters.’’  These  reconnaissance  flights  make  the  storm  penetration 
flights  and  provide  essential  data  about  the  structure  of  the  storm.  NOAA’s  Office 
of  Marine  and  Aviation  Operations  conducts  further  reconnaissance  missions  when 
hurricanes approach land. The Office of Marine and Aviation Operations also pilots 
the  Gulf  Stream  IV,  which  provides  data  from  the  large  area  surrounding  a  hurri-
cane. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.
1
y
a
m

9

In  the  international  arena,  under  the  auspices  of  the  World  Meteorological  Orga-
nization  (WMO),  a  United  Nations’  Specialized  Agency,  the  NHC  is  designated  as 
a  Regional  Specialized  Meteorological  Center  (RSMC).  As  an  RSMC,  NHC’s  fore-
casts  provide  guidance  to  two  dozen  countries  in  the  Atlantic,  Eastern  Pacific  and 
Caribbean. For their part, these countries provide the United States valuable weath-
er observations that help in our forecasts for them and for us. 

The NHC has strong ties to the meteorological research community as well as oth-
ers  in  academia,  international  meteorological  services,  emergency  management 
agencies, the media, amateur radio operators, the American Red Cross, and the pri-
vate  meteorological  sector.  It  takes  a  true  team  effort  to  make  the  hurricane  pro-
gram work. 
Our Products and Services 

NHC  tropical  cyclone  forecasts  are  issued  every  six  hours  and  include  text  mes-
sages as well as a suite of graphical products depicting our forecasts and the accom-
panying probabilities and ‘‘cone of uncertainty,’’ as it has become known. This infor-
mation  is  available  through  many  sources,  including  the  media  and  the  Internet. 
The  media  is  an  essential  partner  and  helps  us  get  the  information  to  the  public. 
Without  the  media,  it  would  be  very  difficult  to  get  the  information  as  widely  dis-
tributed.  The  Internet  has  also  become  an  excellent  vehicle  to  provide  our  informa-
tion  to  the  public.  NOAA  websites  recorded  over  9  billion  ‘‘hits’’  during  the  peak  of 
the 2004 hurricane season. 

Even with the majority of users saying they are ‘‘very satisfied’’ with our current 
products  and  services,  we  continue  to  develop  new  experimental  products  for  the 
2005  hurricane  season  to  meet  user  needs.  One  of  these  products  is  a  depiction  of 
tropical  cyclone  surface  wind  speed  probabilities  at  specific  locations,  and  is  avail-
able  in  both  text  and  graphical  formats.  These  new  and  expanded  products  help  us 
better convey forecast uncertainties and have the potential to provide users with in-
formation  that  enhances  their  ability  to  make  preparedness  decisions  specific  to 
their  situations.  In  accordance  with  the  NOAA  Partnership  Policy,  we  consult  with 
our  users  and  partners  to  determine  the  usefulness  of  our  products  to  ensure  the 
products  further  the  public-private  enterprise  as  a  whole  and  help  us  better  meet 
our mission. 

The  NHC  coordinates  with  many  other  agencies,  both  domestic  and  abroad,  on 
tropical  cyclone  forecasts  and  watches/warnings.  Forecast  coordination  calls  occur 
one hour before each advisory release deadline. The calls include the U.S. Navy, the 
U.S.  Air  Force  Weather  Agency,  the  Federal  Emergency  Management  Agency 
(FEMA), and NWS regional headquarters and local Weather Forecast Offices (WFO) 
of the affected area. NHC then constructs and disseminates the final advisory prod-
ucts within the hour after this coordination call is initiated. 

Our  Region  Hurricane  Operational  Plan  provides  procedures  for  coordinating 
watches  and  warnings  with  other  countries.  This  coordination,  which  is  a  chal-
lenging and important task for NHC, can involve up to six or more weather services 
at one time. While NHC provides forecast information and often initiates the coordi-
nation,  it  is  ultimately  up  to  each  country  to  issue  watches  and  warnings  for  their 
area(s) of responsibility. 

The FEMA/NWS Hurricane Liaison Team (HLT), which I usually activate at NHC 
a  few  days  in  advance  of  a  potential  U.S.  landfall,  coordinates  communications  be-
tween NOAA and the emergency management community at the Federal and State 
levels.  After  consulting  with  our  local  weather  offices  and  our  center,  emergency 
managers make evacuation and other preparedness decisions. The HLT provides an 
excellent  way  to  communicate  with  the  large  number  of  emergency  managers  typi-
cally impacted by a potential hurricane. 
Our Performance 

Great  progress  has  been  made  in  forecasting  the  track  of  tropical  cyclones  over 
the past half-century. Our average 48-hour track error, which was near 300 nautical 
miles  in  the  early  1970s,  is  now  near  100  nautical  miles.  Today’s  5-day  forecasts 
are as accurate as our 3-day forecasts were 15 years ago. These advances are largely 
the result of improvements made in operational numerical weather prediction, aided 
by investments in increasingly sophisticated computers and advances in satellite ob-
servations  over  the  otherwise  data-sparse  oceanic  regions  where  tropical  cyclones 
are spawned. 

An  important  part  of  this  success  story  is  the  NOAA  Gulf  Stream  IV  jet  aircraft. 
Following  a  highly  successful  HRD  research  program,  Congress  appropriated  funds 
to obtain this jet in the mid 1990s. Data collected by the Gulf Stream IV now result 
in  36–48  hour  forecast  improvements  averaging  near  20  percent  when  tropical  cy-
clones threaten land. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

10

Our  improvement  in  the  accuracy  of  hurricane  intensity  forecasts  has  been  more 
modest, in comparison to the progress made in track forecasts. The average 48-hour 
intensity  forecast  error  has  remained  near  15  knots  for  at  least  the  last  15  years. 
Anticipating rapid intensification, which occurred as Hurricane Charley made land-
fall  last  year,  remains  most  challenging.  As  a  result  of  forecast  uncertainties,  we 
advise emergency managers to prepare for a hurricane one category stronger on the 
Saffir-Simpson hurricane scale than what is being forecast. Improvements to the in-
tensity  forecast  could  substantially  reduce  the  indirect  costs  of  tropical  cyclones  by 
reducing the scope of evacuations and other preparations.

Outreach and Education 

Further  gains  in  forecast  skill  through  improvements  in  science  and  technology 
are  essential.  Enhanced  hurricane  information  will  not,  by  itself,  be  enough  if  the 
information  is  not  communicated  to  the  at-risk  public  in  a  manner  that  can  effect 
the best preparedness actions. For example, Dr. Jay Baker from Florida State Uni-
versity estimated that only 25–50 percent of the people who should have evacuated 
from  last  year’s  hurricanes  did.  Of  those  that  did  evacuate,  a  substantial  number 
would  have  been  safer  remaining  at  home  because  their  residence  was  well  con-
structed  and  outside  of  a  flood  zone.  Education  and  outreach  events  developed  by 
NOAA,  the  emergency  management  community,  and  the  media  are  essential  to  en-
sure the public has the information needed to protect lives and property. 

We try to bring a ‘‘clear, calm and trusted voice’’ into households at risk. We con-
duct  numerous  media  interviews  each  hurricane  season.  Efforts  during  the  2004 
season reflect the magnitude of our effort. During this season NHC conducted more 
than  2,600  interviews  with  radio,  television  and  print  outlets  during  hurricanes 
Charley,  Frances,  Ivan  and  Jeanne.  Bilingual  meteorologists  satisfy  our  responsi-
bility to inform the growing Spanish speaking population. 

NHC  trains  local,  State,  Federal  and  international  emergency  managers  on  the 
limitations  in  hurricane  forecasting  and  proper  use  of  our  products  through  work-
shops.  More  than  1,000  emergency  managers  have  been  trained  at  the  NHC  in  the 
past 14 years. These workshops extend to the international community where trop-
ical weather forecasters from around the world come to be trained in hurricane fore-
casting. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.
2
y
a
m

11

The  Hurricane  Awareness  Tours  that  take  place  along  the  U.S.  east  and  gulf 
coasts  and  in  the  Caribbean  provide  opportunities  to  advance  hurricane  awareness 
for  the  public  and  media  in  vulnerable  communities.  Doors  to  the  ‘‘Hurricane 
Hunter’’ aircraft are open to thousands of people each year, where they learn about 
aircraft missions and the team effort between forecasters, emergency managers and 
the  media.  These  events  encourage  every  individual,  family,  business,  and  commu-
nity to develop a hurricane plan, and to have that plan in place before the hurricane 
season  begins.  Despite  these  efforts,  a  Mason-Dixon  Research  Poll  released  in  May 
2005  revealed  that  47  percent  of  people  in  coastal  states  do  not  have  a  hurricane 
plan.  Clearly,  more  needs  to  be  done  and  we  will  continue  to  address  this  with  our 
partners through our education and outreach efforts. 

In  recent  years,  rainfall-induced  freshwater  floods  have  taken  more  lives  in  trop-
ical  cyclones  than  any  other  threat.  We  are  taking  steps  in  our  operational  proce-
dures,  education  and  outreach  activities,  and  research  and  development  to  reduce 
the loss of life. 
Storm Surge: A Success Story—so far 

Storm surge has caused most of this country’s tropical cyclone fatalities, and rep-
resents our greatest risk for a large loss of life in this country, particularly in hard 
to  evacuate  areas  like  the  Florida  Keys  and  New  Orleans.  Following  Hurricane 
Camille  in  1969,  which  resulted  in  at  least  100  storm  surge  deaths,  NOAA  estab-
lished a group that developed and implemented a storm surge model called SLOSH 
(Sea,  Lake,  and  Overland  Surges  from  Hurricanes).  The  plans  for  hurricane  evacu-
ation  programs  along  the  Atlantic  and  Gulf  of  Mexico  coasts  are  based  on  SLOSH 
calculations.  SLOSH  and  the  resulting  evacuation  plans  are  credited  largely  with 
a dramatic decrease in the loss of life due to storm surge in the United States. Since 
Camille, the total number of deaths due to storm surge in this country is less than 
fifteen. 

The SLOSH model calculates storm surge heights resulting either from historical, 
hypothetical or actual hurricanes. SLOSH incorporates bathymetry and topography, 
including  bay  and  river  configurations,  roads,  levees,  and  other  physical  features 
that  can  modify  the  storm  surge  flow  pattern.  Thirty-eight  computational  domains, 
or  SLOSH  basins,  cover  the  U.S.  east  and  gulf  coasts,  Puerto  Rico,  the  Virgin  Is-
lands,  Guam,  and  the  Hawaiian  Islands  of  Oahu  and  Kauai.  The  SLOSH  basins 
must  be  revised  periodically  to  take  into  account  new  cuts  in  barrier  islands,  new 
levees  or  revision  to  older  levees,  waterway  dredging  and  other  significant  changes 
to  flow.  NOAA  recently  formed  a  storm  surge  assessment  team  to  examine  our 
users’  requirements  for  real-time  storm  surge  information  and  products,  to  direct 
storm  surge  modeling  within  NOAA  and  to  plan  for  future  enhancement  of,  or  the 
replacement of, the SLOSH model. 

Comprehensive  evacuation  studies  conducted  jointly  by  FEMA,  the  U.S.  Army 
Corps  of  Engineers  (USACE),  NOAA,  and  state  and  local  emergency  managers  are 
based  on  the  simulated  surges  computed  by  SLOSH.  Mapping  of  the  resulting  po-
tential surge inundations is done by the USACE as a step in determining hurricane 
evacuation zones. 

The  storm  surge  depends  on  the  hurricane  track  and  wind  field.  A  slight  dif-
ference  in  either  can  mean  a  huge  difference  in  the  surge.  Last  year’s  Hurricane 
Ivan  is  an  example.  The  12-hour  forecast  was  off  by  only  25  miles,  which  is  a  very 
small amount. However, the difference in the predicted storm surge was large. The 
initial forecast called for a 14-foot surge in Mobile Bay and 5 feet in Pensacola Bay. 
But with the storm hitting 25 miles farther east, only a 4-foot surge occurred in Mo-
bile  Bay,  while  Pensacola  Bay  had  a  12-foot  surge.  This  is  precisely  why  we  use  a 
mean envelope of high water for evacuation planning and training. An equally large 
difference is seen with the radius of maximum winds within a hurricane. When pro-
vided precise information, the SLOSH model performs well. Despite the tremendous 
success  of  the  Nation’s  storm  surge  program,  as  our  coastal  regions  become  more 
populated the potential for a surge catastrophe remains. 
Future Activities for the U.S. Hurricane Program 

While  we  have  made  significant  progress  in  hurricane  forecasting  and  warnings, 
we have more work to do. For example, even in the areas with rapid advancement, 
such  as  track  forecasting,  we  still  cannot  provide  sufficient  lead  time  to  evacuate 
particularly  vulnerable  areas  like  the  Florida  Keys  or  New  Orleans.  From  a  sci-
entific standpoint, the gaps in our capabilities fall into two broad categories: (1) our 
ability  to  assess  the  current  state  of  the  hurricane  and  its  environment  (analysis), 
and  (2)  our  ability  to  predict  the  hurricane’s  future  state  (the  forecast).  Finally,  we 
would like to improve public preparedness. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

12

Improving Analyses 

Analysis  is  the  starting  point  of  the  forecast  process.  Inaccurate  assessments  of 
a  tropical  cyclone’s  current  position,  intensity,  and  size  lead  directly  to  forecast  er-
rors.  To  improve  the  analysis  of  tropical  cyclones,  we  need  to  enhance  our  observa-
tion  network.  Many  of  the  enhancements  required  to  improve  hurricane  analyses, 
particularly  over  the  data-sparse  ocean  areas,  will  be  addressed  through  such  pro-
grams  as  the  Global  Earth  Observation  System  of  Systems  (GEOSS),  a  10-year 
international  endeavor  of  which  the  United  States  is  a  member  and  NOAA  a  key 
participant.  Further,  additional  observation  improvements  will  be  realized  with 
funding  from  the  Supplemental  Hurricane  Bill  passed  last  year,  including  7  data 
buoys  recently  deployed  and  the  sensors  to  be  installed  on  Air  Force  ‘‘Hurricane 
Hunter’’  aircraft.  We  are  working  with  the  research  community  to  develop  some  of 
the  future  observation  technology.  Advanced  operational  data  assimilation  systems 
will  very  soon  combine  all  of  the  available  observational  data  in  very  sophisticated 
Numerical Weather Prediction (NWP) analyses. 
Improving Forecasts 

The accuracy of NHC tropical cyclone forecasts is closely tied to improvements in 
computer-based  numerical  weather  prediction  models  (model  guidance).  Significant 
gains  in  intensity,  precipitation  and  wind  distribution  forecasting  await  the  next 
generation operational modeling system capable of incorporating high-resolution in-
formation  from  the  hurricane  core.  Improvements  will  be  based  on  state-of-the-art 
physics developed specifically to address these deficiencies. 

We  have  increased  our  efforts  to  transfer  research  into  operations.  The  United 
States  Weather  Research  Program  (USWRP)  Joint  Hurricane  Testbed  (JHT)  was 
formed in late 2000. The mission of the JHT is to facilitate the transfer of new tech-
nology,  research  results,  and  observational  advances  of  the  USWRP,  its  sponsoring 
agencies,  the  academic  community,  and  the  private  sector  for  improved  operational 
tropical  cyclone  analysis  and  prediction.  To  accomplish  this  mission  we  identify 
promising  and  mature  research  and  technology,  and  provide  the  infrastructure  to 
test  and  evaluate  the  selected  techniques  in  an  operational  setting.  Federal  assist-
ance is provided to both Federal and non-federal researchers to allow them to tailor 
their  techniques  for  the  operational  environment  and  to  collaborate  in  the  testing 
and evaluation of their techniques by operational center staff. 

We  are  very  pleased  thus  far  with  the  results  of  the  JHT.  Projects  implemented 
thus far have made quantifiable enhancements to our operations including a 35 per-
cent  improvement  in  the  computer  model  3-day  track  forecast  and  significant  im-
provements  at  other  time  scales.  These  advances  helped  NHC  to  establish  new 
records for track forecast accuracy, both in 2003 and 2004. 

Much of our improvement in tropical cyclone forecasting is attributed to advances 
in  Numerical  Weather  Prediction  (NWP).  In  collaboration  with  many  scientists  and 
developers in the domestic and international operational NWP centers, the EMC de-
velops state of the art numerical modeling systems and is a recognized world leader. 
We are now at the point in improving intensity forecasts that we were a decade ago 
in  improving  track  forecasts.  Through  our  NWP  advancements,  our  2005  version  of 
the  GFDL  high-resolution  model  improved  some  intensity  forecasts  over  the  statis-
tical  models  when  run  on  several  2004  Atlantic  storms.  To  advance  hurricane  pre-
diction,  especially  hurricane  intensity  and  size  forecasts,  EMC  is  leading  the  devel-
opment  of  the  Hurricane  Weather  and  Research  Forecasting  (HWRF)  system.  The 
HWRF  system  uses  a  collaborative  approach  among  the  research  community  and 
will  apply  advanced  model  physics  as  HWRF  couples  the  atmosphere,  land,  and 
ocean into an integrated model. EMC will also couple an advanced wave model with 
a  dynamic  storm  surge  model  to  better  predict  coastal  impacts  of  waves  and  storm 
surge. 

Research  efforts  are  being  coordinated  across  NOAA  to  develop  new  technology 
and  applications  to  improve  NOAA’s  products,  and  provide  outreach  to  the  public. 
These  research  efforts  address  issues  that  have  direct  impact  upon  the  ability  of 
NOAA  to  provide  tropical  cyclone  weather  forecasting  and  warning  services  to  the 
public. 

We  are  making  excellent  progress.  NOAA  has  a  comprehensive  plan  to  improve 
intensity forecasts along with our other difficult forecast challenges. While there are 
no  quick  fixes,  we  are  very  optimistic  that  we  will  continue  to  make  advances  in 
operational  forecasts  of  tropical  cyclone  intensity,  wind  structure,  size,  and  rainfall 
in the near future. We are leading the Nation in a large collaborative effort through 
a long-term commitment to these problems. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

13

Increase the Effectiveness of Public Preparedness 

Our Nation’s hurricane warning program requires more than meteorology. Mitiga-
tion  of  storm  impacts  demands  an  interdisciplinary  approach  to  develop  long-term 
policies and practices for better public safety. Such an approach requires, at a min-
imum, contributions from the public, private and academic sectors to address better 
land use, building codes, sheltering plans, identification and communication of risk, 
and  public  education.  Mitigation  of  future  storm  impacts  depends  upon  a  more  in-
formed  public  who  knows  what  the  hazards  are,  how  those  hazards  impact  them, 
and what actions to take based on those hazards. Without this approach, our Nation 
is  vulnerable  to  greater  devastation  from  hurricanes  in  the  coming  decades  regard-
less of forecast accuracy. 

An example of how we can do more in outreach is through programs like the Na-
tional  Hurricane  Survival  Initiative.  This  public-private  partnership  includes  the 
National  Emergency  Management  Association,  Florida  Division  of  Emergency  Man-
agement,  the  Salvation  Army,  NHC  and  corporate  partners.  Their  collective  aim  is 
to  educate  and  prepare  communities  at  risk  from  hurricanes.  Another  example  is 
the Federal Alliance for Safe Homes (FLASH). FLASH is a non-profit, 501(c)3 or-
ganization  dedicated  to  promoting  disaster  safety  and  property  loss  mitigation.  A 
current  FLASH partnership  with  the  NOAA/NWS,  the  Allstate  Foundation,  The 
Southwestern  Insurance  Information  Service  and  the  Texas  State  Parks  and  Wild-
life  is  bringing  greater  visibility  to  a  national  Public  Service  Campaign  named  by 
the  NWS  ‘‘ Turn  Around  Don’t  Drown.’’  The  campaign  in  Texas  raises  flood  safety 
awareness using billboards, bilingual handouts for state park visitors and television 
public service announcements across major cities. These examples demonstrate how 
Federal-State  and  public-private  partnerships  are  critical  to  pre-disaster  planning, 
and  targeted  dissemination  of  outreach,  education  and  information  about  the  risks 
of severe weather. 
Conclusion 

We  have  come  a  long  way  in  hurricane  prediction.  Our  forecasts  are  better  than 
they have ever been. We have an excellent working partnership with the emergency 
management community. Our partners in the private weather sector and the media 
work  with  us  to  make  sure  our  information  is  disseminated  and  communicated  as 
widely  and  comprehensively  as  possible.  Even  with  the  substantive  progress  we 
have  made  over  the  last  fifty  years,  we  remain  vulnerable  to  a  hurricane  catas-
trophe.  To  meet  the  challenge  of  reducing  the  risk  to  our  Nation  from  tropical  cy-
clones,  we  must  continue  to  improve  our  forecasts  and  warnings,  and  continue  our 
public education efforts. 

Thank you for the opportunity to talk with you about our Nation’s hurricane fore-
cast and warning program, and for your support as we continue to provide our Na-
tion with the highest-quality weather services.

Senator DEMINT. Mr. McCarthy? 

STATEMENT  OF  DENNIS  MCCARTHY,  DIRECTOR,  OFFICE  OF 
CLIMATE,  WATER  AND  WEATHER  SERVICES,  NATIONAL 
WEATHER SERVICE 
Mr.  MCCARTHY.  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee, 
I’m Dennis McCarthy, Director of the National Weather Service Of-
fice of Climate, Water and Weather Services. Thank you for the op-
portunity  to  discuss  NOAA’s  weather  programs,  specifically  torna-
does. 

In an average year in the United States, thunderstorms generate 
1,300 tornadoes resulting in 58 deaths, 1,500 injuries, and $1.1 bil-
lion  in  property  damage.  Thunderstorms  produce  other  hazards, 
such  as  lightning,  hail  damage  and  wind  and  flash  flooding.  The 
challenge  is  to  determine  which  thunderstorms  will  bring  which 
hazards. In the 1970s less than 1 of 3 tornadoes occurred in a tor-
nado  watch  area,  only  1  of  5  occurred  in  a  tornado  warning  area. 
More  than  80  percent  of  tornado  warnings  were  based  on  spotter 
reports, meaning there was virtually no warning lead time for most 
tornadoes. By the end of the decade, research focused on optimizing 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

14

observational  data  and  new  techniques  for  using  weather  satellite 
and  conventional  radar  data  began  paying  off.  Meanwhile,  Con-
gress supported an expansion of the NOAA weather radio network, 
and a computer-based communication system for National Weather 
Service  field  offices,  both  improved  warning  dissemination.  During 
the  1980s—warnings  preceded  one  in  three  tornadoes,  and  lead 
time increased to more than 5 minutes. To take advantage of Dopp-
ler  radar  technology,  NOAA  incorporated  a  program  to  replace  the 
30 year-old weather radars with NEXRAD Doppler radars into the 
National Weather Service modernization. These new radars had an 
immediate  impact  on  tornado  warnings  skill  with  lead  times  ap-
proaching 10 minutes in the 1990s. 

In  recent  years,  we’ve  made  improvements  in  the  NEXRAD  ra-
dars  and  the  work  stations  used  by  forecasters,  the  Advanced 
Weather Interactive Processing System, or AWIPS, which integrate 
radar  data  with  satellite,  wind  profiler  and  other  data.  These  im-
provements,  combined  with  forecasters’  training  and  experience, 
have resulted in an increase in tornado warning lead time to about 
13 minutes. Almost three-fourths of all tornadoes are now preceded 
by  tornado  warnings.  Matching  improvements  in  tornado  detection 
and  warning  are  improvements  in  education,  preparedness  and 
communication.  With  continued  support  from  Congress  and  part-
ners in the private sector, and all levels of government, the NOAA 
Weather  Radio  All  Hazards  network  has  grown  to  more  than  900 
transmitters  across  the  United  States.  Warning  dissemination, 
radar display and urgent safety advice for commercial media, espe-
cially  television,  have  played  a  key  role  in  reducing  fatalities  and 
injuries  from  severe  storms.  Internet  websites  displaying  radar 
data  and  warning  information  are  experiencing  incredible  growth 
and  use.  NOAA’s  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Research  and  National 
Weather Service continue to work together to improve tornado and 
severe storm watches and warnings. 

In  the  short-term,  the  three  agencies  involved  in  NEXRAD—
NOAA, the FAA and U.S. Air Force—plan to add dual polarization 
capability to the radar in Fiscal Year 2008 to 2012 timeframe. Dual 
polarization will bring improvements not only to tornado warnings, 
but  also  warnings  for  floods,  hail  and  winter  storms.  NOAA’s 
Warning  Decision  Support  System—WDSS  II—uses  sophisticated, 
artificial intelligence-based science to analyze storms for hail, wind 
and  tornado  potential.  It  will  add  efficiency  to  the  warning  deci-
sion-making  process.  Test  and  forecast  offices  indicated  will  in-
crease warning lead times, by two to three minutes, and reduce the 
false alarm rate. 

With all of the improvements in tornado detection and lead time, 
false  alarms  continue  to  be  a  challenge.  Approximately  three-
fourths of all tornado warnings are followed by hail, high winds or 
heavy rain, but not a tornado. Advances such as dual polarization, 
and  WDSS  II,  along  with  integration  of  Geography  Information 
System, or GIS, technology for dissemination will help improve the 
false alarm rate. In the long term, we’re exploring new technologies 
to  upgrade  or  replace  our  NEXRAD  Doppler  radar  system,  which 
is  approaching  the  mid-point  of  its  life  cycle.  One  likely  candidate 
technology  is  phased  array  radar—phased  arrays  work  by  forming 
and steering radar beams electronically, they’re very fast and agile 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

15

compared  to  the  mechanical  rotating  dish  antennas.  Their  faster 
collection of the volumetric data, so important to warning decisions, 
can add 4 minutes to tornado lead times. These radars will also be 
less expensive to maintain since they have no moving parts. 

Further  into  the  future,  high  resolution  observational  data,  in-
cluding data from modern radars, can be used in sophisticated nu-
merical  weather  prediction  models,  which  will  help  make  the  leap 
from warning on observation to warning on forecast. This is where 
we would like to be in the 2020 timeframe, allowing us to push tor-
nado warning lead time beyond 30 minutes. 

In conclusion, Mr. Chairman, NOAA has made tremendous gains 
in providing warnings to help protect the lives of U.S. citizens from 
being able to detect and warn for most tornadoes, now with an av-
erage  lead  time  of  13  minutes  to  getting  the  word  to  people  about 
what  to  do  when  they  hear  a  tornado  warning,  either  from  the 
media or directly from NOAA, by internet or NOAA Weather Radio 
All  Hazards.  We  can  continue  to  improve  by  taking  advantage  of 
emerging  technologies  in  radar  detection  and  numerical  prediction 
of  storm-scale  weather  events.  Thank  you  for  inviting  me  here 
today, and I’ll be happy to answer any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. McCarthy follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DENNIS MCCARTHY, DIRECTOR, OFFICE OF CLIMATE, 

WATER, AND WEATHER SERVICES, NATIONAL WEATHER SERVICE, NOAA 

Introduction 

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  I  am  Dennis  McCarthy,  Director 
of the National Weather Service Office of Climate, Water, and Weather Services, of 
the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  within  the  Depart-
ment of Commerce. Thank you for the opportunity to appear before you today to dis-
cuss NOAA’s severe weather programs, specifically tornadoes. 

In  an  average  year,  there  are  1,300  tornadoes  resulting  in  58  deaths,  1,500  inju-
ries, and $1.1 billion in property damage. Floods account for $5.2 billion in damage 
annually  and  average  over  80  deaths  per  year;  lightning  accounts  for  an  additional 
53  fatalities  each  year.  Thunderstorm  complexes  can  generate  tornadoes,  lightning, 
flash  floods,  extreme  wind,  and  hail.  The  challenge  to  forecasting  severe  weather 
and  any  associated  warnings  is  to  determine  which  thunderstorm  complexes  will 
produce which combination of threats. 

The highest frequency of tornado occurrence in the world is in the Central Plains 
of  the  United  States,  east  of  the  Rocky  Mountains  and  west  of  the  Appalachian 
Mountains.  While  tornadoes  typically  occur  during  the  spring  and  summer  in  late 
afternoon  and  early  evening,  they  have  been  known  to  occur  at  any  hour,  on  any 
day of the year, in every state in the United States. 
Brief History of Tornado Forecasting 

The  National  Weather  Service  (NWS)  Tornado  and  Severe  Thunderstorm  Watch 
and  Warning  program  can  be  traced  back  to  two  tornadoes  that  struck  Tinker  Air 
Force Base, Oklahoma, in March of 1948. The first tornado (March 20) was not fore-
casted.  At  the  strong  urging  of  Major  General  Fred  Borum,  who  was  in  charge  of 
the  base,  two  Air  Force  meteorologists,  Major  Ernest  Fawbush  and  Captain  Robert 
Miller, studied weather charts from previous tornado outbreaks looking for similar-
ities  that  could  indicate  tornado  potential.  On  the  morning  of  March  25,  1948,  the 
weather charts were very similar to those that occurred with the first tornado. This 
similarity  was  reported  back  to  Major  General  Borum,  and  a  tornado  forecast  was 
issued.  That  evening,  the  second  tornado  within  one  week  struck  Tinker  Air  Force 
Base.  After  this  success,  weather  forecasters,  both  civilian  and  military,  started  to 
seriously  explore  tornado  forecasting.  The  first  tornado  forecast  was  issued  by  the 
then  Weather  Bureau  in  1952.  During  this  same  period,  other  research  scientists 
were  actively  exploring  the  use  of  radar  to  identify  on-going  storms  that  could  po-
tentially  produce  tornadoes,  and  pioneering  work  was  being  done  by  the  Illinois 
Water Survey and Texas A&M University. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

16

In  1956,  Congress  appropriated  funds  to  develop  radar  for  meteorological  pur-
poses.  A  network  of  radars  was  installed  to  provide  coverage  for  most  of  tornado 
alley  and  the  hurricane  prone  Southeastern  United  States  in  early  1959  and  1960. 
The  National  Severe  Storms  Research  Project,  in  Norman,  Oklahoma,  expanded  its 
mission  to  include  radar  techniques  related  to  severe  thunderstorm  warnings.  In 
1964,  a  merger  of  the  radar  and  tornado  research  programs  created  the  National 
Severe Storms Laboratory. 

Because  of  its  dependence  on  rapid  communication  of  weather  data  from  all  over 
the country, the forecasting of tornado potential remained with the National Severe 
Storms  Forecast  Center  in  Kansas  City.  Similarly,  because  providing  alerts  for  ex-
isting  storms  required  immediate  access  to  radar  data,  local  radar  offices  issued 
these products. 

The  1965  Palm  Sunday  Tornado  Outbreak  took  266  lives,  even  though  tornado 
forecasts  and  alerts  had  been  issued.  The  National  Weather  Service  conducted  an 
assessment of its products and services following the outbreak and made several sig-
nificant recommendations including:

• The National Weather Service began to differentiate tornado forecasts from typ-
ical  weather  forecasts  by  using  the  names  Tornado  Watch  and  Tornado  Warn-
ing.
• The National Weather Service started to hold preparedness meetings in collabo-
ration  with  Federal,  State,  and  local  government  officials  and  news  dissemina-
tors. Discussions at these meetings included the development of simple tornado 
safety rules.
• The  National  Weather  Service  committed  itself  to  completing  radar  coverage 

east of the Rocky Mountains.

With these changes, the present watch and warning system was completed. How-
ever,  tornado  and  severe  thunderstorm  meteorology  was  still  in  its  infancy  and  we 
have made significant progress since then. 
Key Research Leads to Significant Improvements in Operations 

In  a  three-year  period  from  1976  to  1979,  statistics  indicated  less  than  one  out 
of three tornadoes occurred in a tornado watch area, and only one out of five torna-
does  occurred  in  a  tornado  warning  area.  Also  during  that  time,  over  80  percent  of 
tornado  warnings  were  based  on  human  spotter  reports,  meaning  that  there  was 
virtually no lead time between when the warning was issued and when the tornado 
struck. 

In  1976,  a  small  group  at  the  National  Severe  Storms  Forecast  Center  (NSSFC) 
began  developing  new  analyses  and  display  techniques  for  meteorological  data. 
These researchers worked with the National Aeronautics and Space Administration 
(NASA) and NOAA’s National Environmental Satellite, Data, and Information Serv-
ice  to  develop  a  computer  system  that  allowed  forecasters  to  collect  data  directly 
from  the  weather  satellites  to  make  short-range  forecasts.  In  addition,  the  NSSFC 
research forecasters collaborated with scientists at the National Severe Storms Lab-
oratory  to  develop  new  methods  of  interpreting  conventional  radar  data  and  use  it 
to issue warnings ahead of storms. 

These  efforts  led  to  immediate  improvements  in  our  ability  to  issue  accurate  tor-
nado watches and warnings. By the late 1980s, lead time for tornado warnings had 
increased from zero to over 5 minutes. Tornado warnings were issued for about one 
third  of  all  tornadoes  (compared  to  only  one  fifth  in  the  late  1970s),  and  tornado 
watches were issued before about half of the tornadoes. Most importantly, the public 
was  becoming  more  aware  of  tornado  warnings,  and  the  sentiment  ‘‘the  tornado 
struck without warning’’ was being uttered less and less. 

While  our  scientific  advances  in  the  1980s  resulted  in  a  marked  improvement  in 
tornado forecasting, the American public deserved more. In the late 1970s, a collabo-
rative program had been established among NOAA, the U.S. Air Force (USAF), and 
the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) to begin evaluating the value of Doppler 
radar  for  tornado  detection.  Tests  were  conducted  in  the  Oklahoma  City  Weather 
Service  Forecast  Office.  These  tests  proved  Doppler  radar  could  significantly  im-
prove  tornado  lead  times  and  the  detection  of  other  measures  essential  for  fore-
casting tornado warnings. A program to replace the 30-year-old weather radars with 
NEXRAD  Doppler  weather  radars  (the  WSR–88D)  was  incorporated  into  NOAA’s 
plan  for  National  Weather  Service  Modernization.  These  radars,  coupled  with  spe-
cially trained meteorologists in local National Weather Service Forecast Offices, had 
an  immediate,  dramatic  impact  on  tornado  warning  skill.  Following  the  nationwide 
installation  of  the  NEXRAD  network  in  the  1990s,  tornado  lead  times  almost  dou-
bled  from  5.3  to  9.5  minutes.  In  addition,  the  probability  of  detecting  a  tornado  in-
creased  from  35  to  60  percent.  By  2004,  tornado  lead  times  averaged  just  over  13 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

17

minutes,  and  the  probability  of  detection  rose  to  75  percent.  More  importantly,  ex-
pected tornado deaths and personal injuries were reduced by 45 percent and 40 per-
cent, respectively. 

Similar  research  advances  have  improved  long-range  forecasts  of  tornadoes.  In 
1995,  a  National  Science  Foundation  sponsored  research  project  involving  NOAA 
and several universities explored the causes of rotation in thunderstorms. This was 
a collaborative effort between research and operations with tornado forecasters from 
the Storm Prediction Center (formerly the National Severe Storms Forecast Center) 
and  local  warning  forecasters  from  several  NWS  Weather  Forecast  Offices  partici-
pating. This collaboration led to significant improvements in forecasting strong and 
violent  tornadoes.  While  only  15  percent  of  all  tornadoes  are  rated  F2  or  stronger 
on  the  six  category  Fujita  Intensity  Scale,  they  produce  more  than  92  percent  of 
U.S. tornado fatalities. 

Underlying  these  improved  performance  measures  is  the  added  benefit  of  in-
creased  data  and  expertise  sharing  by  the  National  Weather  Service  with  its  part-
ners  in  the  media  and  private  sectors.  The  Doppler  radar  data  sets  and  improved 
computer  and  communication  technologies  have  allowed  broadcast  meteorologists 
and  others  to  better  understand  and  communicate  severe  weather  threats  to  citi-
zens.  In  addition,  the  expansion  of  NOAA  Weather  Radio/All-Hazards  remains  a 
vital  component  of  the  National  Weather  Service’s  ability  to  communicate  weather 
and  non-weather  hazard  information.  There  are  currently  over  900  radio  transmit-
ters  across  the  U.S.,  and  weather  radio  is  now  a  key  vehicle  for  Federal,  State  and 
local  public  safety  agencies  to  disseminate  critical  safety  information  on  a  variety 
of hazards, including man-made and natural disasters. 

The  success  of  the  close  collaboration  between  operational  forecasters  and  re-
search  scientists,  coupled  with  the  advent  of  new  communication  systems,  led  to  a 
move  of  the  Storm  Prediction  Center  from  Kansas  City  to  Norman,  Oklahoma,  in 
1996  to  collocate  with  the  National  Severe  Storms  Laboratory.  This  move  spurred 
NOAA to establish the Hazardous Weather Testbed, in which NWS forecasters and 
NOAA research scientists collaboratively test, develop, and operationally implement 
new forecast and warning techniques and technology on a regular basis. 

Research  conducted  at  the  Hazardous  Weather  Testbed  has  led  to  dramatic  im-
provements  in  the  quality  of  severe  thunderstorm  services  provided  by  the  Storm 
Prediction  Center.  The  length  of  severe  thunderstorm  forecasts  has  been  extended 
from 2–3 days, and forecasts now provide specific probabilities for the occurrence of 
tornadoes,  large  hail,  and  damaging  thunderstorm  winds.  Experimental  products 
currently  being  tested  at  the  Storm  Prediction  Center  include  severe  weather  fore-
casts  out  to  eight  days,  and  additional  forecast  details  in  tornado  and  severe  storm 
watches  such  as  probabilities  for  each  type  of  severe  weather  and  the  anticipated 
degree of severity. In addition, trials are being conducted that break down the daily 
outlooks into shorter time intervals that are of great interest to the aviation commu-
nity. 

The  122  NWS  Forecast  Offices  located  throughout  the  U.S.  are  experimenting 
with  improvements  to  the  tornado  and  severe  thunderstorm  warning  process.  The 
county  currently  issues  these  warnings,  however,  a  real  threat  often  exists  for  only 
a  portion  of  a  given  county.  A  number  of  NWS  Forecast  Offices  are  experimenting 
with  a  ‘‘warning-by-polygon’’  method.  In  this  method,  the  polygons  are  derived  by 
assessing  the  threat  from  the  latest  radar  observation  and  modeling  a  projected 
path for the most threatening portion of the storm. The polygons can easily be incor-
porated  into  geospatial  display  technology  for  satellite-based  or  other  systems.  This 
method  would  allow  local  emergency  managers  to  sound  sirens  in  the  high  threat 
areas of the county only. 
Strategies for the Future 

The NOAA Office of Oceanic and Atmospheric Research works in partnership with 
the National Weather Service to substantially improve the lead times and accuracy 
of  tornado  and  severe  storm  watches  and  warnings.  These  efforts  can  be  classified 
as short (0 to 5 years) and long term (5 plus years). 
Short Term Efforts 

The  three  agencies  involved  in  NEXRAD—NOAA,  the  FAA,  and  the  USAF—plan 
to  add  dual  polarization  capability  to  the  radar  system  in  the  FY  2008  to  FY  2012 
timeframe.  Dual  polarization  will  provide  information  on  the  size  and  shape  of  the 
precipitation particles in clouds. Snow can be distinguished from rain, hail size can 
be  estimated,  and  most  importantly,  rainfall  amounts  can  be  accurately  obtained. 
This will lead to improvements in flash flood warnings and forecasts, as well as en-
hanced warnings for hail. The dual polarization radar data will be ‘‘cleaner,’’ which 
should  better  identify  precursors  to  tornadoes  and  the  tornadoes  themselves  even 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

18

before they descend to the ground. Dual polarization data also will allow for unique 
detection  of  debris  lofted  by  tornadoes,  giving  additional  valuable  information  on 
likely tornado intensity. Other improvements to the current network of weather ra-
dars  include  more  rapid  and  enhanced  sampling  of  the  storm  environment,  and  in-
clusion  of  FAA  weather  radars.  NOAA’s  Warning  Decision  Support  System—Inte-
grated Information (WDSS–II) is the second generation of a suite of algorithms and 
displays  for  severe  weather  analysis,  warnings  and  forecasting  incorporating  obser-
vational  data  from  multiple  sources.  WDSS–II  uses  sophisticated  artificial  intel-
ligence-based  science  to  analyze  storms  for  hail,  wind,  and  tornado  potential.  The 
idea  behind  WDSS–II  is  to  provide  the  forecaster  with  critical  information  that  is 
easy  to  understand,  resulting  in  a  timely  decision  in  the  tornado  and  severe  storm 
warning process. Tests in NWS Forecast Offices indicate WDSS–II will increase lead 
times  for  tornadoes  and  severe  thunderstorms  by  2  to  3  minutes  and  reduce  the 
false alarm rate. 

This  past  spring,  NOAA’s  Storm  Prediction  Center  and  National  Severe  Storms 
Laboratory  worked  closely  with  the  Norman  Forecast  Office,  and  partnered  with 
three  external  organizations  to  generate  a  unique  collection  of  three  daily  experi-
mental  very  high-resolution  numerical  weather  prediction  models.  The  predictions 
are  made  from  several  different  versions  of  the  Weather  Research  and  Forecasting 
(WRF) model, an advanced weather prediction system being designed for use by re-
search  scientists  and  forecasters  in  the  United  States.  One  of  the  purposes  of  this 
Hazardous Weather Testbed exercise is to extend the lead time and accuracy of tor-
nado and severe thunderstorm watches issued by the Storm Prediction Center. Pre-
liminary  indications  are  that  these  very  high-resolution  numerical  weather  pre-
diction  models  are  quite  useful  in  predicting  rotating,  severe  thunderstorm  com-
plexes. 
Long Term Efforts 

NEXRAD  Doppler  radar  is  the  key  observation  tool  used  by  forecasters  to  warn 
the  public  of  tornadoes  and  severe  thunderstorms.  The  NEXRAD  network  is  near 
the  midpoint  in  its  designed  lifecycle  and  NOAA  is  already  exploring  new  tech-
nologies  for  a  major  upgrade  or  eventual  replacement.  One  likely  candidate  tech-
nology is phased array radar (PAR) with its electronically scanning antenna. Phased 
arrays  work  by  forming  and  steering  radar  beams  electronically,  and  they  are  very 
fast  and  agile  compared  to  the  mechanical,  rotating  dish  antenna  radars  such  as 
NEXRAD. The military has employed phased array radars for over 30 years in tac-
tical systems. 

NOAA  is  partnering  with  the  U.S.  Navy,  the  FAA,  the  University  of  Oklahoma, 
and several private companies to explore the capability of PAR for weather surveil-
lance. The Navy has loaned NOAA a battle spare PAR antenna for testing at NSSL 
in  Norman,  Oklahoma.  Properly  configured,  a  PAR  system  can  complete  a  volume 
scan  of  the  surrounding  atmosphere  in  less  than  one  minute.  It  currently  takes  a 
NEXRAD  4.1  to  6  minutes  to  perform  a  similar  scan.  This  faster  scan  rate  can  im-
prove  average  tornado  lead  times  by  approximately  4  minutes.  Other  features  of 
PAR could lead to improved detection of tornado and severe weather precursors and 
provide high-quality data for assimilation into numerical weather prediction models. 
In  the  past,  PAR  systems  have  been  deemed  too  costly  for  civilian  use.  Advances 
in  parallel  technologies,  such  as  cellular  telephones  and  wireless  technologies,  as 
well  as  breakthroughs  in  materials  science,  may  reduce  the  cost  of  a  PAR  system 
to  levels  comparable  with  mechanical,  rotating  dish  antenna  radar.  In  addition,  a 
PAR  system  can  be  designed  with  four  fixed  antennae  resulting  in  a  radar  with  no 
moving parts, which is therefore less expensive to operate. Such a PAR system may 
be able to perform multiple functions, thus satisfying the needs of several agencies. 
For example, a PAR could be designed to track aircraft (FAA), perform weather sur-
veillance (NOAA, FAA), and scan for non-cooperative aircraft (Department of Home-
land  Security),  all  at  the  same  time.  Several  agencies  (NOAA,  FAA,  DHS,  NASA, 
and the Department of Defense) are working together under the auspices of the Of-
fice  of  the  Federal  Coordinator  for  Meteorology  to  assess  PAR  capability,  develop  a 
multi-agency research and development plan, and to examine costs. 

The  potential  exists  to  make  significant  long-term  improvements  to  tornado  and 
severe  storm  performance  metrics.  Presently,  warnings  are  based  on  detecting  cer-
tain  precursors  to  tornado  formation.  Tornado  watches  and  forecasts  from  several 
hours to several days are based, in large part, on numerical weather prediction mod-
els run at NOAA’s National Centers for Environmental Prediction in Camp Springs, 
Maryland. The current upper limit on tornado lead times (based solely on detection) 
is  about  20  minutes,  perhaps  30  minutes  for  very  strong  tornadoes.  Crossing  this 
threshold  will  require  reliance  on  forecasts  from  very  high-resolution,  detailed  nu-
merical weather prediction models capable of predicting the level of cloud formation. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

19

The  warning  paradigm  must  shift  from  ‘‘warn  on  detection’’  to  include  ‘‘warn  on 
forecast.’’

Very high resolution, cloud resolving numerical models exist in the research com-
munity  to  better  understand  storm  science  and  cloud  processes.  Some  limited  ex-
perimentation  with  forecasting  applications  has  produced  mixed  results.  One  ap-
proach  being  explored  is  to  run  many  different  models  and  combine  them  into  an 
‘‘ensemble’’  forecast  that  yields  probabilities  of  high  consequence  events  occurring. 
Other  improvements  will  come  from  more  detailed  observations  in  space  and  time 
(dual  polarization,  PAR,  surface  networks,  and  next  generation  satellite  data),  new 
science,  faster  and  higher  capacity  computing,  and  improved  numerical  techniques. 
Improvements  in  forecast  skill  in  the  0.5  to  12-hour  range  has  the  potential  to  im-
prove  tornado  and  severe  storm  watches  and  warnings,  improve  forecasts  of  heavy 
precipitation, contribute to better routing of aircraft enroute and at airports, and to 
assist  local  emergency  managers  in  protecting  life  and  property  in  their  area  of  re-
sponsibility. 

Over the past 50 years, NOAA has made tremendous gains in providing warnings 
to  help  protect  the  lives  of  U.S.  citizens—from  being  able  to  detect  and  warn  for 
most  tornadoes,  now  with  an  average  lead  time  of  13  minutes,  to  getting  the  word 
to  people  about  what  to  do  when  they  hear  a  tornado  warning,  either  from  the 
media or directly from NOAA via Internet or NOAA Weather Radio/All-Hazards. We 
can  continue  to  improve  by  taking  advantage  of  improved  scientific  understanding 
and emerging technologies to upgrade and refresh tornado and severe weather fore-
cast products and information. The trend is clearly toward providing more detail in 
location  and  time  coupled  with  probabilistic  information  allowing  customers  to  bet-
ter  assess  their  particular  risk  prior  to  taking  appropriate  action.  Ongoing  NOAA-
led efforts in radar enhancement (dual polarization and phased array) and improve-
ments  in  the  numerical  prediction  of  storm  scale  weather  events  hold  particular 
promise. 

We  envision  a  future  in  which  the  National  Weather  Service  issues  warnings  at 
least  30  to  45  minutes  before  tornadic  thunderstorms  develop.  Storm  Prediction 
Center Watches will run from about an hour in the future out to 12 hours, and ex-
tended  range  forecasts  are  valid  out  to  several  weeks.  These  forecasts  will  allow 
Emergency Managers and Homeland Security to plan for severe thunderstorms and 
tornadoes far enough in advance to pre-position resources before a storm. Even more 
dramatic  will  be  the  economic  impact  of  improved  severe  thunderstorm  forecasts. 
For example, energy companies can configure their grids to ensure continuous power 
flow  in  regions  impacted  by  storms,  the  transportation  sector  can  reroute  trains, 
trucks  and  airplanes  away  from  areas  that  will  experience  significant  thunder-
storms,  and  local  emergency  managers  can  better  alert  the  public,  saving  lives  and 
mitigating property damage.

Senator DEMINT. Thank you. Dr. Sallenger? 

OF 

H. 

ASBURY 

STATEMENT 

JR.,
OCEANOGRAPHER,  U.S.  GEOLOGICAL  SURVEY  CENTER  FOR 
COASTAL AND WATERSHED STUDIES 
Dr.  SALLENGER.  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee, thank you for the opportunity to speak to you on behalf 
of  the  U.S.  Geological  Survey  on  coastal  change  impact  from  ex-
treme storms. 

SALLENGER, 

Each  year,  natural  hazards  in  the  United  States,  such  as  earth-
quakes, fires, floods, hurricanes, landslides and volcanoes result in 
hundreds  of  lives  lost  and  cost  billions  of  dollars  in  disaster  aid, 
disrupted commerce and destroyed public and private properties. 

At USGS it is our goal to provide scientific research and analysis 
to help citizens, emergency managers and policymakers decide how 
to react to each hazard, and how to safeguard society. In regard to 
hurricanes, we improve understanding of coastal erosion and depo-
sition  that  can  destroy  infrastructure  and  permanently  change  the 
coastal landscape. There are two major objectives. 

The first is to improve predictive capabilities, so that as a hurri-
cane  approaches,  the  United  States  assessment  can  be  made  on 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

20

how  the  threatened  coast  will  change  at  landfall.  The  second  is  to 
provide  the  knowledge  to  assess  vulnerability  of  our  coastlines  to 
extreme  storms  so  that  buildings  and  infrastructure  can  be  sited 
away from hazardous areas. 

For landfalling hurricanes in 2004, we were able to make signifi-
cant advances toward reaching these objectives. In a cooperative ef-
fort between USGS, NASA and U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, the 
impact  zones  of  all  four  storms  were  surveyed  with  the  airborne 
lidar,  a  laser  mapping  system,  both  before  and  after  each  landfall, 
to  detect  the  patterns  of  erosion  and  deposition  that  resulted  from 
the  storms.  The  most  extensive  coastal  change  occurred  during 
Hurricane  Ivan  on  the  Alabama  and  Florida  panhandle  coast, 
where  the  shoreline  retreated  40  feet  during  the  storm.  Storm 
surge  completely  inundated  low-lying  barrier  islands,  its  strong 
currents  flowing  across  the  islands  carved  new  inlets.  Where  sand 
dunes  were  well-developed,  they  eroded  landward,  and  in  places 
underlying five story buildings collapsed, some of the largest build-
ings  to  fall  during  the  hurricane  in  U.S.  history.  Forty-eight  hours 
prior  to  Ivan’s  landfall,  the  USGS  posted  on  its  extreme  storm 
website  an  experimental  product  that  showed  the  vulnerability  of 
the  threatened  coast  to  change.  These  vulnerability  assessments 
were based on a ratio of worst-case storm surge, to our high resolu-
tion coastal elevations, acquired with airborne lidar, and were con-
sistent  with  our  subsequent  measurements  of  what  actually  hap-
pened. 

As  our  research  progresses,  we  hope  to  be  able  to  improve  these 
assessments, for example, by identifying the specific locations along 
the  U.S.  barrier  island  coast,  subject  to  breaching  by  waves  and 
surge.  Such  breaching  can  sever  evacuation  routes,  as  occurred  on 
the  North  Carolina  outer  banks  in  Hurricane  Isabel  in  2003.  The 
unusual  failures  of  the  large  ocean-front  buildings  during  Hurri-
cane Ivan may be a warning about the future. Ocean front commu-
nities in the Southeast U.S. have not been severely tested by hurri-
canes until very recently. 

Between  1966  and  1990,  when  Southeast  coastal  developments 
grew  dense,  only  two  major  hurricanes  made  landfall  along  the 
East  Coast,  or  the  peninsula  of  Florida.  Most  developments  sur-
vived  this  unscathed.  However,  recent  climate  research  on  decadal 
scale changes in hurricane activity suggests that the Atlantic Basin 
has  re-entered  an  active  hurricane  period  similar  to  the  1941  to 
1965,  when  there  were  17  major  hurricanes  that  made  landfall  in 
the  United  States  or  along  the  East  Coast  and  the  peninsula  of 
Florida.  This  active  period  may  persist  for  decades,  hence  the  loss 
of multi-story buildings during Hurricane Ivan may occur more fre-
quently  in  the  future.  USGS  research  is  focused  on  predicting 
coastal  areas  that  are  vulnerable  to  severe  erosion,  so  that  new 
buildings  like  those  that  fell  during  Ivan  can  be  sited  away  from 
hazardous areas. During the present hurricane season, we’ll be ex-
tending  our  results  from  the  2004  hurricanes  by  using  improved 
models and by testing them with coastal change data for any major 
landfalling hurricane. 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before 
you today, and I’m happy to answer any questions that you and the 
Members of the Subcommittee may have. I might also note that in 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

21

your  packets  I  understand  you  have  some  before-and-after  photo-
graphs of at least one of these buildings that went down. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Sallenger follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ASBURY H. SALLENGER, JR., OCEANOGRAPHER, U.S. 

GEOLOGICAL SURVEY CENTER FOR COASTAL AND WATERSHED STUDIES 

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity 
to speak with you on behalf of the U.S. Geological Survey (USGS) on inland flooding 
and  coastal-change  impacts  of  extreme  storms.  Each  year,  natural  hazards  in  the 
United  States  such  as  earthquakes,  fires,  floods,  hurricanes,  landslides,  and  volca-
noes  result  in  hundreds  of  lives  lost  and  cost  billions  of  dollars  in  disaster  aid,  dis-
rupted  commerce  and  destroyed  public  and  private  properties.  At  USGS,  it  is  our 
goal  to  provide  scientific  research  and  analysis  to  help  citizens,  emergency  man-
agers,  and  policy  makers  decide  how  to  react  to  each  hazard  and  how  to  safeguard 
society.  By  collecting  long-term  data  and  information  assessing  past  and  present 
hazards events and by providing continuous monitoring and data collection, we hope 
to arrive at the place where we are able to predict these natural events and mitigate 
their  potential  impacts,  providing  precious  time  to  save  lives  and  property.  By  con-
ducting  research  on  coastal  change  that  occurs  during  extreme  storms,  and  by  im-
proving understanding of erosion and deposition that can destroy infrastructure and 
permanently change the coastal landscape, USGS will assist in efforts to reduce the 
impact these severe storms have on lives and communities. 

There  are  two  major  objectives  of  this  USGS  research  effort.  The  first  is  to  im-
prove  predictive  capabilities  so  that,  as  a  hurricane  approaches  the  United  States, 
assessments can be made of impacts to the threatened coastal setting prior to land-
fall.  The  second  major  objective  is  to  provide  the  information  and  knowledge  re-
quired to assess the changing vulnerability of our coastline to hurricanes for longer-
term hazard planning and mitigation so that new buildings and infrastructure, par-
ticularly those being rebuilt following a storm disaster, can be sited away from haz-
ardous  areas.  The  2004  Atlantic  hurricane  season  was  one  of  the  busiest  and  most 
destructive  in  history.  For  example,  Hurricane  Ivan  caused  severe  beach  and  dune 
erosion  that  undermined  five-story  oceanfront  condominium  towers,  some  of  the 
largest  buildings  to  fail  during  a  hurricane  in  United  States  history.  Today,  after 
giving an overview of the USGS research program on severe storms, I will focus on 
lessons learned from the coastal change impacts observed last year. 
Research Program on Extreme Storms 

As part of USGS National Assessment of Coastal Change Hazards, impacts of ex-
treme  storms  have  been  intensively  investigated  since  the  1997–98  El  Nino  when 
severe winter extratropical storms ravaged much of the U.S. west coast, causing ex-
tensive erosion of beaches and sea cliffs and resulting in loss of property. The USGS 
worked  cooperatively  with  National  Aeronautic  and  Space  Administration  (NASA) 
and  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  to  acquire  airborne 
lidar  surveys  of  the  coast  both  before  and  after  the  El  Nino.  These  data  were  used 
to  test  models  of  the  interaction  between  storms  and  coasts.  Since  the  1997–98  El 
Nino, USGS has continued to work with NASA, focusing primarily on hurricane im-
pacts  in  the  southeast  U.S.,  again  using  airborne  lidar  to  survey  the  coast  before 
and after storm impact. Airborne lidar survey systems utilize the Global Positioning 
System  (GPS)  and  a  laser  mounted  in  an  aircraft  to  measure  ground  topography. 
If the water is clear enough, some lidar systems can penetrate the ocean and meas-
ure  shallow  seafloor  bathymetry.  The  before-  and  after-storm  surveys  gathered  as 
part of USGS research are compared to detect changes in the elevation and configu-
ration  of  the  ground,  changes  that  occur  during  a  storm  due  to  erosion  and  deposi-
tion. 

These data are used to test and validate predictive models that can forecast coast-
al  change  prior  to  hurricane  landfall.  The  data  are  also  used  to  develop  a  quan-
titative  means  to  assess  the  vulnerability  of  U.S.  coasts  to  future  extreme  storms. 
Currently, USGS is developing the means to assess: 

The location of potential breaches that sever barrier islands and evacuation routes 
during  hurricanes.  Most  of  the  East  and  Gulf  of  Mexico  mainland  coasts  of  the 
United  States  are  protected  from  the  open  ocean  by  a  nearly  continuous  string  of 
barrier  islands.  These  long,  thin  strips  of  sand  are,  in  places,  low-lying  (less  than 
9  feet  in  elevation)  and  subject  to  being  inundated  and  cut  during  extreme  storms. 
In  fact,  most  of  the  present  inlets  through  barrier  islands  in  the  southeast  United 
States,  which  allow  boats  and  ships  to  transit  between  ocean  and  mainland  ports, 
were  cut  naturally  during  hurricanes.  Most  recently,  breaches  severed  barrier  is-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

22

lands  during  Hurricane  Isabel  on  the  North  Carolina  coast  in  2003,  on  the  south-
west coast of Florida during Hurricane Charley in 2004, and during Hurricane Ivan 
on  the  Alabama  and  Florida  panhandle  coasts  in  2004.  Results  of  USGS  research 
indicate  that  these  catastrophic  island  breaching  events  occur  where  storm  proc-
esses intersect with low-lying topography. USGS research also suggests that the un-
derlying  geology  may  contribute  to  the  vulnerability  of  barrier  islands  to  inlet  for-
mation. 

Extreme beach and dune erosion that lowers the elevation of barrier islands, mak-
ing  the  islands,  and  the  back  bays  they  shelter,  more  suceptible  to  inundation  by 
storm surge. During extreme storms, wind can push water against the coast, raising 
sea level in a storm surge. This allows waves to attack beaches and dunes that are 
normally  beyond  their  reach.  During  Hurricane  Ivan,  Santa  Rosa  Island,  offshore 
of  Pensacola,  Florida,  was  reduced  in  elevation  an  average  of  approximately  3  feet; 
however,  in  places,  the  reduction  was  as  much  as  eight  feet  where  new  breaches 
opened. This reduction in elevation allows more water to be driven across the island 
during a severe storm, raising the storm surge in the back bays higher than would 
have  been  possible  had  the  dunes  remained  intact.  Thus,  up-to-date  and  accurate 
information of coastal elevation, and understanding of the coastal response to storm 
processes, is critical to providing accurate forecasts of hurricane impacts. 

The  2004  Hurricanes:  Charley,  Frances,  Ivan  and  Jeanne.  In  a  cooperative  effort 
between  USGS,  NASA,  and  U.S.  Army  Corps  of  Engineers,  the  impact  zones  of  the 
four  Atlantic  hurricanes  that  made  landfall  in  the  United  States  in  2004  were  sur-
veyed  with  airborne  lidar  and  photography  both  before  and  after  landfall  of  each 
storm. Initial results for each hurricane can be found on the USGS World Wide Web 
site  http://coastal.er.usgs.gov/hurricanes.  Pre-storm  surveys  were  combined  with 
models of storm processes and coastal response to assess vulnerability of the threat-
ened  coast  prior  to  landfall.  After  landfall,  pre-  and  post-storm  surveys  were  com-
pared  to  quantify  change  and  showed  that  coastal  response  was  unique  for  each 
storm, depending on characteristics of both the storm and the shoreline setting im-
pacted. 

For example, the swath of hurricane-force winds associated with Hurricane Char-
ley  was  narrow.  Major  coastal-change  impacts  were  limited  to  several  tens  of  miles 
of  shoreline  near  landfall,  where  a  breach,  1,500  feet  wide,  opened  through  North 
Captiva Island, Florida. In contrast, Hurricane Frances was a larger, weaker storm 
that caused moderate coastal erosion extending for nearly 100 miles along the Flor-
ida south-central east coast. However, Hurricane Frances’ greatest legacy may have 
been  in  making  the  coastline  more  vulnerable  to  erosion  from  Hurricane  Jeanne, 
which  followed  the  same  storm  track  several  weeks  later.  Surviving  structures  left 
exposed  on  the  brink  of  eroded  dunes  following  Hurricane  Frances  in  Vero  Beach 
and Floraton, Florida, were later destroyed during Hurricane Jeanne. 

The  most  extensive  coastal  change  observed  during  the  2004  Atlantic  hurricane 
season  occurred  during  Hurricane  Ivan  on  the  Alabama  and  Florida  Panhandle 
coasts. On average, the shoreline retreated 40 feet during the storm. In Gulf Shores, 
Alabama,  where  the  storm’s  strongest  winds  made  landfall,  the  relatively  low-lying 
barrier  islands  were  completely  inundated  by  storm  surge.  The  sea-level  difference 
between  the  Gulf  of  Mexico  and  back  bays  drove  a  strong  landward  current  that 
transported  sand  across  the  island  and  opened  a  new  inlet.  In  contrast,  several 
miles to the east in Orange Beach, Alabama, where land elevations were higher, the 
response was dune erosion. In places, the vertical scour associated with dune retreat 
approached nine feet and undermined structures including several five-story condo-
minium towers that had been built on top of the dunes. These are some of the larg-
est buildings to be destroyed by hurricane impact in United States history. 
Assessments of Storm Impacts Prior to Hurricane Landfall 

Forty-eight  hours  prior  to  Hurricane  Ivan’s  landfall,  the  USGS  posted  on  its  ex-
treme-storm  website  an  experimental  product  that  showed  the  vulnerability  of  the 
threatened  coast  to  change.  This  assessment  was  based  on  the  difference  between 
worst-case storm-surge elevations, calculated by NOAA using computer models, and 
high-resolution  coastal  elevations,  measured  with  airborne  laser  mapping.  For  each 
location  along  the  coast,  the  posted  maps  showed  where  Ivan’s  worst-case  storm 
surge would exceed coastal elevations and submerge barrier islands as if they were 
shoals. At these locations, water level differences would drive strong currents across 
the islands, changing their form and undermining buildings and infrastructure. The 
coastal change during Hurricane Ivan measured with airborne lidar was later found 
to  be  consistent  with  USGS  assessments  of  coastal  vulnerability  made  prior  to  the 
storm’s landfall. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

The Future 

23

The unusual failures of large, oceanfront buildings during Hurricane Ivan may be 
because southeast U.S. coastal communities have not been severely tested by hurri-
cane-induced erosion until recently. Between 1966 and 1990, when southeast coastal 
developments  grew  dense,  only  two  major  hurricanes  made  landfall  along  the  east 
coast or the peninsula of Florida—most developments survived unscathed. However, 
recent research on decadal scale changes in hurricane activity suggests that the At-
lantic  Basin  has  re-entered  an  active  hurricane  period  similar  to  that  of  the  period 
1941–1965  when  seventeen  major  hurricanes  made  U.S.  landfall.  It  is  likely  that 
this  active  period  will  persist  for  decades.  Hence,  the  loss  of  multi-story  buildings 
during  Hurricane  Ivan  may  be  a  warning  of  what  is  to  come  along  our  hurricane 
threatened coasts. 

The  USGS,  working  with  our  partners,  will  continue  to  develop  extreme  storm 
vulnerability  assessment  methodologies  and  provide  these  assessments  of  coastal 
change to user agencies. Several weeks ago when Tropical Storm Arlene threatened 
the  Alabama  and  Florida  panhandle  coasts—the  same  area  where  Hurricane  Ivan 
made  landfall  nine  months  before—USGS  provided  NOAA  storm  surge  modelers 
with  assessments  of  dune  erosion  within  the  forecast  impact  zone.  The  modelers 
were  concerned  that  barrier  island  elevations  had  been  lowered  during  Hurricane 
Ivan,  which  would  allow  more  water  to  be  driven  across  the  islands,  resulting  in 
higher  surge  in  estuaries  than  their  models  would  account  for.  The  USGS  provided 
dune  erosion  data  and  assessments  that  were  incorporated  into  NOAA  storm-surge 
models  and  were  used  to  help  forecast  potential  flooding  from  Tropical  Storm  Ar-
lene. 

Ongoing  data  collection  efforts,  combined  with  existing  models,  provide  the  basis 
for  a  collaborative  effort  with  other  Federal  partners,  such  as  National  Weather 
Service (NWS), to assess the likely impacts of coastal storms. Both pre-storm assess-
ments  of  dune  and  beach  erosion  and  post-storm  damage  assessments,  provided  in 
a  timely  manner,  support  the  efforts  of  Federal  and  local  emergency  planners  and 
responders.  These  activities  are  also  an  integral  part  of  persistent  research  efforts 
to  better  understand  and  assess  the  vulnerability  of  U.S.  shorelines  to  coastal 
change impacts from extreme storms. Integration of scientific information and coast-
al  change  models  developed  by  USGS  with  the  meteorological  models  of  impending 
storm  processes  from  NWS  will  support  more  timely  and  accurate  forecasts  of  the 
location and type of coastal response to severe storm events. 
Inland Flooding From Excessive Rainfall 

As population and development continue to increase in coastal areas, more people 
and  property  are  vulnerable  to  hurricane  threat.  However,  coastal  residents  and 
visitors  are  not  the  only  ones  vulnerable  to  the  ravages  of  hurricanes  and  extreme 
storms.  Hurricane  winds  and  waves  impacting  the  coastal  zone  are  often  accom-
panied  by  extreme  rainfall  that  can  contribute  to  local  and  regional  flooding  of 
coastal and inland areas. Flooding is the most frequent natural disaster. During the 
20th  century,  floods  arising  from  extreme  storms,  both  tropical  and  extra-tropical, 
were  the  worst  natural  disaster  in  the  United  States  in  terms  of  number  of  lives 
lost  and  property  damaged.  Flooding  from  extreme  storms  can  occur  at  any  time  of 
the  year,  in  any  part  of  the  country,  and  at  any  time  of  the  day.  Property  damage, 
including  inundation  by  sediment-laden  water,  demolished  buildings,  and  erosion 
that  undermines  bridge  foundations  and  footings  leading  to  the  collapse  of  struc-
tures, results in approximately $5 billion in losses per year. 

Hurricanes  and  tropical  storms  can  be  especially  dangerous  and  destructive  as 
they  move  inland  from  coastal  areas.  For  example,  floods  from  remnants  of  Hurri-
cane  Camille  in  1969  killed  hundreds  of  people  throughout  Appalachia.  In  1999, 
eastern North Carolina endured record rainfall and two months of continuous flood-
ing from Hurricanes Dennis, Floyd, and Irene. Notable, the 2004 Atlantic hurricane 
season was the most costly on record—$42 billion. Widespread rainfall amounts over 
6  inches  caused  extensive  flooding.  In  Florida,  USGS  field  crews  obtained  some  of 
the highest flow measurements ever recorded. This flooding was compounded by the 
remnants of Hurricane Ivan less than 2 weeks later. 

The  USGS,  in  cooperation  with  NWS  River  Forecast  Centers  and  others,  is  mak-
ing significant progress in development of new tools and techniques to address flood 
risk.  The  following  are  examples  of  USGS  research  and  modeling  activities  relative 
to inland flooding:

• Prioritizing  Streamgaging  Network  investments  and  Improved  Streamflow  In-
formation  Delivery.  The  USGS  managed  streamgage  network  includes  3,200 
gages that support NWS streamflow forecasts and flood predictions to calibrate 
their  streamflow  forecast  models  and  make  flood  predictions.  The  USGS  is 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

24

working  to  improve  delivery  of  streamgage  information  to  meet  this  and  other 
national  needs  for  streamflow  information.  As  part  of  that  effort,  USGS  is  in-
stalling new high data rate transmitters to improve real-time data access, flood-
hardening  streamgages  critical  to  the  National  Weather  Service  for  flood  pre-
dictions, and building a robust data storage and processing system to ensure re-
liable  and  timely  streamflow  information  delivery  to  users  of  the  information.
• Development of a real-time flood inundation mapping capability using forecasts 
from the NWS River Forecast Centers. Emergency managers need to know what 
is  (or  shortly  will  be)  under  water  when  a  flood  is  occurring.  Inundation  maps 
help emergency managers plan evacuation routes, deploy critical resources, un-
derstand the magnitude of events, and, in general, respond quickly to save lives 
and property. In creating real-time inundation maps, forecast flood hydrographs 
are  routed  through  lidar-derived  elevation  models  of  reaches  of  a  river  with 
multi-dimensional flow models that allow predictions of the timing, depth, veloc-
ity, and impact of flood waters for any location in the mapped floodplain. These 
inundation  forecast  maps  can  be  posted  on  the  worldwide  web  hours  to  days 
prior  to  the  arrival  of  the  flood.  Near-real-time  simulation  and  internet-based 
delivery  of  forecast-flood  inundation  maps  using  two-dimensional  hydraulic 
modeling  has  been  developed  through  a  pilot  study  of  the  Snoqualmie  River, 
Washington (see USGS Water-Resources Investigations Report 02–4251, 36p.)

• Development  of  a  map-based  Web  application, 

‘‘StreamStats,’’  to  obtain 
streamflow  and  flood  statistics.  ‘‘StreamStats’’  provides  streamflow  information 
for all locations in the Nation, and specifically for ungaged sites, by using statis-
tical models and established hydrological relationships. This application results 
in  major  cost  savings  by  reducing  the  time  needed  to  obtain  streamflow  esti-
mates  for  a  site  from  an  average  of  about  a  day  to  only  a  few  minutes. 
‘‘StreamStats’’  is  currently  available  for  6  states.  By  the  end  of  Fiscal  Year 
2005, information from 12 states will be included in ‘‘StreamStats.’’
• Development  of  new  technologies  to  measure  flood  water  levels  that  heretofore 
were  too  dangerous  or  practically  impossible  to  measure.  Accurate  determina-
tion  of  the  magnitude  of  floods  is  essential  for  establishment  of  flood-frequency 
relationships,  required  for  long-term  hazard  assessment  and  design  of  critical 
infrastructure.  These  technologies  include  hydroacoustic  current  profilers  and 
totally  non-contact  methods  to  measure  river  discharge  from  the  ground  or  the 
air (see http://or.water.usgs.gov/hydro21/index.shtml). These technologies keep 
personnel  out  of  high  flowing  streams  and  increase  the  margin  of  safety  when 
taking streamflow measurements in hazardous conditions.

USGS  will  continue  to  work  with  partners  at  the  Federal,  State,  and  local  level 
to  assist  in  efforts  to  reduce  the  impact  that  severe  storms  have  on  lives  and  com-
munities.  Natural  hazards,  such  as  hurricanes  and  inland  flooding,  will  always  be 
with  us  and  may  be  difficult  to  predict.  With  USGS  science,  however,  we  are  striv-
ing  to  prevent  these  natural  hazards  from  becoming  natural  disasters.  Our  efforts 
in hazards monitoring and long-term data and information collection from past and 
present  hazard  events  is  not  simply  a  scientific  research  endeavor—it  is  a  matter 
of public safety. 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today.  I  am 
happy  to  answer  any  questions  that  you  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee  may 
have.

Senator DEMINT. Thank you, panel, I would just ask a couple of 

quick questions and then turn to the Ranking Member. 

Mr.  Mayfield,  on  the  Hurricane  Center  you’ve  done  some  amaz-
ing  things,  I  know  you’re  working  hard  to  improve  forecasts  and 
get more products out to the public. My concern is that even if the 
Center  could  produce  perfect  forecasts  10  days  out,  it  still  might 
not  make  a  difference  for  some  people.  What  I’m  saying  is  that  at 
the  end  of  the  day,  some  of  this  comes  down  to  personal  responsi-
bility to make sure you have a disaster plan, you don’t make foolish 
decisions  like  trying  to  cross  a  flooded  bridge.  You  work  on  these 
issues  day  to  day—can  you  comment  on  what  you  believe  families 
need to do to be protected? 

Mr. MAYFIELD. Absolutely, Mr. Chairman, and you really hit the 
nail  on  the  head  here.  I  learned  a  long  time  ago  that  it  really 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

25

doesn’t matter if you even make a perfect forecast, if you don’t get 
people to respond, it’s all for nothing. As you have accurately stat-
ed  here,  it  really  comes  down  to  that  individual  taking  that  per-
sonal responsibility to develop their own hurricane plan, and make 
no  mistake  about  it—the  battle  against  the  hurricane  is  won  out-
side the hurricane season—you can’t afford to wait for a hurricane 
to  be  knocking  at  your  door  before  you  develop  that  plan.  People 
need  to  know  in  advance,  and  I  know  very  well  now  that  the  Na-
tional Hurricane Center can’t do this alone. 

I  think  one  good  example  of  how  we  are  addressing  this—there 
is  a  public/private  partnership  called  the  National  Hurricane  Sur-
vival  Initiative.  We  have  gotten  together  with  the  National  Emer-
gency  Management  Association,  the  Florida  Division  of  Emergency 
Management,  the  Salvation  Army  and  some  private  sector  folks, 
and  you’ll  be  seeing,  this  coming  hurricane  season,  several  public 
service  announcements  on  television  stations  up  and  down  the 
coastline—they  also  did  a  survey,  a  Mason-Dixon  poll  that  was  re-
leased  in  May,  and  I  guess  the  really  disturbing  thing  to  me  in 
spite of all of this outreach and all of this education we’ve done for 
so  long,  this  poll  from  Texas  to  Maine  told  us  that  47  percent  of 
people  did  not  have  a  hurricane  plan,  and  that  is  not  acceptable. 
Now, they just released a new poll in Florida alone, in fact, I just 
got  the  results  last  Friday,  and  all  but  18  percent  of  the  people  in 
Florida  have  a  hurricane  plan—that  is  understandable  after  the 
season  we  had  last  year—but  you  don’t  want  to  wait  for  a  hurri-
cane to come and cause all of this damage before you get prepared. 
In fact, there’s some very simple things to do, in fact, we have some 
excellent ideas on our website. The number one thing to do is when 
anybody  develops  a  hurricane  plan,  is  to  determine  if  you’re  in  a 
hurricane storm surge evacuation zone or not, if you are, you need 
to know exactly where you’re going to go to seek safe shelter, even 
if  you’re  out  of  that  storm  surge  evacuation  zone,  you  still  need  to 
have  the  hurricane  plan,  the  storm  shutters,  the  drinking  water, 
the batteries, flashlights and batteries, the most important thing is 
to have that plan done now before the hurricane comes. 

Senator  DEMINT.  Is  that  information  on  your  website?  If  I  lived 
in  a  particular  area,  I  could  go  find  out  exactly  where  the  storm 
surge was, which bridge I should take on the way out? 

Mr.  MAYFIELD.  That  varies  with  the  state.  You  can  do  that  in 
some  states,  you  can  in  Florida,  I’m  not  sure  that  everybody  does 
that yet. 

Senator DEMINT. Who’s responsible for making sure that’s on the 

website? 

Mr.  MAYFIELD.  Well,  I  would  think  that  probably  the  local  com-
munity.  Of  all  the  studies  I’m  familiar  with,  they  are  very  con-
sistent  in  saying  that  people,  most  people,  respond  really  to  what 
local officials tell them to do. And so it is really important that peo-
ple  listen  and  heed  the  advice  of  the  local  officials.  And  so  my  vi-
sion  would  be  for  each  local  community  to  have  the  storm  surge 
zones depicted and most importantly, the shelters depicted. 

Senator  DEMINT.  If  someone  went  to  your  website,  they  couldn’t 

get information as to where to go to find out that information? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

26

Mr.  MAYFIELD.  Not  on  a  community-by-community  basis,  there 
are  so  many  communities  out  there  from  Texas  to  Maine,  plus  the 
Caribbean  that  that  would  be  a  little  overwhelming  for  us  to  do. 
Senator DEMINT. You can tell them they should have a hurricane 

plan, but they can’t get the specifics from you? 

Mr. MAYFIELD. But we do work very, very closely with all of the 
emergency management, we talked about training, and in fact, Mr. 
Chairman, we actually made a very conscious decision years ago—
I  really  think  that  if  I  had  time  to  sit  down  over  a  cup  of  coffee 
with  the  50  some-odd  million  people  living  in  coastal  communities 
and  talk  to  them  about  hurricanes  and  the  hazards  of  the  hurri-
canes  and  the  uncertainties  in  forecasting,  I’m  sure  I  could  con-
vince  people  to  develop  their  own  hurricane  plan—I  can’t  do  that, 
so  we  made  a  conscious  decision  to  work  with  these  emergency 
managers from the local communities. 

Senator  DEMINT.  Right  now,  as  far  as  you  know,  NOAA  doesn’t 
have  a  link  with  state  departments  of  transportation  about  evacu-
ation routes so people have to figure out separately to go to another 
site. 

Mr.  MAYFIELD.  That  is  correct,  Mr.  Chairman,  we  don’t  do  that 
for  the  entire  coastline,  I  would  guess  that  most  communities  do 
have something like that on a local website. 

Senator DEMINT. Thank you, Mr. Mayfield, just a quick question 
for Mr. McCarthy, and then I’ll turn to my Ranking Member here. 
You  mentioned  that  the  phased  array  radar  is  the  next  genera-
tion,  it  could  add  as  much  as  4  minutes  to  lead  time—could  you 
give  us  some  idea  how  much  this  costs  as  compared  to  Doppler? 
And do you think there is a cost-benefit relationship? 

Mr. MCCARTHY. Well, the big benefit would be in the ongoing op-
eration and maintenance, exactly what it costs to deploy. It is a lit-
tle down the road yet, and there is a group that is actually explor-
ing  what  the  cost  would  be,  because  you  know  how  technology  is, 
things  generally,  the  price  kind  of  comes  down.  This  is  a  system 
that  we’re  actually  integrating  from  the  Navy,  it  is  a  system  that 
the  Navy  has  been  using  for  some  time,  and  so  the  first  system 
that we have for testing and development that is in Norman, Okla-
homa,  actually  came  from  the  Navy,  so  now  the  National  Severe 
Storms  Lab  in  Norman,  Oklahoma  is  using  that  system  to  adapt 
it to weather applications, especially storm detection, so as they fig-
ure out what it will take to develop a network of those for weather 
applications, and as the group who is looking into what it will take 
to actually do that, they can develop the unit cost, which isn’t quite 
there yet, I’m fairly certain that later this year we can get that in-
formation to you. 

Senator DEMINT. Very interesting, thank you. 
Senator Nelson? 
Senator BEN NELSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr.  McCarthy,  the  testimony  that  was  submitted  to  the  Com-
mittee suggests that the area of responsibility assigned to any par-
ticular  service  office  may  be  quite  large,  and  expectations  may  be 
greater  than  the  reality  of  being  able  to  serve,  and  in  your  own 
written testimony, you suggested that issuing tornado warnings by 
county itself may be too broad. What effort is the Weather Service 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

27

making  to  try  and  correct  these  two  areas  that  need  to  be  dealt 
with? 

Mr.  MCCARTHY.  Well,  actually  sir,  our  areas  of  responsibility  as 
we’ve  referred  to  it,  like  the  Valley  office  that  you  visited,  we  did, 
when we did our modernization and restructuring in the 1990s, we 
looked at the area of responsibility and feel pretty comfortable that 
those  areas  work  out  pretty  well  with  the  radar  coverage  that  we 
have. A lot of offices have their own radar, and then they have ac-
cess to their neighbor’s radars now through the work stations that 
we  use.  And  it’s  a  pretty  good,  pretty  well-oiled  operation.  What 
we’re talking about with the counties, and this gets a little bit into 
the  false  alarm  rate  issue,  currently  in  some  areas,  you  know  in 
Nebraska  you  have  some—well,  we  all  have  interestingly  shaped 
counties that have to do with rivers and things like that for bound-
aries—some of the counties geographically are a little bit large, we 
have  issued,  ordinarily  we  issue  county-based  warnings,  and 
there’s  reasons  for  that,  partly  because  of  the  emergency  manage-
ment network that is out there, and partly because when we issue 
a  warning,  we  use  the  codes  that  are  assigned  for  each  county  for 
automated  distribution,  it  is  called  a  FIPS  code,  which  I  think  is 
Federal  Information  Processing  System,  but  what  we’re  trying  to 
do  now  with  GIS  technology,  is  we’re  trying  to  narrow  the  area 
that  we  warn  for,  we  have  a  good  idea  from  our  radars,  obviously, 
where  the  storm  is  and  where  it’s  going.  And  actually,  when  we 
outline the warned area, we actually do it on our computer screen, 
and  we  outline  this  area  and  when  we  do  that,  the  computer  can 
take  over  and  assign  latitude  and  longitude  points.  Lots  of  people 
can use that polygon, as we call it, to actually transmit that as the 
warned area. 

We have private sector partners now that are actually using that 
polygon area, so we can limit the geographic area that the warning 
is  issued  for,  and  we  have  a  really  great  experiment  going  on  out 
in  parts  of  the  Midwest,  parts  of  Tornado  Alley,  along  those  lines 
this severe weather season, and its been very successful. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Well,  certainly  to  the  extent  you  can  get 
them  more  narrowly  focused  for  warning,  the  better  the  warning 
is  going  to  be,  and  more  people  will  be  well-served  by  fewer  false 
alarms and more credibility. 

Now  I  want  to  ask  you  a  couple  of  issues  on  the  budget—there 
was a bunch of downsizing that occurred in the 1990s, many of the 
Weather Service offices, and now the House recently proposed a cut 
of  7.6  percent  in  your  budget,  which  would  come  on  top  of  the  $37 
million  cut  that  the  MWS  received  between  Fiscal  Year  2004  and 
2005.  If  enacted,  how  would  these  cuts—if  you  project  them 
through your operation—how would they affect your ability to con-
tinue  to  do  what  you’re  doing,  as  well  as  what  you  would  like  to 
do? 

Mr. MCCARTHY. Well, you know, sir——
Senator BEN NELSON. I’m sure the answer is, it’s not going to im-
prove, but maybe you can give us some idea of what kind of cutting 
or what kind of reductions you may be faced with. 

Mr.  MCCARTHY.  Actually,  when  we  did  our  modernization  back 
in  the  1990s,  the  offices  that  we  phased  out,  there  was  actually  a 
pretty  strong  scientific  and  technology  reason.  We  had  as  many 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

28

field  offices  as  we  had  in  the  past  because  we  were  kind  of  tied  to 
manual  observations.  Our  systems  that  were  used  for  observing 
certainly weren’t what they are today, so we are able to do a better 
job  with  modern  technology,  such  as  the  NEXRAD  radar,  and  as 
was  mentioned  in  opening  statements  about  how  long  it  took  to 
generate a tornado warning back in those days, in the teletype era, 
before we moved into computer technology——

Senator BEN NELSON. Are you going to be able to tell me the in-
creasing  technology  in  the  next  several  weeks,  or  months  or  years 
will  help  you  overcome  a  7.6  percent  reduction,  as  well  as  the 
other?  If  you’re  able  to  tell  me  that,  I’m  not  looking  to  put  money 
where we don’t need to. 

Mr.  MCCARTHY.  Well,  we  certainly,  basically,  sir,  we  do  the  best 
we  can  with  the  budget  that  we’re  given,  and  we  feel  we  do  very 
well with that. Sometimes we have to defer some things, and some-
times  there  are  things  we  would  like  to  do  that  we  maybe  have  to 
do next year or the year after, but what we do focus on more than 
anything  is  tornado  warnings,  the  impacts  from  hazardous  events, 
we will always do that, that is our highest priority. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Well,  living  in  Tornado  Alley,  I  want  you 
to  be  as  accurate  as  you  can  possibly  be,  with  the  greatest  tech-
nology  that’s  available,  and  I  want  to  make  sure  that  those  cuts 
don’t impair your ability to do that, because I spend a fair amount 
of time out there, and if I didn’t care about my constituents, I cer-
tainly  care  about  my  family  and  myself,  and  so  I  hope  that  you’re 
able to continue the progress that you’ve made in spite of cuts, and 
not be impaired because of it. 

Mr.  MCCARTHY.  Well,  I  can  tell  you  for  certain  that  every  Na-
tional  Weather  Service  forecaster,  as  I  told  people  in  a  community 
where  we  did  close  an  office  during  the  modernization,  that  I  put 
the same effort into their community that I put into the community 
where I live. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Well,  that’s  fair  enough.  Thank  you,  Mr. 

Chairman, thank you, Mr. McCarthy. 

Senator DEMINT. Thank you, Senator. 
Senator Vitter? 
Senator VITTER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr.  Mayfield,  your  written  testimony  refers  to  the  inability  to 
provide  enough  time  to  evacuate  New  Orleans  and  Key  West,  spe-
cifically,  from  a  hurricane.  Could  you  tell  us  why.  What  is  unique 
in  those  two  cities,  those  two  geographic  areas,  such  that  there  is 
that relatively unique inability to fully evacuate? 

Mr. MAYFIELD. Senator Vitter, those are two of the areas that we 
have  the  most  concern  with  anywhere  in  the  Gulf  of  Mexico,  in 
fact, the number one area of greatest concern for the Gulf is South-
east Louisiana, the Florida Keys is a very close second there. They 
are  so  vulnerable,  the  areas,  I  think  that  the  greatest  loss  of  life 
will  occur  in  one  of  those  areas  due  to  the  storm  surge  flooding  as 
you’ve  described  in  your  graphics  behind  you  here.  It’s  really  dif-
ficult to get people to understand the power of the storm surge, and 
the  cubic  yard  of  water  weighs  about  1,700  pounds,  it’s  nearly  in-
compressible,  on  top  of  the  storm  surge,  you  have  the  very  dan-
gerous  waves.  I  like  to  tell  people  that  it  doesn’t  matter  how  well 
built your house is, if you’re in the low-lying area, I mean, to make 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

29

it  real  simple,  if  you’re  six  feet  tall  and  have  ten  or  twenty  feet  of 
storm  surge,  you  have  a  problem.  I  like  to  say  you  need  to  make 
friends in high places. 

One  of  the  problems  is  that  in  Southeast  Louisiana  and  in  the 
Florida Keys, there are no high places. The city of New Orleans is 
below sea level, for the most part. It’s a real concern to give people 
enough time to evacuate to higher terrain, which is what they have 
to do, or they will drown from the storm surge. 

Senator VITTER. So, is the biggest factor the terrain? What about 

infrastructure in terms of getting out? 

Mr. MAYFIELD. It is not just about the forecasting, it’s about the 
land  use,  and  the  building  codes  and  the  education,  just  having  so 
many  people  that  you  have  to  evacuate  out  to  higher  ground.  I’ve 
flown  all  around  the  Louisiana  Coast  and  around  Lake  Pont-
chartrain  with  emergency  managers  as  recently  as  about  a  year 
and  a  half  ago,  and  I’ve  seen  the  vulnerabilities,  and  they  were 
pointing  out  to  me  islands  that  they  used  to  go  and  picnic  on  that 
are  now  under  water,  and  you  have  a  very  unique  problem  there 
in  Southeastern  Louisiana  with  the  subsidence,  it  needs  some  at-
tention,  and  again,  it  is  not  all  about  the  meteorology  there,  we 
need to make sure people have a plan and I know people are work-
ing very hard on that. The emergency managers are doing the best 
they can, and it still comes down to that individual taking that per-
sonal responsibility, and making sure that they do the right thing, 
and in addition, a unique problem there in Southeastern Louisiana 
you have, I believe the last numbers I heard, 125,000 people with-
out  transportation  in  the  New  Orleans  area.  So,  the  emergency 
manager  would  be  the  best  to  answer  that  question,  but  I  know 
they do have plans to bus them out and use other means of trans-
portation to get them out of harms’ way. 

Senator VITTER. In light of all of that, what should planners and 
others in that area do, first and foremost to improve the evacuation 
picture;  and  specifically,  how  significant  and  useful  a  role  do  you 
think  vertical  evacuation  into  taller  buildings,  which  is  the  only 
high  ground  we  have,  man-made  high  ground,  how  useful  or  sig-
nificant could that be? 

Mr. MAYFIELD. Everywhere I go I ask emergency managers what 
they’re  going  to  do  with  these  high-rises,  and  you  can  go  almost 
anywhere now, and see the development of the coastline, and when 
I ask them are they going to evacuate people from the many coast-
al areas, people living in these high rises, they always tell me yes, 
because they know in a major hurricane, they will know the power 
will  be  out,  they  will  know  the  water  systems  will  be  inoperable, 
they  don’t  want—there  is  no  way  they  can  take  care  of  all  these 
tens  of  thousands  of  people  stuck  in  these  high  rises.  I  think  that 
it would be, well it would be fairer to critique me here and say that 
this  is  not  my  area  of  expertise,  I  should  stick  to  meteorology,  but 
the truth is you have to care about these things, and in my opinion, 
and this is my personal opinion, there are some areas, like the New 
Orleans area, where the vertical—we like to call it vertical refuge—
if  you  can’t  get  people  evacuated  out,  I  don’t  believe  you’re  going 
to have any other option other than to consider vertical evacuation, 
vertical refuge of last resort. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

Senator  VITTER.  Let  me  switch  gears  for  just  a  minute,  but  it  is 

30

in terms of your work at NOAA. 

One  of  your  NOAA  colleagues,  Chris  Lansy,  had  a  difference  of 
opinion  with  participants  on  the  inter-governmental  panel  on  cli-
mate  change,  which  resulted  in  Chris  Lansy  resigning  from  the 
panel. The dispute apparently involved allegations that recent hur-
ricanes  were  somehow  attributable  to  climate  change.  Can  you 
speak to that point? 

Mr. MAYFIELD. I will do my best on that, I can’t speak for Chris, 
but  I  know  he  is  a  first-class  scientist,  and  my  understanding  of 
the  issue  there—and  I  totally  agree  with  him—that  the  natural 
variability is far more important than the climate change that may 
or may not be going on related to hurricanes. The studies that I’m 
aware  of  on  the  climate  change  and  the  hurricane  correlations,  we 
don’t really think the areas will change where the hurricanes form, 
we  don’t  think  that  the  numbers  will  change.  There  is  one  study 
from  the  Geo-physical  Fluid  Dynamics  Lab  in  NOAA  that  says 
there could be an increase in intensity and rainfall by about 5 per-
cent  in  about  80  years.  The  natural  variability  is  so  much  larger 
than that in the active periods that we’re in now, we average three 
and a half major hurricanes per year, those are the category three, 
four and five hurricanes on our Saffir-Simpson Scale, and the inac-
tive periods, we only have one and a half major hurricanes, so you 
can go back for decades and see this natural variability. 

I think that what we’re doing now will serve us very well in im-
proving the intensity of forecasting through numerical weather pre-
diction, that will help us now and in the future. What really counts 
is where the hurricanes hit and how strong they are at landfall. 

Senator  VITTER.  So,  just  to  be  clear  on  what  happened,  and  I 
don’t  want  to  put  words  in  your  mouth,  but  he  resigned  from  the 
project because there was a push to make more of a causal connec-
tion than he was comfortable with. 

Mr.  MAYFIELD.  Senator,  that’s  my  understanding.  And  it  was 
over the issue of the natural variability versus the climate change. 
By  the  way,  there  is  no  increase  to  the  number  of  hurricanes  on 
a  global  basis  and  I  would  think  that  no  one  should  take  one  year 
and try to link that to climate change anyway. 

Senator VITTER. Thank you, thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator DEMINT. Well, I want to thank the panel, this has been 
very  helpful,  I  can  assure  you  we’re  going  to  take  all  the  informa-
tion  and  do  everything  we  can  to  assist  you  in  your  work.  I  will 
dismiss you and ask the second panel to take their seats so we can 
move along before the next vote. 

Good  afternoon,  I  want  to  thank  this  panel  for  being  patient,  I 
know  you’ve  had  to  wait  a  long  time,  and  I  think  we’re  getting 
ready to lose one of our Senators here, and I wanted to make sure 
that  Senator  Vitter  had  an  opportunity  to  introduce  Dr.  Mark 
Levitan. 

Senator  if  you  would  like  to  do  that,  then  I  will  handle  some  of 

the other introductions. 

Senator  VITTER.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  Mr. 
Chairman, Senator Nelson, I would like to introduce both of you to 
Mark  Levitan.  Not  only  is  Mark  the  Director  of  the  top  hurricane 
center  in  the  country,  but  he  has  an  extensive  background  on  the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

31

effect of storm winds, hurricane shelters, and evacuation and all of 
those  issues.  His  work  and  that  of  the  Center  have  been  a  great 
resource  for  my  office,  and  I’m  sure  his  testimony  today  will  be 
very  helpful  to  the  Subcommittee.  He  is  Director  of  the  Louisiana 
State University Hurricane Center. 
Mark, thank you for being here. 
Senator  DEMINT.  Thank  you,  Senator.  And  I  think  Senator  Nel-

son also has a guest he would like to introduce. 

Senator BEN NELSON. Well, thank you, Mr. Chairman, and we’re 
very  happy  to  have  Doug  Ahlberg  here  today  from  Lincoln,  Ne-
braska. He is the Director of the Lincoln-Lancaster County Depart-
ment  of  Emergency  Management,  he  was  previously  a  captain  of 
the  Lincoln  Police  Department,  retiring  after  36  years  in  law  en-
forcement,  and  became  Director  of  the  Lincoln-Lancaster  County 
Department  of  Emergency  Management  in  1999.  He  is  here  today 
to  share  his  expertise  as  someone  who  deals  with  severe  weather 
and  its  aftermath  on  the  local  level,  which  I  still  believe  will  add 
a  valuable  perspective  on  this  discussion  on  severe  weather  fore-
casting. 

He has had a fairly recent and very vivid experience with severe 
weather that he will be able to share with us, having witnessed the 
aftermath  of  that  tornado  myself,  I  can  attest  to  what  a  dev-
astating  tornado  that  was,  it  virtually  destroyed  an  entire  small 
town in Nebraska last summer. He made this disaster manageable 
because  of  his  hard  work,  organization  and  dedication  to  helping 
the  affected  communities  recover  as  quickly  as  possible.  Everyone 
in  Nebraska  appreciates  his  efforts  to  keep  our  citizens  safe.  I 
might  add  that  we  have  on  more  than  one  occasion  hunted  in 
Rushville County in Nebraska on the Don Forney ranch, and if Don 
is  watching  today  and  doesn’t  have  anything  else  to  do,  we  will 
both send him our regards. 

Good to have you here, I appreciate it. 
Senator  DEMINT.  Thank  you,  Senator,  we  also  have  Dr.  Tim 
Reinhold. Dr. Reinhold is Vice–President for Engineering at the In-
stitute  for  Business  and  Home  Safety,  and  is  appearing  on  behalf 
of the insurance industry. He is going to discuss the role the indus-
try  plays  in  reducing  businesses  and  homes  exposure  to  severe 
storms,  and  finally  appearing  before  the  Committee  is  Mr.  Bill 
Walsh. 

Mr.  Walsh’s  official  title  is  Director  of  Meteorology  and  Chief 
Meterologist for WCSC in Charleston. Really, he’s known as the go-
to  guy  in  the  Low  Country  when  there  is  a  severe  storm.  During 
his  19  years  as  a  broadcast  meteorologist  in  Charleston,  he  has 
seen  the  worst  that  Mother  Nature  has  to  offer,  and  the  best  that 
our  neighbors  have  to  give.  When  power  was  out  for  weeks  after 
Hugo, it was Bill Walsh who was getting the word out to our com-
munities  on  what  they  needed  to  do  to  recover.  I’m  confident  he  is 
going  to  provide  important,  helpful  testimony,  and  with  that,  we 
will begin with you, Mr. Walsh, and as we said before, these lights 
will give you an indication of when you’re running out of time, and 
I think it’s about 5 minutes. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

STATEMENT OF BILL WALSH, DIRECTOR OF METEOROLOGY/

CHIEF METEOROLOGIST, WCSC LIVE 5 NEWS 

32

Mr. WALSH. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, very much and Members 
of  the  Subcommittee  for  inviting  us  up  to  talk  here  today  about 
prevention  and  prediction,  particularly  when  it  comes  to  hurri-
canes, and in my view, the media—I’ve been a broadcast meteorolo-
gist  in  Charleston,  South  Carolina  for  19  years  this  summer,  and 
have guided our residents through many hurricanes, including one 
of the bellwethers, Hurricane Hugo in 1989, which we talked about 
with  the  22  feet  of  storm  surge  water,  in  McClellanville,  135  mile 
per  hour  winds.  Other  noted  storms  include  Hurricane  Floyd  in 
1999,  where  hundreds  of  thousands  were  caught  in  a  traffic  jam 
that  some  called  the  15  hour  drive  to  nowhere,  or  the  ‘‘Floyd  Fi-
asco.’’  And  then  there  was  last  year,  four  hurricanes,  three  majors 
struck Florida, billions of dollars in damage and mass evacuations, 
South  Carolina  was  also  affected  by  those  storms,  with  tornado 
damage  in  one  storm,  Charlie  actually  making  a  second  landfall 
just up the road from our television station. So the threat is there, 
and always will be. 

I  want  to  talk  today  about  three  things—lessons  learned  from 
past  storms  and  disasters,  getting  the  word  out,  and  the  partner-
ship  between  the  media  and  the  National  Weather  Service,  and 
recommendations  on  what  strategies  are  working  to  protect  our 
citizens from Mother Nature’s wrath. 

First,  lessons  learned.  We  spent  over  60  hours  covering  Hurri-
cane Hugo’s approach to South Carolina, but had no idea how long 
our  coverage  would  have  to  last  after  the  storm  with  no  power  for 
up  to  3  weeks  in  some  places,  television  and  radio  were  the  voices 
in  the  darkness.  All  of  the  stations  in  Charleston,  ours  included, 
dedicated 2 weeks plus of continuous coverage, commercial-free, for 
the  aftermath  of  this  giant,  giant  storm.  Our  simulcast  on  radio 
was  key  to  that  information  flow.  When  people  had  no  television, 
battery-powered  radio  was  how  people  got  their  news.  Radio  was 
and  is  our  partner  when  it  comes  to  this  kind  of  disaster,  because 
the size of our news department and the power of the radio station 
are  able,  and  were  able  at  that  time  to  bring  people  to  the  news 
they needed. 

We learned that storm coverage is critical as a storm approaches 
for  saving  lives,  but  it  is  just  as  vital  after  a  storm  strikes,  some-
times  for  weeks,  to  deliver  needed  information  to  the  public  from 
local,  state  and  national  officials.  Hurricane  Floyd  also  taught  us 
a lesson, not only to South Carolina, but everyone in the Southeast 
Coast  of  our  Nation.  Evacuations  are  complex,  and  they  take  good 
planning and logistics. That evacuation was a disaster in itself be-
cause  of  a  failed  plan  and  poor  execution,  people  in  our  state  sat 
on  our  highways  for  literally  10  to  15  hours  with  no  place  to  exit, 
no place to rest and were left with a bad taste in their mouths for 
the  failure.  From  that,  though  our  state  learned  and  listened.  Our 
new  Governor,  Mark  Sanford,  himself  a  coastal  resident,  brought 
together  a  team  of  people,  including  local  officials,  highway  patrol 
officials, DOT officials, along with members of the media, including 
myself, to create a plan that would get people safely away from the 
coast,  and  invest  in  preparation.  This  new  plan  includes  partner-
ships with local governments and the media, it includes video feeds 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

33

of our states’ most primary and secondary roads, car counters that 
measure  traffic  flow  are  also  active  and  will  be  available  on  the 
web for citizens to actually look at the busy spots. One of the most 
important  pieces  of  this  new  plan  is  the  lane  reversal  operation 
which was drilled and actually tested before hurricane season, and 
actually put into effect last year for Hurricane Charlie. Also, small 
things, sometimes it is the small things, but small things like keep-
ing  the  exits  open  for  people  to  take  rests  or  an  alternate  course, 
and pre-deployed road message signs for traffic updates, along with 
roadside port-a-potties for emergencies. 

Information  flow  to  the  people  is  key  to  making  all  of  this  work 
and  this  partnership,  which  it  is,  with  the  state’s  media  outlets 
gives officials a vehicle to get the word out. Floyd was a critical les-
son  learned,  but  from  it,  we  now  have  new  leadership  and  a  plan 
that has been proven to work, and it worked last year. As a mem-
ber  of  the  Air  Force  Reserve,  we  always  talk  about  readiness,  and 
this  crosses  over  to  storm  preparation  and  planning  at  all  levels—
national, state and local. Another lesson was in the slow FEMA re-
sponse to Hurricane Hugo back in 1989. From that, though, FEMA 
has  undergone  many  changes,  and  now  it  is  a  fast  responder  to 
people who may be left with nothing but their lives. 

Second,  getting  the  word  out  today,  I’m  very  happy  to  report  to 
you that there’s no better relationship, in my opinion, between the 
media,  and  the  fabulous  people  at  the  National  Weather  Service. 
The  partnership  between  our  voices  carries  to  the  citizen  a  word 
of  warning  when  severe  weather  and  hurricanes  are  going  to 
strike.  There’s  no  place  on  the  planet  that  has  a  better  warning 
system  for  people  to  prepare  and  get  ready  for  a  possible  disaster 
from  weather.  The  Weather  Service  Forecast  Offices,  the  National 
Hurricane Center and the Storm Prediction Center are vital to our 
national  effort  to  defend  against  these  killer  storms.  The  media  is 
also  vital  to  get  that  message  out  and  does  so  24  hours  a  day  and 
7  days  a  week.  We  in  the  media  spend  millions  of  dollars  every 
year on technology to protect our people and show them when dan-
ger  is  there.  That  technology  includes  computer  models,  Doppler 
radar  systems,  also  owned  by  local  media,  instant  crawl  text  sys-
tems,  and  so  on.  There’s  been  some  talk  lately  about  fines  levied 
by the FCC for stations that did not have closed captioning for the 
hearing  impaired  during  severe  weather  events.  It  must  be  noted, 
however, that stations make a huge effort and investment in equip-
ment  to  inform  the  public,  severe  weather  happens  in  an  instant 
and  television  response,  along  with  the  National  Weather  Service 
with the warnings and graphics to show where the danger is. We’re 
responsible  to  all  of  our  viewers,  including  the  hearing  impaired, 
and  it  should  be  recognized  that  while  closed  captioning  is  a  won-
derful  tool  we  all  use  every  single  day,  the  FCC  should  also  note 
that the full screen graphics and the maps, along with the crawling 
text at the bottom of the screen, is clearly another source for those 
viewers to read the information and see where the danger is, when 
a closed caption may be unavailable for technical or other logistical 
reasons. 

Finally,  strategies  that  work  are  rather  simple—good  planning, 
good  dedicated  people  at  all  levels  of  government  and  media,  as 
well  as  a  citizen  ready  to  act  when  the  word  is  given.  We  in  the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

34

media  are  responsible  for  getting  the  word  out,  our  partnership 
with the Weather Service and state officials is just that—a partner-
ship.  We  together  have  seen  what  works  and  what  doesn’t  work. 
We  in  television  forecast  the  weather  and  we  inform  the  people 
with  the  best  technology  to  back  us  up,  and  a  strong  partnership 
with  the  National  Weather  Service,  together  people  are  well-in-
formed, and lives are saved. 

Thank you so much, I’ll take questions as needed. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Walsh follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF BILL WALSH, DIRECTOR OF METEOROLOGY/CHIEF 

METEOROLOGIST, WCSC LIVE 5 NEWS 

First,  thank  you  very  much  for  inviting  me  to  come  up  and  talk  about  disaster 

prevention and prediction, in particular, when it comes to hurricanes. 

I’ve  been  a  broadcast  meteorologist  in  Charleston,  South  Carolina  for  19  years 
this summer and have guided our residents through many hurricanes including one 
of  the  bellwethers,  Hurricane  Hugo  in  1989  with  22  feet  of  storm  surge  water  and 
135  mph  winds.  Other  noted  storms  include  Hurricane  Floyd  in  1999  where  hun-
dreds  of  thousands  were  caught  in  a  traffic  jam  that  some  call  the  ‘‘Fifteen  Hour 
Drive To Nowhere . . . or The Floyd Fiasco.’’

Then  there  was  last  year.  Four  MAJOR  hurricanes  strike  Florida,  billions  of  dol-
lars  in  damage  and  mass  evacuations.  South  Carolina  was  also  affected  by  those 
storms  with  tornado  damage  and  one,  Charlie,  actually  making  a  second  landfall 
just up the road from our TV station. 

So,  the  threat  is  there  and  will  always  be.  I’m  going  to  talk  today  about  three 
things.  Lessons  learned  from  past  storms  and  disasters,  Getting  the  word  out  and 
the partnership between media and the national Weather Service, and recommenda-
tions  on  what  strategies  are  working  to  protect  our  citizens  from  mother  nature’s 
wrath. Lessons Learned: 

We  spent  over  60  hours  covering  Hurricane  Hugo’s  approach  to  South  Carolina, 
but  had  no  idea  how  long  our  coverage  would  have  to  last  after  the  storm.  With 
no power for up to three weeks in some places, television and radio were the voices 
in the darkness. 

All  the  stations  in  Charleston,  ours  included,  dedicated  two  weeks  of  continuous 

coverage to the aftermath of this giant storm. 

Our  simulcast  on  radio  was  the  key  to  that  information  flow.  When  people  had 
no television, battery powered radio was how people got their news. Radio was and 
is  our  partner  and  with  the  size  of  our  news  staff  and  power  of  the  radio  station, 
we were able to bring the people the news they needed. 

We  learned  that  storm  coverage  is  critical  as  a  storm  approaches  for  saving  lives 
and  that  it  is  just  as  vital  after  a  storm,  sometimes  for  weeks,  to  deliver  needed 
information for the public from local, state and national officials. 

Hurricane Floyd also taught a tough lesson to everyone along the Southeast coast 
of our state and Nation. Evacuations are complex and take good planning and good 
logistics. 

That  evacuation  was  a  disaster  in  itself  because  of  a  failed  plan  and  poor  execu-
tion.  People  in  our  state  sat  on  highways  for  literally  10  to  15  hours  with  no  way 
to exit, no place to rest and were left with a bad taste in their mouths for this fail-
ure. 

From that though, our state learned and listened. Our new Governor, Mark San-
ford,  himself  a  coastal  resident,  brought  together  a  team  of  people  including  high-
way  patrol  officials,  DOT  officials,  along  with  members  of  the  media  including  my-
self  to  create  a  plan  that  would  get  people  safely  away  from  the  coast  and  invest 
in preparation. 

This new plan includes partnerships with local governments and the media. It in-
cludes  video  feeds  of  our  state’s  most  primary  and  secondary  roads.  Car  counters 
that  measure  the  traffic  flows  are  also  active  and  will  be  available  on  the  web  for 
citizens to actually look at the busy spots. One of the most important pieces to this 
new  plan  is  the  lane  reversal  operation  which  was  drilled  and  tested  before  hurri-
cane season and actually put into effect last year for Hurricane Charlie. Also, small 
things  like  keeping  exits  open  for  people  to  take  rests  or  alter  their  course  and 
predeployed  road  message  signs  for  traffic  updates  along  with  port-a-potties  for 
emergencies. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

35

Information flow to the people is key to making all this work and the partnership 

with the state’s media outlets gives officials a vehicle to get the word out. 

FLOYD  was  a  critical  lesson  learned,  but  from  it  we  now  have  new  leadership 

and a plan that has been proven to work. 

As  a  member  of  the  Air  Force  Reserve,  we  always  talk  about  readiness  and  this 
crosses  over  into  storm  preparation  and  planning  at  all  levels;  national,  state  and 
local. 

Another  lesson  was  the  slow  FEMA  response  to  Hurricane  Hugo.  From  that, 
FEMA has undergone many changes, but now is a fast responder to people that may 
be left with nothing but their lives. 
Getting the Word Out 

Today I’m happy to report to you that there is no better relationship, in my opin-
ion,  between  the  media  and  the  fabulous  people  at  the  National  Weather  Service. 
The  partnership  between  our  voices  carries  to  the  citizen  the  word  of  warning 

when severe weather and hurricanes are going to strike. 

There  is  no  place  on  the  planet  that  has  a  better  warning  system  for  people  to 

prepare and get ready for a possible weather disaster. 

The  Weather  Service  forecast  offices,  National  Hurricane  Center  and  the  Storm 
Prediction  Center  are  vital  to  our  Nation’s  efforts  to  defend  against  killer  storms. 
The  media  is  vital  to  get  that  message  out  and  does  so,  24  hours  a  day.  We  in 
the  media  spend  millions  of  dollars  every  year  on  technology  to  protect  people  and 
show them when danger is there. That technology includes computer models, Dopp-
ler radar systems, and instant crawl text systems and so on. 

There  has  been  some  talk  lately  about  fines  levied  by  the  FCC  for  stations  that 
did  not  have  closed  captioning  for  the  hearing  impaired  during  severe  weather 
events. 

It  must  be  noted,  however,  that  stations  make  a  huge  effort  and  investment  in 
equipment  to  inform  the  public.  Severe  weather  happens  in  an  instant  and  tele-
vision responds along with the national Weather Service with the warnings and the 
graphics to show where the danger is. 

We  are  responsible  to  all  our  viewers,  including  the  hearing  impaired.  It  should 
be  recognized  that  while  closed  captioning  is  a  wonderful  tool  we  all  use,  the  FCC 
should also note that the full screen graphics and maps along with the crawling text 
at  the  bottom  of  the  screen,  is  clearly  another  source  for  those  viewers  to  read  the 
information and see where the danger is when a closed caption may be unavailable 
because of technical or other reasons. 

Finally,  strategies  that  work  are  rather  simple.  Good  planning,  good  dedicated 
people at all levels of government and media as well as a citizen ready to act when 
the word is given. 

We  in  the  media  are  responsible  for  getting  the  word  out.  Our  partnership  with 
the Weather Service and state officials is just that . . . a partnership. Together we 
have seen what works and what doesn’t work. 

We  in  television  weather  focus  on  informing  the  public  with  the  best  technology 
to  back  us  up  and  a  strong  partnership  with  our  friends  at  the  National  Weather 
Service. 

Together people are well informed and lives are saved.

Senator DEMINT. Thank you, Mr. Walsh, Dr. Levitan? 

STATEMENT OF DR. MARC L. LEVITAN, DIRECTOR, LOUISIANA 
STATE UNIVERSITY HURRICANE CENTER/CHARLES P. SIESS, 
JR. ASSOCIATE PROFESSOR OF CIVIL AND ENVIRONMENTAL 
ENGINEERING 
Dr.  LEVITAN.  Yes,  good  afternoon,  and  thank  you  for  the  oppor-
tunity to address the Subcommittee. I’m appearing today on behalf 
of  Louisiana  State  University  Hurricane  Center,  the  American  As-
sociation  for  Wind  Engineering,  American  Society  of  Civil  Engi-
neers, and the Wind Hazard Reduction Coalition. 

I was invited to provide testimony on three major areas. The role 
of  the  engineering  research  community  in  influencing  building 
codes,  the  increasing  exposure  of  coastal  communities  to  hurri-
canes,  and  the  impact  of  a  major  hurricane  on  the  petrochemical 
facilities. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

36

With  regard  to  the  role  of  engineering  research,  and  influencing 
building  codes,  first  and  foremost  we  know  that  properly  adopted 
and enforced building codes are very effective tools to reducing the 
hurricane damage. Studies underway and recently completed, even 
this  past  year  from  Florida,  some  conducted  by  my  colleague  Dr. 
Reinhold  show  that  those  building  code  changes  are  very  effective. 
Also, there are some studies conducted by the LSU Hurricane Cen-
ter  that  showed  that  in  Florida,  hurricane  shelters  that  were  built 
to  the  Florida  Hurricane  Shelter  Enhanced  Hurricane  Protection 
Area  Standard  perform  much  better  than  other  shelters  that  were 
not built to those standards. So, as an example of how engineering 
research  gets  into  building  codes  and  standards,  let’s  consider  the 
problem  of  wind-borne  debris,  and  why  is  this  important?  Because 
wind-borne debris is one of the primary mechanisms by which win-
dows and doors are broken out, and not only is it important to keep 
the  windows  and  doors  in  place  to  keep  the  wind  and  debris  out 
of  the  building  or  out  of  the  home,  but  keeping  the  windows  and 
doors in place also helps keep the roof on the structure by avoiding 
what we call the internal pressurization. 

Several  new  research  studies  have  been  conducted  in  the  past  2 
years  on  the  aerodynamics  and  trajectories  of  wind-borne  debris, 
some  of  that  work  at  LSU,  sponsored  by  the  Louisiana  Sea  Grant 
College  Program.  This  research  included  wind  tunnel  studies, 
storm  damage  analysis  after  some  of  these  storms  and  computa-
tional  studies,  and  all  of  these  studies  seem  to  show  results  that 
the  debris  accelerates  faster  than  had  been  previously  thought.  So 
when the roof of the neighbor’s house starts coming apart, and the 
two  by  fours  and  the  sheets  of  plywood  are  starting  to  come  off, 
that  those  accelerate  and  they  pick  up  speed  much  more  rapidly 
than previously thought. 

Now,  why  is  that  important?  Because  that  goes  to  what  are  the 
appropriate  test  standards  that  we  use  for  debris  impact—win-
dows, doors and shutter systems—so that information now is being 
translated  into  the  building  codes  and  standards.  The  first  one  at 
the  moment,  we’re  developing  a  national  standard  for  the  design 
and  construction  of  storm  shelters,  which  addresses  tornado  shel-
ters, hurricane shelters, shelters that you would put inside of a res-
idence,  as  well  as  community  shelters,  so  improving,  having  the 
better  knowledge  of  how  fast  and  far  that  debris  will  fly  will  help 
us improve the test standards and help improve the safety and sur-
vivability of those types of structures. 

On a broader scale, the American Society of Civil Engineers pro-
duces  a  national  standard  which  is  used  for  wind  loads  on  build-
ings  called  the  ASCE–7.  This  standard  is  updated  every  few  years 
to  reflect  new  research,  as  well  as  address  lessons  learned  from 
previous  wind  storms,  but  one  of  the  major  problems  with  this  is 
the lack of funding for the applied research necessary to take some 
of  the  work  done  in  the  laboratory  and  convert  that  into  codes, 
standards and improved design and construction practices. With re-
gard  to  the  question  of  increasing  the  exposure  of  coastal  commu-
nities  to  hurricanes,  as  the  coastal  populations  boom  and  develop-
ment  is  booming  in  the  hurricane  coast,  particularly  in  the  South-
east  United  States  where  populations  are  growing  much  faster 
than the evacuation capacity of the major transportation networks. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

37

So  what  that  means  is  people  will  be  required  to  seek  shelter  lo-
cally  either  in  their  own  homes,  the  neighbors  homes,  businesses 
or local shelters, and so how do those people know? We have to be 
able  to  provide  through  building  codes  and  other  methods,  safe 
places for those people to stay during the storm. 

Another important question for the emergency management com-
munity to answer is how do those people know if the building that 
they’re in is any safer or not? During Hurricane Lilly, I live in As-
cension  Parish  southeast  of  Baton  Rouge,  and  Hurricane  Lilly,  the 
category  four  storm  coming  in,  the  message  that  came  over  the 
emergency  broadcast  system  was,  ‘‘If  you  live  in  Ascension  Parish 
and if you don’t feel safe in your own home, please go to the public 
shelter that we opened.’’ Well, how does the homeowner know if he 
should  feel  safe  or  not  in  his  own  home?  The  engineering  commu-
nity needs to do a better job and the Weather Service communities 
needs to refine some of those messages, perhaps, to give the home-
owners  and  residents  more  information  about  where  they  may  be 
safest to stay. 

We also desperately need to work on plans of last resort for when 
things  go  wrong.  A  couple  of  quick  examples  during  Hurricane 
Isadore  in  2002,  rainfall  flooding  as  the  storm  was  still  over  Mex-
ico, rainfall flooding choked off Interstate 10 westbound, the single 
most  important  evacuation  route  out  of  New  Orleans,  that  was  3 
days  before  the  storm  made  landfall.  From  Hurricane  Lilly,  which 
was approaching Louisiana 1 week later, the storm rapidly intensi-
fied  to  a  Category  IV  storm  and  potentially  it  looked  like  it  was 
starting  to  move  further  east,  and  at  that  time,  during  that  night, 
we  were  trying  to  work  with  the  state  to  develop  some  last  resort 
refuge  plans  of  what  buildings  could  we  use  for  a  vertical  refuge, 
and that’s obviously too late to be doing that. We desperately need 
to  work  and  there  needs  to  become  a  standard  part  of  the  emer-
gency  planning  system  is  what  to  do  when  things  go  wrong,  and 
have a plan of last resort. 

The  last  issue  is  addressing  the  impact  of  a  major  hurricane  on 
petrochemical  facilities  and  I’m  afraid  that  we  don’t  have  much  in 
the  way  of  answers  for  that,  mostly  questions.  Partly  the  answer 
is,  the  effects  on  the  petrochemical  industry  are  going  to  be  very 
uncertain,  but  generally  much  larger  than  is  understood  in  the  in-
dustry and engineering communities. As we know from some recent 
hurricanes,  Hurricane  Hugo,  that  devastated  a  major  refinery  in 
St.  Croix,  and  Hurricane  Georges  in  1998,  that  devastated  one  in 
Mississippi,  we  know  that  hurricanes,  major  hurricanes  do  have 
the potential to significantly impact petrochemical facilities. 

In  summary,  I  think  we  need  to  do  a  better  job,  particularly  in 
the  engineering  community  of  working  more  closely  with  emer-
gency  management  and  meteorological  communities  in  collabora-
tion,  particularly  in  the  hurricane  preparedness  and  response, 
which  oftentimes  has  primarily  been  the  role  of  the  emergency 
management community, and second, we need to do a better job of 
taking  the  research  from  the  laboratory  and  getting  it  out  into 
practice,  and  the  major  problem  and  the  major  problems  there  is 
the  lack  of  funding  for  the  applied  type  research  to  be  able  to  do 
that,  and  this  is  one  area  where  the  National  Windstorm  Hazard 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

38

Reduction  Program  authorized  last  year  would  help  provide  some 
funding to be able to give those answers. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Levitan follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR.  MARC L.  LEVITAN,  DIRECTOR,  LOUISIANA STATE
UNIVERSITY HURRICANE CENTER/CHARLES P.  SIESS,  JR.  ASSOCIATE PROFESSOR OF 
CIVIL AND ENVIRONMENTAL ENGINEERING 
Good  morning  and  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify.  I  am  Dr.  Marc 
Levitan, I am the Director of the Louisiana State University Hurricane Center and 
the Charles P. Siess Professor of Civil and Environmental Engineering at Louisiana 
State  University.  I  am  also  the  elected  President  of  the  American  Association  for 
Wind Engineering and a member of the American Society of Civil Engineers. 

I am appearing today on behalf of the Louisiana State University Hurricane Cen-
ter,  the  American  Association  for  Wind  Engineering,  the  American  Society  of  Civil 
Engineers and the Wind Hazards Reduction Coalition. 

The  Louisiana  State  University  Hurricane  Center.  Louisiana  State  University  is 
the flagship institution of the state, classified by the Carnegie Foundation as a Doc-
toral/Research-Extensive  University.  The  university  has  a  long  history  of  research 
in  hurricanes,  coastal  sciences  and  engineering.  The  LSU  Hurricane  Center  was 
founded  and  approved  by  the  Louisiana  Board  of  Regents  in  the  year  2000  to  pro-
vide  a  focal  point  for  this  work,  with  a  mission  to  advance  the  state-of-knowledge 
of  hurricanes  and  their  impacts  on  the  natural,  built,  and  human  environments;  to 
stimulate  interdisciplinary  and  collaborative  research  activities;  to  transfer  new 
knowledge  and  technology  to  students  and  professionals  in  concerned  disciplines; 
and to assist the state, the Nation, and the world in solving hurricane-related prob-
lems.  Research  efforts  that  have  been  translated  into  practice  in  support  of  emer-
gency management agencies include: implementation of real-time storm surge mod-
eling;  improvements  in  hurricane  evacuation  planning  and  operations  (particularly 
contraflow evacuations), and improvements in hurricane shelter analysis and design 
methods. 

The  American  Association  for  Wind  Engineering  (AAWE)  was  originally  estab-
lished  as  the  Wind  Engineering  Research  Council  in  1966  to  promote  and  dissemi-
nate  technical  information  in  the  research  community.  In  1983  the  name  was 
changed  to  American  Association  for  Wind  Engineering  and  incorporated  as  a  non-
profit  professional  organization.  The  multi-disciplinary  field  of  wind  engineering 
considers problems related to wind and associated water loads and penetrations for 
buildings  and  structures,  societal  impact  of  winds,  hurricane  and  tornado  risk  as-
sessment, cost-benefit analysis, codes and standards, dispersion of urban and indus-
trial pollution, wind energy and urban aerodynamics. 

Founded  in  1852,  the  American  Society  of  Civil  Engineers  (ASCE)  represents 
more than 125,000 civil engineers worldwide and is the Nation’s oldest engineering 
society.  ASCE  members  represent  the  profession  most  responsible  for  the  Nation’s 
built environment. Our members work in private practice, industry, government and 
academia.  ASCE  is  an  American  National  Standards  Institute  (ANSI)-approved 
standards developer and publisher of the Minimum Design Loads for Buildings and 
other  Structures  (ASCE–7),  which  is  referenced  in  the  Nation’s  major  model  build-
ing codes. As part of the ASCE–7 document, engineers are provided guidance in es-
timating  the  loads  resulting  from  wind  effects  on  structures.  Thus,  ASCE  is  at  the 
forefront  in  the  development  of  new  information  for  engineers  regarding  wind  and 
is  in  a  unique  position  to  comment  on  the  status  quo  and  our  needs  for  the  future. 
The  Wind  Hazard  Reduction  Coalition  currently  represents  23  associations  and 
companies  which  are  committed  to  the  creation  of  a  National  Wind  Hazard  Reduc-
tion  Program  (NWHRP)  that  would  focus  on  significantly  reducing  loss  of  life  and 
property damage in the years to come. The Coalition includes professional societies, 
research  organizations,  industry  groups  and  individual  companies  with  knowledge 
and experience in dealing with the impact of high winds. 
Problems and Solutions 

All  50  states  are  vulnerable  to  the  hazards  of  windstorms.  Just  last  year,  four 
hurricanes  made  landfall  in  Florida  and  caused  severe  damage.  Losses  from  the 
2004 hurricane season are estimated to exceed $40 billion to date and are still being 
counted.  These  storms  resulted  in  27  Federal  disaster  declarations  covering  15 
states, the Virgin Islands and Puerto Rico. In 1998, hurricanes, tornadoes and other 
wind  related  storms  caused  at  least  186  fatalities  and  more  than  $5.5  billion  in 
damage.  During  the  week  of  May  4–10,  2003,  a  record  384  tornadoes  occurred  in 
19  states,  including  Kansas,  Missouri,  Oklahoma  and  Tennessee  resulting  in  42  fa-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

39

talities.  On  May  3,  1999,  more  than  70  violent  tornadoes  struck  from  north  Texas 
to  the  Northern  Plains.  Forty-one  people  died  and  more  than  2,750  homes  were 
damaged.  In  1992,  Hurricane  Andrew  resulted  in  $26.5  billion  in  losses  and  61  fa-
talities,  in  1989,  Hurricane  Hugo  resulted  in  $7  billion  in  losses  and  86  fatalities 
and  in  1999,  Hurricane  Floyd  resulted  in  more  than  $6  billion  in  losses  and  56 
deaths. 

One major effort currently underway to reduce the loss of life and injuries in hur-
ricanes and tornadoes is the development of a national standard for storm shelters. 
The  International  Code  Council  (ICC)  and  National  Storm  Shelter  Association 
(NSSA),  with  support  from  the  Federal  Emergency  Management  Agency  (FEMA), 
are  currently  developing  the  ICC/NSSA  Standard  for  the  Design  and  Construction 
of  Storm  Shelters.  The  purpose  of  the  standard  is  ‘‘to  establish  minimum  require-
ments to safeguard the public health, safety, and general welfare relative to the de-
sign, construction, installation, repair, operation and maintenance of storm shelters 
constructed  for  refuge  from  high  winds  associated  with  tornadoes  and  hurricanes.’’ 
Scheduled  to  be  completed  next  year,  this  consensus  national  standard  has  the  po-
tential to significantly improve shelter safety. 

In  tornado-prone  areas,  the  Storm  Shelter  Standard  could  be  particularly  helpful 
with regard to assuring a minimum level of performance for manufactured residen-
tial shelters, i.e., providing a basic consumer protection. The biggest immediate im-
pact of the standard in hurricane-prone areas will likely be for community shelters. 
This is because the majority of buildings currently used as public hurricane shelters 
are  inadequately  constructed  to  resist  an  intense  hurricane,  placing  the  occupants 
at  risk.  This  fact  was  demonstrated  during  the  2004  hurricane  season  in  Florida. 
Supported by the ICC and Louisiana Sea Grant—LSU Hurricane Center researchers 
spent  time  in  the  field  after  Hurricanes  Charley  and  Ivan,  investigating  perform-
ance  of  hurricane  shelters.  Of  the  two  dozen  shelters  surveyed,  those  built  to  Flor-
ida’s  Enhanced  Hurricane  Protection  Area  (EHPA)  criteria  outperformed  shelters 
not built to those criteria. Damage to EHPA facilities was generally limited to minor 
water leakage. In other facilities, roof damage and water penetration serious enough 
to cause people to evacuate the shelter space was not uncommon. 

Publication of the standard alone will not improve shelter safety though; it is just 
the first step in the process. Unless it is adopted and enforced by jurisdictions hav-
ing authority over building construction, or voluntary compliance with the standard 
is requested or agreed to by the facility owners, the standard will have little impact. 
Therefore,  a  significant  awareness  and  education  campaign  will  be  needed.  It  must 
be  addressed  to  architects,  engineers,  building  officials,  shelter  owners  (e.g.,  home-
owners,  school  boards,  city  governments)  and  shelter  operators  (e.g.,  American  Red 
Cross, emergency management agencies). 

One  of  the  biggest  challenges  facing  design  of  public  hurricane  shelters  is  that 
shelter operators are not the owners of the shelter facilities and are rarely involved 
in  the  planning  and  design  process.  When  faced  with  tight  budgets  and  many  com-
peting needs, spending additional construction dollars to harden the facility for use 
as a hurricane shelter is usually a low priority with the facility owner, even though 
the  owner  is  often  a  public  entity  and  tax  dollars  are  funding  the  construction  of 
the new school or municipal building. Unless able to obtain a mitigation grant from 
FEMA  or  perhaps  a  state  agency,  the  local  government  or  the  school  district  gen-
erally  has  to  bear  the  increased  construction  costs  associated  with  constructing  the 
facility  for  dual  use  as  a  shelter.  This  is  an  area  where  additional  engineering  re-
search  and  technology  transfer  is  crucial—improving  cost-effectiveness  of  storm 
shelters. 

Another  hurricane  sheltering  issue  relates  to  getting  the  message  out  about  who 
should  be  going  to  shelters  and  who  should  be  advised  to  shelter  in  place.  Emer-
gency managers generally only order mandatory evacuations for areas subject to sig-
nificant  hurricane  flooding.  This  is  done  in  order  to  make  sure  there  is  sufficient 
transportation  system  capacity  available  for  people  in  the  most  at-risk  areas.  As 
coastal  population  growth  continues  to  outpace  construction  of  new  highway  infra-
structure—more and more people will not be able to evacuate and need to seek shel-
ter  in  their  own  residences  or  other  local  facilities.  The  National  Weather  Service, 
National  Hurricane  Center  and  television  media  do  a  comparatively  good  job  of  in-
forming  the  public  about  the  hazards  they  can  expect  with  the  approaching  storm, 
but what information do people have about the relative safety of their home or busi-
ness  or  shelter,  so  that  they  can  make  an  informed  decision  about  where  is  the 
safest  place?  If  they  are  under  a  voluntary  or  precautionary  evacuation  warning, 
should  they  leave  or  stay?  This  is  an  area  where  better  coordination  and  collabora-
tion  between  the  engineering  community,  emergency  management  community,  and 
meteorology community is desperately needed. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

40

Catastrophic hurricane planning is another area where much additional work and 
collaboration  between  the  different  professional  communities  is  needed.  Hurricane 
Georges  in  1998  and  Hurricane  Ivan  in  2004  both  had  the  potential  to  drown  the 
city  of  New  Orleans  and  much  of  the  surrounding  southeast  Louisiana  under  10–
20  feet  of  water.  Estimates  are  that  only  50–60  percent  of  the  residents  evacuated 
for  these  storms,  meaning  over  half  a  million  people  were  at  significant  risk. 
Warned  or  not,  if  people  have  not  evacuated  and  the  water  comes,  there  will  be 
mass fatalities. Last year the Louisiana Office of Homeland Security and Emergency 
Preparedness  and  FEMA  (and  many  other  Federal  and  State  agencies)  conducted 
a  week-long  joint  planning  exercise  on  how  to  respond  and  recover  from  just  such 
a scenario. This event helped produce the first catastrophic hurricane response plan, 
but it also raised more questions than it answered. 

Hurricane  Lili  in  2002  raised  similar  fears.  As  the  Category  4  hurricane  ap-
proached the Louisiana coast on the evening of October 2, it appeared to begin mov-
ing farther east than had been predicted, into areas that had not been as well evac-
uated.  Frantic  preparations  began  to  start  identifying  buildings  to  serve  as  refuges 
of last resort. Fortunately the storm returned to its more westerly track and rapidly 
lost  strength  before  making  landfall,  and  Louisiana  dodged  another  bullet.  This 
event  highlighted  the  importance  of  plans  of  last  resort—for  situations  where  a 
storm  makes  an  unexpected  turn  close  to  shore  or  rapidly  intensifies,  as  Hurricane 
Opal  did  in  1995  when  it  accelerated  and  explosively  intensified  overnight  to  unex-
pectedly threaten the Florida panhandle. 

Hurricanes  also  have  impacts  well  beyond  the  regions  where  they  make  landfall. 
Price and availability of construction materials across the country are adversely af-
fected by major storms such as Hurricane Andrew and the Hurricanes of 2004. Hur-
ricane  Ivan  significantly  disrupted  offshore  oil  and  gas  production  and  transpor-
tation in the Gulf of Mexico, impacting energy prices nationwide. Fortunately, none 
of  last  years  hurricanes  impacted  the  onshore.  This  is  another  area  of  significant 
concern. 

A study of industry practices published in 1997 by ASCE found that the wind re-
sistant  design  of  onshore  refineries  and  petrochemical  plants  varied  tremendously 
due  to  the  aerodynamic  complexity  of  the  types  of  structures  involved  and  the  lack 
of coverage of these types of structures in any building codes or standards. An unex-
plored  aspect  of  this  report  is  that  many  industrial  plants  do  not  understand  how 
vulnerable  their  processing  and  storage  facilities  may  be  to  extreme  winds.  Many 
plants specify a wind speed to which their facilities should be designed, but because 
of  uncertainties  in  how  the  wind  interacts  with  the  complex  structures,  the  actual 
wind the structure can resist might be much larger or smaller. In practical terms—
the  actual  design  strength  may  be  more  than  one  Saffir-Simpson  Hurricane  Cat-
egory less than or greater than the intended design. In most cases the owners/opera-
tors of the facilities are unaware of this discrepancy, which is very important consid-
ering  that  decisions  on  whether  to  shut  down  a  plant  are  generally  based  on  the 
expected  Hurricane  Category  at  landfall.  Additional  study  is  needed  to  further  de-
fine this problem, and cooperation with this industry and the preparedness/response 
community. 

The  problems  and  solutions  described  so  far  are  just  a  few  examples  of  areas  in 
which  more  work  and  closer  coordination  is  needed  between  industry,  government, 
and  the  engineering  community.  The  United  States  currently  sustains  billions  of 
dollars per year in property and economic loss due to windstorms. The Federal Gov-
ernment’s  focus  has  been  one  of  response  and  recovery,  not  mitigation.  While  there 
will  always  be  a  need,  a  sustained  focus  on  hazard  mitigation  can  lessen  the  cost 
in life and property of these events. 

With  the  average  annual  damage  from  windstorms  at  more  than  $6  billion,  the 
current  $5–10  million  Federal  investment  in  research  to  mitigate  these  impacts  is 
inadequate. In contrast, the Federal Government invests over $100 million per year 
in reducing earthquake losses through the National Earthquake Hazards Reduction 
Program,  a  program  that  has  lead  to  a  significant  reduction  in  the  effects  of  earth-
quakes. A Federal investment in wind hazard reduction would pay similar or great-
er dividends in saved lives and decreased property damage. 

Near-surface  winds  are  the  most  variable  of  all  meteorological  elements,  making 
the  prediction  and  control  of  their  impacts  all  the  more  challenging.  In  the  United 
States  the  mean  annual  wind  speed  is  8  to  12  mph,  but  wind  speeds  of  50  mph 
occur frequently throughout the country, and nearly every area occasionally experi-
ences winds of 70 mph or greater. In coastal areas of the East and Gulf coasts, trop-
ical storms may bring wind speeds of well over 100 mph. In the middle of the coun-
try, wind speeds in tornadoes can be even higher. 

Unfortunately, reducing vulnerability to wind hazards is not just a question of de-
veloping  the  appropriate  technical  solution.  Wind  hazards  are  created  by  a  variety 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

41

of  events  with  large  uncertainties  in  the  magnitudes  and  characteristics  of  the 
winds. The relevant government agencies and programs, as well as the construction 
industry are fragmented. Finally, implementation requires action by owners and the 
public, who may not consider hazard reduction a high priority. Solving wind vulner-
ability  problems  will  require  coordinated  work  in  scientific  research,  technology  de-
velopment, education, technology transfer and public outreach. 

In  1993,  the  National  Research  Council  (NRC)  published  a  report  entitled  ‘‘Wind 
and the Built Environment.’’ The report included the recommendations of the Panel 
on the Assessment of Wind Engineering Issues in the United States. The panel rec-
ommended  the  establishment  of  a  national  program  to  reduce  wind  vulnerability. 
Such a program would include wind research that draws upon the expertise of both 
academia  and  industry  and  addresses  both  structural  and  nonstructural  mitigation 
methods, an outreach program to educate state and local governments on the nature 
of the wind risks they face, a conscious effort to improve communication within the 
wind  community  and  a  commitment  to  international  cooperation  in  wind-engineer-
ing. 

A  1999  NRC  study  concurred  with  that  recommendation  and  specifically  urged 
Congress  to  designate  ‘‘funds  for  a  coordinated  national  wind-hazard  reduction  pro-
gram  that  encourages  partnerships  between  Federal,  State  and  local  governments, 
private industry, the research community, and other interested stakeholders.’’

In  2003,  the  Rand  Corporation  released  a  report  entitled,  ‘‘Assessing  Federal  Re-
search  and  Development  for  Hazard  Loss  Reduction.’’  Specific  recommendations  for 
a research and implementation program are contained in the report released by the 
American Association for Wind Engineering and the American Society of Civil Engi-
neers  entitled  ‘‘Wind  Engineering  Research  and  Outreach  Plan  to  Reduce  Losses 
Due to Wind Hazards.’’ Both reports support programs which would encompass four 
focuses:

• Understanding of Wind Hazards—developing a greater understanding of severe 
winds,  quantify  wind  loading  on  buildings,  structures  and  infrastructure  and 
developing wind hazards maps;

• Assessing the Impact of Wind Hazards—assessing the performance of buildings, 
structures  and  infrastructure  under  severe  winds,  developing  frameworks  and 
tools  for  simulations  and  computer  modeling  and  developing  tools  for  system 
level modeling and loss assessment;

• Reducing  the  Impact  of  Wind  Hazards—developing  retrofit  measures  for  exist-
ing  buildings,  structures  and  infrastructure,  developing  innovative  wind-resist-
ant  technologies  for  buildings,  structures  and  infrastructure  and  developing 
land measures and cost effective construction practices consistent with site-spe-
cific wind hazards; and

• Enhancing Community Resilience, Education and Outreach—enhancing commu-
nity  resilience  to  wind  hazards,  effective  transfer  to  professionals  of  research 
findings  and  technology  and  development  of  educational  programs  and  public 
outreach activities.

From these reports and the efforts of a number of Senators and Members of Con-
gress,  as  well  as  the  Wind  Hazards  Reduction  Caucus,  the  National  Wind  Storm 
Hazards Reduction Program was born. Created by Public Law 108–360, the legisla-
tion represents five years of work in which stake holders representing a broad cross-
section  of  interests  such  as  the  research,  technology  transfer,  design  and  construc-
tion, and financial communities; materials and systems suppliers; state, county, and 
local governments; the insurance industry, have participated in crafting this legisla-
tion.  This  bill  represents  a  consensus  of  all  those  with  an  interest  in  the  issue  and 
a desire to see the benefits this legislation will generate. 

Among  the  potential  research  areas  this  program  can  explore  are  the  numerous 
areas  where  we  lack  the  knowledge  to  make  informed  judgments  with  respect  to 
building  siting  and  design.  With  data  learned  from  research  in  the  following  areas, 
and others not yet foreseen, better knowledge and data will lead to cost-effective de-
sign and construction practices to mitigate the impacts of high winds. 

Boundary  Layer  Meteorology  for  Landfalling  Storms—We  know  very  little  about 
the structure of the wind in a hurricane and how it changes as it passes over land. 
Research  is  needed  to  better  understand  the  nature  of  boundary  layer  transitions, 
turbulence, rainfall, and decay rates as storms move inland. The design wind speed 
and  gust  factors  used  in  all  building  codes  and  standards  (including  ASCE  7)  are 
based on a set of assumptions that hurricane winds have similar properties to winds 
from other events, which we know to be untrue. This research can lead to significant 
improvements in wind-loading related portions of our building codes and standards. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

42

Rapid Damage Assessment using Remote Sensing for Improved Response and Re-
covery—The key to optimization of response and recovery operations is timely access 
to  detailed  information  on  the  extent  and  intensity  of  damage  throughout  the  ef-
fected  areas.  Very  high  resolution  data  can  be  obtained  from  commercial  satellite-
based  remote  sensing  systems,  which  was  previously  unavailable  except  to  intel-
ligence  and  defense  communities.  Resolutions  have  improved  to  the  point  where 
data is available on individual buildings and vehicles. Development of computerized 
analysis  tools  that  automate  and  map  damage  assessment  estimates  will  signifi-
cantly assist response and rescue and recovery operations. 

Improved  Connections  and  Framing  Systems  for  Light  Frame  Construction—
Much  of  the  structural  damage  which  occurs  in  severe  winds  is  to  light  frame  one- 
and  two-story  construction.  There  has  been  relatively  little  improvement  in  wood 
and other light framing technology in the past 20 years. New cost-effective construc-
tion  techniques  could  significantly  reduce  structural  damage  to  low-rise  buildings. 
Roof  System  Testing  Procedures  and  Devices  for  Wind  Resistance—No  standard-
ized  testing  procedures  and  devices  exist  to  test  roof  cladding  materials  for  resist-
ance  to  extreme  winds  and  debris.  Development  of  these  items  is  a  necessary  pre-
requisite for improved roofing performance (see next item). 

New  Roofing  Systems—Damage  to  roofing  is  perhaps  the  single  most  common 
source of wind damage. Even small failures can allow the wind and rain inside the 
building leading to significant interior and contents damage and possible structural 
failure. Development of new wind-resistant roofing materials and technologies could 
significantly reduce wind-induced damage. 

In-Residence Shelters for Hurricane Protection—In collaboration with the univer-
sity  research  community,  FEMA  has  conducted  research  and  developed  plans  and 
guidelines  for  in-residence  shelters  for  protection  from  tornadic  winds.  These  de-
signs provide near complete protection for occupants from even large tornadoes, but 
are  too  costly  and  overly  conservative  for  use  on  hurricane  coast.  New  research  is 
needed  to  find  more  appropriate  and  cost  effective  solutions  for  construction  on  the 
hurricane coast. 

Dual-Use  Public  Hurricane  and  Tornado  Shelters—Schools  are  the  most  com-
monly  used  buildings  for  hurricane  evacuation  shelters,  but  they  are  not  struc-
turally  designed  to  provide  a  safe  haven.  Similarly,  children  shelter  in  place  while 
in  school  during  tornado  warnings,  but  these  buildings  too  are  not  designed  with 
adequate protection. Research and development of design guidelines and methodolo-
gies  on  how  best  to  construct  schools  and  other  public  buildings  for  dual  function 
as shelters from hurricanes and tornadoes is desperately needed. 

Retrofit  Technologies  for  Wind  Resistance—Although  it  is  much  easier  to  build 
wind  resistance  into  new  construction,  the  country  has  an  enormous  investment  in 
existing  building  stock.  Technologies  for  cost-effective  retrofits  to  improve  wind  re-
sistance  of  these  buildings  should  be  an  important  focus  of  any  new  research  pro-
gram. 

Congress has taken action to establish a program to mitigate the impact of severe 
windstorms.  What  is  needed  in  the  immediate  future  is  funding  for  the  new  pro-
gram.  I  would  urge  Members  of  the  Subcommittee  to  work  with  your  colleagues  in 
the  Appropriations  Committee  to  ensure  that  the  Windstorm  Hazards  Reduction 
Program  can  begin  the  work  it  was  designed  to  do.  For  Fiscal  Year  2006  the  pro-
gram  is  authorized  for  $22.5  million  dollars  in  spending,  spread  over  four  agencies. 
Specifically, the law authorizes:

partment of Commerce; 

• $8.7 million for the Federal Emergency Management Agency; 
• $3  million  for  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology  at  the  De-
• $8.7 million for the National Science Foundation; and 
• $2.1 million for the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration.
Once again, thank you for the opportunity to present the views of the many orga-
nizations  I  am  representing  here  today.  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any  questions 
that you might have.

Senator DEMINT. Thank you, Dr. Reinhold? 

STATEMENT  OF  TIMOTHY  A.  REINHOLD,  PH.D.,  VICE
PRESIDENT  OF  ENGINEERING,  INSTITUTE  FOR  BUSINESS  & 
HOME SAFETY 
Dr.  REINHOLD.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee  and  ladies  and  gentlemen,  it’s  a  pleasure  to  be  here  and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

43

have an opportunity to discuss some of the issues that we share in 
common,  relative  to  trying  to  predict  and  to  prevent  the  disasters 
that  we  all  face  when  some  of  the  natural  events  that  will  occur 
and can occur, do occur. And we’re clearly not doing a good enough 
job  in  terms  of  building  our  homes  and  our  businesses  to  provide 
the resiliency within our community so that they can weather these 
storms  without  the  kind  of  distress  we’ve  seen  most  recently  in 
Florida,  but  we  have  seen  it  in  most  every  other  state  when  these 
major events occur. 

What  we’re  seeing  in  the  most  recent  events  is  very  clearly  that 
moving to a better building code is making a huge difference in the 
way  people  can  pick  up  the  pieces  and  move  on  after  the  storms. 
We’ve done a very good job in terms of improving the structural re-
sistance of our buildings, but we’ve still got some serious problems 
in  terms  of  water  penetration  and  the  other  issues  that  come  in 
when  water  gets  in  the  house.  When  you  have  ceilings  collapsing, 
people say it’s great that you’ve helped me keep my house together, 
it  would  be  really  nice  if  I  could  live  in  it  after  the  storm  goes 
through,  so  we’ve  got  some  disconnects  there,  we’re  making 
progress,  but  we’ve  got  some  other  issues  that  we  really  need  to 
deal  with.  The  insurance  industry  has  certainly  been  a  partner  in 
this  in  trying  to  help  move  things  forward,  and  there  are  several 
initiatives  that  we’re  involved  in  that  I  think  will  help  along  this. 
And  it’s  based—the  insurance  industry  provides  a  lot  of  that 
spreading  of  the  risk  and  providing  the  resources  to  help  commu-
nities and individuals rebuild after storms. In the previous year we 
had  1.7  million  claims  in  the  State  of  Florida,  one  in  five  home-
owners  had  a  claim  in  the  State  of  Florida,  and  a  total  of  $20  bil-
lion  worth  of  insured  losses,  something  that  rivals  Hurricane  An-
drew,  and  yet  the  insurance  industry  came  through  it  in  better 
shape in terms of being able to respond. We didn’t have companies 
going  bankrupt  like  we  did  after  Hurricane  Andrew,  we  did  not 
have  people  not  being  able  to  respond  in  quite  the  same  way,  I 
think  there  was  one  company  that  got  into  trouble  or  went  bank-
rupt  as  a  result  of  the  storms  this  last  year,  and  most  have  been 
able to respond in a fairly timely fashion in closing files and react-
ing with the population. With that number of files, it certainly took 
a  long  time,  and  people  are  still  recovering  and  having  a  difficult 
time  finding  contractors.  There  are  people  still  in  Port  Charlotte, 
Punta  Gordo  area  that  are  facing  a  year  wait  to  get  a  contractor 
to  be  able  to  come  in  and  rebuild  their  home.  Next  to  them  would 
be  other  homes  and  businesses  built  to  the  latest  building  codes 
that as soon as power was restored, they were up and running, and 
life  was  almost  back  to  normal.  And  so  as  you  walk  through  the 
areas, you were able to see that difference. 

One  of  the  things  that  we  did  do  this  last  year,  is  we  hosted  a 
group  from  Louisiana,  including  the  Insurance  Commission  and 
others to come into the State of Florida and showed them firsthand 
the  performance  and  the  benefits  of  having  strong  building  codes. 
There  are  so  many  states  right  now  in  so  many  communities  that 
don’t  have  any  building  code,  or  have  adopted  a  weakened  version 
of  our  model  building  codes  that  put  the  residents  at  risk  when 
these kind of events occur, and so consequently, one of our big ini-
tiatives  and  interests  is  in  trying  to  incentivize  the  state  to  go  to 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

44

statewide building codes and to do adequate enforcement and adop-
tion,  because  it  is  much  cheaper  to  make  that  change  in  the  new 
construction  and  to  build  it  in  to  start  with,  rather  than  to  come 
back  and  do  it  as  a  retrofit  afterwards.  A  lot  of  my  career  at 
Clemson  University  over  the  last  few  years  was  spent  in  trying  to 
develop  practical  ways  of  retrofitting  homes,  and  I  know  how  ex-
pensive  and  how  difficult  it  can  be  to  try  to  do  that.  So  there’s  a 
challenge  in  trying  to  come  up  with  these  practical  ways,  there’s 
research  that  is  needed,  there  are  ways  that  we  need  to  make 
progress  in  terms  of  helping  people  make  good  decisions  about, 
given  the  state  of  your  house  and  the  status  of  that,  what  are  the 
most  economical  and  most  beneficial  things  you  can  do  to  improve 
your home and bring it up closer to your neighbors that have a new 
home  built  to  the  latest  codes.  I  think  one  of  the  most  interesting 
things for me in going around after the storms last year, was actu-
ally  seeing  how  well  some  of  the  new  manufactured  housing  units 
fared in the storms. In 1994 after Hurricane Andrew when a num-
ber of us who were involved in investigating the damage after Hur-
ricane Andrew said, if you keep building manufactured housing the 
way you’re building it today, in a storm like Andrew, you have got 
to  consider  it  expendable,  it’s  going  to  be  gone.  And  we  saw  that 
widespread in Punta Gorda, Port Charlotte, where Hurricane Char-
lie hit and where the winds were higher than any storm since An-
drew to hit the United States, we found manufactured homes built 
to the latest standards that were adopted after 1994 that were ba-
sically  unscathed,  or  structurally  quite  sound.  Some  of  them  were 
beat  up  by  the  debris  flying  off  of  other  homes  around  them,  but 
overall,  it  was  very  clear  that  the  codes  were  making  a  major, 
major difference there. And so we’re interested in the Federal Gov-
ernment helping to incentivize the process of trying to get building 
codes adopted broadly across the country, we think there are oppor-
tunities  in  terms  of  providing  incentives  for  people  when  they’re 
buying  a  home  and  taking  out  loans  to  do  mitigation  measures 
then  when  there  is  possibly  more  dollars  available  than  you  can 
put on the table by rolling things into your mortgage and so forth, 
maybe Fannie Mae and others can help with some of that process. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Reinhold follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF TIMOTHY A. REINHOLD, PH.D., VICE PRESIDENT OF 

ENGINEERING, INSTITUTE FOR BUSINESS & HOME SAFETY 

Chairman DeMint and Members of the Subcommittee, my name is Tim Reinhold, 
and  I  am  the  Vice  President  of  Engineering  for  the  Institute  for  Business  &  Home 
Safety  (IBHS),  which  is  a  nonprofit  initiative  of  the  U.S.  property  and  casualty  in-
surance  industry  with  a  mission  to  reduce  deaths,  injuries,  property  damage,  eco-
nomic losses and human suffering caused by natural disasters. We are an organiza-
tion  dedicated  to  natural  hazard  loss  reduction,  and  very  much  involved  in  wind-
storm impact reduction in our related efforts in:

• Research 
• Communications 
• Outreach 
• Building code development and adoption 
• Data collection and analysis 
• Promotion of incentives for mitigation and disaster resistant construction
It is clear that this Committee and IBHS have significant areas of common inter-
est. Over the past decades, we have seen dramatic drops in the loss of life in hurri-
canes  due  to  better  warning  and  evacuation.  However,  we  have  also  seen  dramatic 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

45

increases  in  property  losses  as  our  Nation  concentrates  more  and  more  of  its  popu-
lation  and  wealth  along  our  vulnerable  coastlines.  With  this  rapid  growth  in  popu-
lation,  we  are  certainly  not  immune  to  a  large  loss  of  life  in  a  future  event.  Many 
experts  are  concerned  that  a  fast  developing  and  fast  moving  storm  could  produce 
a  large  loss  of  life  among  people  trapped  in  traffic  jams  associated  with  attempts 
to  evacuate  too  many  people  in  too  short  a  time.  To  counter  this  risk  and  the  dra-
matic  increases  in  property  losses,  we  desperately  need  to  build  stronger  and  safer 
homes  and  businesses  so  that  coastal  inhabitants  who  are  not  in  vulnerable  struc-
tures  or  in  inundation  areas  will  not  need  to  evacuate  and  so  that  the  resiliency 
of  our  communities  is  dramatically  improved.  Ultimately,  we  are  not  likely  to  be 
able  to  provide  enough  evacuation  capacity  and  warning  time  to  handle  the  de-
mands,  if  population  growth  continues  unabated,  and  many  would  argue  that  we 
have  already  passed  the  point  where  mass  evacuation  is  viable  in  a  large  number 
of vulnerable areas. 

The  Committee  has  asked  me  to  focus  my  testimony  on  the  role  of  the  insurance 
industry  in  reducing  the  exposure  of  individuals  and  businesses  to  the  impact  of 
windstorms, IBHS’s work to promote disaster resistant technologies, any barriers to 
the  adoption  of  these  technologies,  and  a  discussion  and  presentation  of  any  cost-
benefit analysis of disaster resistant technologies. 
The Role of the Insurance Industry 

First  and  foremost,  the  insurance  industry  provides  the  primary  mechanism  for 
sharing  risk  and  accumulating  resources  needed  to  help  individuals  and  businesses 
recover  from  the  impact  of  windstorms.  It  is  clear  from  the  experience  of  the  2004 
hurricane  season  that  the  insurance  industry  has  come  a  long  way  since  the  up-
heavals  caused  by  Hurricane  Andrew  in  1992.  In  the  aftermath  of  Andrew,  a  num-
ber  of  companies  or  at  least  their  Florida  subsidiaries  were  rendered  insolvent  and 
several  companies  were  bankrupt.  In  2004,  despite  the  fact  that  one  in  five  Florid-
ians  filed  a  claim  (three  times  the  number  of  claims  filed  after  Hurricane  Andrew) 
and  total  claims  exceeding  $20  billion  (about  the  same  insured  losses  as  Hurricane 
Andrew, in 2004 dollars), only one company went bankrupt. A significant reason for 
this improved performance is related to the better understanding of all of the issues 
surrounding responding to major and widespread windstorm impacts, to better prep-
aration of catastrophe teams, and to better modeling of the risks. 

The improved modeling offers exciting possibilities for support of windstorm miti-
gation efforts. This modeling is occurring within the Federal sector, through FEMA’s 
HAZUS–MH,  and  within  the  private  sector,  through  efforts  of  various  modeling 
companies  that  provide  services  to  the  insurance  and  reinsurance  companies.  A 
major focus of the modeling efforts in both the Federal and private sectors has been 
on  predicting  damage  and  losses  for  large  portfolios  of  property  and  infrastructure. 
This  helps  emergency  managers  plan  and  organize  response  efforts,  secure  needed 
supplies  and  stage  resources.  It  helps  insurers  in  quantifying  their  risks  to  help 
them  make  better  business  decisions.  The  loss  estimates  produced  by  these  catas-
trophe  models  are  also  used  by  insurers  to  help  them  set  reserves,  determine  the 
need for reinsurance and provide input for setting appropriate premiums. Real time 
analyses  also  help  insurers  plan  and  stage  their  resources  to  facilitate  rapid  re-
sponse  through  adjusting  and  settling  claims  in  the  days  and  weeks  following  a 
major windstorm disaster. 

The  laws  of  large  numbers  have  made  the  applications  listed  above  a  somewhat 
easier  task  than  the  prediction  of  the  performance  of  an  individual  structure  and 
the associated benefits of a specific mitigation measure. Nevertheless, the modelers 
are  tackling  the  individual  property  and  mitigation  issue  and  making  progress  in 
their  predictive  capabilities  for  these  cases.  Insurers  are  using  the  results  of  these 
models along with available post-storm evaluations to negotiate rates and incentives 
for mitigation measures in Florida policies. 

In 2000, the Florida Windstorm Underwriting Association (now known as Citizens 
Property Insurance) increased their rates dramatically (200–300 percent) as they in-
troduced a class plan whereby buildings insured through the wind pool could be in-
spected  for  wind  resistant  features  and  thereby  qualify  for  mitigation  related  dis-
counts.  Under  this  plan,  homes  can  qualify  for  up  to  a  70  percent  discount  if  they 
contain  all  the  mitigation  features  considered  by  the  program.  This  case  clearly 
shows  the  kind  of  dynamics  at  work  in  this  process.  As  risks  are  better  defined, 
more  vulnerable  properties  receive  less  favorable  treatment  and  less  vulnerable 
properties receive more favorable treatment. 

Insurance  policies  issued  in  Florida  currently  consider  mitigation  features  as  a 
factor  in  the  rating  of  a  home  for  insurance.  With  the  implementation  of  the  latest 
version of the Florida Building Code in 2002, all insurers in the state were required 
to recognize the hurricane resistive features of the codes in future rate filings in the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

46

state.  The  result  is  lower  insurance  premiums  for  homes  that  are  built  in  accord-
ance  with  this  stronger  new  building  code  as  compared  to  older  more  vulnerable 
homes.  The  wind  resistive  features  that  insurers  are  required  to  give  credit  for  in-
clude:  opening  protection  (storm  shutters),  roof  to  wall  connections,  roof  deck  con-
nections and roof covering type. 

In  addition  to  Florida,  the  Texas  Department  of  Insurance  mandates  insurance 
discounts  for  homeowners  that  have  impact  resistant  roofing  products  installed  on 
their  homes  in  this  hail  prone  state.  In  the  Dallas,  TX,  area,  consumers  can  see  as 
much  as  a  25–30  percent  decrease  in  their  premiums  for  using  these  products  on 
their roofs. 

Note  that  because  of  the  regulated  nature  of  rates  in  nearly  all  states,  this  is  a 

process that is negotiated between individual companies and the regulators. 

It must be emphasized that insurance related incentives are only one of the ways 
to promote better construction and mitigation of existing buildings. In general, it is 
hard to motivate homeowners to spend thousands of dollars on upgrades or retrofits 
to  save  hundreds  of  dollars  a  year  on  insurance.  Where  I  used  to  live  in  Clemson, 
South  Carolina,  a  reduction  of  my  entire  insurance  premium  would  not  have  been 
enough  financial  incentive  for  me  to  retrofit  my  house.  When  I  re-roofed  my  house 
in Clemson, I did strengthen my roof, but I did it for reasons other than a cold fis-
cally based benefit-cost calculation. 

To  be  effective,  incentives  need  to  go  beyond  those  offered  by  or  required  of  the 
insurance  industry.  Buildings  that  survive  windstorms  unscathed  are  a  benefit  to 
their communities. People can stay in their homes, businesses can remain open and 
people  can  continue  to  go  about  their  lives  with  minimal  disruption.  These  people 
are also likely to not be victims, and will not require any government assistance to 
recover from a disaster since their impact would be minimized. 

Because of the far reaching effects of mitigation, IBHS believes that incentives for 
windstorm  mitigation  need  to  go  beyond  just  insurance  and  include  things  like  tax 
breaks,  mortgage  rate  or  fee  incentives,  and  incentives  from  businesses  within  the 
community.  We  need  to  adequately  recognize  the  role  that  wind  resistant  construc-
tion of homes and businesses play to keep the community alive and well throughout 
these events. If homes are destroyed, then workers will not be able to come to work 
and  if  businesses  are  destroyed,  then  workers  will  not  have  employment  to  go  to. 
The  interconnections  run  deep  and  it  is  critical  that  we  address  strengthening  of 
all elements of the fabric of our communities. Fully one quarter of small businesses 
that close following a disaster do not reopen. Some communities such as Homestead, 
Florida, are just now recovering from Hurricane Andrew. 
IBHS Works to Promote Windstorm Disaster Resistance 

The  majority  of  IBHS  activities  relating  to  windstorm  impact  reduction  involve 
applying research and development that has been conducted by universities, Federal 
agencies  and  construction  industry  related  trade  associations.  The  goal  of  these  ac-
tivities is to understand, communicate and implement the latest knowledge on wind-
storm mitigation into the work of the organization. These activities include:

mitigation, including windstorm damage mitigation.

a wide range of natural disasters including windstorms.

better understand technical aspects of windstorm mitigation.

• Maintaining  a  series  of  consumer  focused  guides  and  brochures  that  relate  to 
• Maintaining  a  website  with  publicly  available  information  on  natural  disaster 
• Developing two interactive web-based programs to help home and business own-
ers develop customized pre-disaster mitigation plans and post-disaster recovery 
plans, as well as identify home structural improvements.
• Serve as a technical resource for our member insurance companies to help them 
• Support the improvement of building codes with regard to natural disaster dam-
• Support  the  adoption  of  the  latest  model  building  codes  at  the  state  level  and 
• Participate in the development of the ASCE 7 wind provisions that are the basis 
• Establish  statewide  coalitions  for  natural  hazard  loss  reduction  that  incor-
porates  land  use  planning  emphasis  in  mitigation  activities  among  multiple 
state and local government agencies.

working to ensure that they are not weakened by local amendments.

age mitigation on behalf of our member insurance companies.

for wind loads in the current model building codes.

Over  the  past  few  years,  IBHS  has  worked  with  a  number  of  universities  includ-
ing Clemson University, the University of Florida, Florida International University, 
Texas  Tech  University,  Louisiana  State  University,  and  Colorado  State  University 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

47

to  stay  abreast  of  current  research  and  information.  Similarly,  IBHS  works  with 
FEMA on flood and wind related retrofit issues as well as the Department of Energy 
through  Oak  Ridge  National  Labs  as  a  part  of  the  Roofing  Industry  Committee  on 
Weather  Issues  (RICOWI).  IBHS  also  has  working  relationships  with  several  con-
struction  and  testing  related  trade  associations  including  APA,  the  Engineered 
Wood  Association,  the  National  Roofing  Contractors  Association,  and  Underwriters 
Laboratories. 

IBHS  is  a  strong  and  consistent  advocate  of  the  adoption  and  enforcement  of  na-
tional  model  building  codes  and  standards.  We  work  with  our  member  companies, 
emergency managers, building officials, civic leaders and code officials to build coali-
tions that will endorse and support the adoption of statewide building codes. We un-
derstand the power and effectiveness of a strong well enforced building code to pro-
tect  homes  and  businesses.  We  seek  to  establish  incentives  for  states  and  commu-
nities  to  adopt  the  latest  model  building  codes,  without  local  amendments  that 
would  weaken  the  disaster  mitigation  measures.  The  Federal  Government  can  help 
incentivize the statewide building code adoption process by increasing pre- and post-
disaster  mitigation  funds  for  those  states  that  do  adopt  up-to-date  model  building 
codes and promote adequate enforcement of these codes. 

However, we also understand that the building code is the minimum capacity re-
quired  (the  poorest  quality  home  you  can  legally  build)  and  we  are  actively  pro-
moting  code  +  construction  through  our  Fortified . . . for  safer  living new  con-
struction  program.  This  program  is  small  but  growing.  We  recently  entered  into 
agreements for a development of 600 to 800 homes in the panhandle of Florida, and 
another  development  of  approximately  60  homes  in  the  Myrtle  Beach,  South  Caro-
lina  area  where  every  home  will  be  a  Fortified . . . for  safer  living home.  One  of 
our  member  companies  is  planning  to  file  a  rate  reduction  for  the  Fortified  homes 
in South Carolina. 

During  the  2004  hurricane  season,  IBHS  provided  technical  support  to  Clemson 
University, the University of Florida and Florida International University in the de-
ployment  of  instruments  to  measure  wind  speeds  and  wind  pressures  on  houses. 
This data has provided much needed surface measurements of wind speeds in areas 
impacted  by  the  storms.  We  have  actively  sought  to  bring  this  information  and  the 
wind  field  analyses  of  NOAA  and  HAZUS–MH  related  wind  field  modeling  to  the 
attention  of  the  public  so  that  they  better  understand  the  magnitude  of  the  wind 
event  they  likely  experienced.  We  continually  encounter  a  public  that  is  convinced 
that they experienced the peak wind of the storm at their business or home location, 
while  data  and  modeling  would  suggest  substantially  lower  winds.  This  under-
standing  of  the  event  is  a  critical  factor  that  can  help  property  owners  make  judi-
cious decisions about future mitigation activities. 

In  the  aftermath  of  the  hurricanes  of  2004,  IBHS  participated  in  FEMA  Mitiga-
tion  Assessment  Teams  and  is  helping  to  prepare  reports  on  Hurricanes  Charley 
and Ivan. IBHS also worked with the University of Florida on a Florida Department 
of Community Affairs (Florida DCA) funded project to conduct a stratified statistical 
sample  based  study  of  the  relative  performance  of  buildings  built  under  the  2001 
Florida Building Code versus ones built under the Standard Building Code between 
1994 and the adoption of the 2001 Florida Building Code. IBHS is analyzing build-
ing  permits  for  reconstruction  in  Charlotte  County,  Florida  following  Hurricane 
Charley  to  assess  the  relative  performance  and  reconstruction  costs  of  buildings 
built in different eras and to different standards. IBHS has also been awarded fund-
ing from the Florida DCA to develop a web-based interactive retrofit guide for home-
owners.  We  are  working  with  builders,  state  and  national  experts  to  develop  that 
tool. 

In  addition  to  the  applied  research  related  activities  above,  IBHS  does  occasion-
ally  get  involved  in  performing  and  funding  of  research.  One  such  case  involved 
IBHS providing match funding to Clemson University to conduct full scale, destruc-
tive  testing  of  houses  in  Horry  County,  SC.  This  project  involved  testing  actual 
homes  before  and  after  hurricane  retrofits  were  applied  to  determine  how  much 
strength  was  being  added  to  the  structure  using  various  retrofit  techniques.  The 
houses were made available because they were bought out by FEMA following flood-
ing  during  Hurricane  Floyd.  Primary  funding  was  provided  by  the  South  Carolina 
Department of Insurance. IBHS is currently funding research being conducted joint-
ly  with  a  Florida  home  builder  to  investigate  ways  to  retrofit  soffit  materials  that 
suffered widespread failures during the hurricanes of 2004. 

IBHS  also  works  with  other  partners  from  time  to  time  to  fund  research  studies 
that estimate the savings provided through the implementation of new and stronger 
building codes in coastal environments. Three such reports have been prepared over 
the  past  four  years  by  Applied  Research  Associates  in  Raleigh,  NC,  for  analysis  of 
the impacts of new codes along the North Carolina, South Carolina and Texas coast-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

48

lines.  These  reports  point  to  the  dramatic  savings  over  time  that  can  be  achieved 
through the use of stronger building codes. 

The  results  of  this  research  are  used  to  help  validate  and  refine  the  mitigation 
messages that we use at IBHS. We understand how expensive it can be to properly 
retrofit  an  existing  home,  and  seek  to  create  a  demand  for  disaster  resistance  in 
new construction that will exceed the desire for carpet and appliance upgrades. 

IBHS works with Federal, State and local governments a couple of different ways 
to  support  windstorm  impact  reduction.  The  first  is  through  the  distribution  of  our 
consumer  related  materials  through  state  and  local  governments.  Oftentimes,  this 
is  accomplished  through  providing  materials  to  local  grassroots  style  organizations 
to  help  get  the  work  out  locally.  Two  notable  partners  include  South  Carolina  Sea 
Grant and North Carolina Sea Grant. The second way is participating in the build-
ing  code  adoption  process  on  the  state  level.  Over  the  past  few  years,  IBHS  has 
taken an active role in wind prone states including North Carolina, South Carolina, 
Texas,  Florida,  Louisiana  and  New  York.  Following  the  hurricanes  of  2004,  FEMA 
and member companies distributed large numbers of IBHS pamphlets that provided 
guidance  on  the  claims  process.  Members  indicated  that  information  calls  to  their 
catastrophe call-in centers dropped after the guides were distributed. 
Barriers to Adoption of Windstorm Resistance 

The  main  obstacles  to  widespread  implementation  of  windstorm  mitigation  tech-
niques  in  new  and  existing  structures  relate  directly  to  issues  of  complacency,  edu-
cation, research and cost. Throughout the country, homeowners are, in general, com-
placent  about  their  exposure  to  extreme  windstorms  or  believe  that  there  is  little 
that  can  be  done  to  provide  protection  from  the  most  intense  storms  where  people 
frequently  are  killed  or  injured.  People  who  live  in  central  Florida  have  typically 
said that the real risk is in South Florida, or the Panhandle. Likewise, builders and 
legislators  who  live  and  work  in  the  Florida  Panhandle  think  that  they  are  pro-
tected  by  a  shelf  of  cooler  water  off  their  coast  and  that  the  real  risk  in  the  Keys 
or  in  the  Carolinas.  A  major  problem  is  that  the  typical  return  periods  between 
major storms is such that people do not think it will happen to them. 

Because of this low perception of threat from windstorms, consumers are less like-
ly to spend the money required to make their homes more resistant to windstorms—
especially  when  they  can  spend  their  money  on  upgrades  they  can  enjoy  everyday 
like  granite  counter  tops  and  hardwood  floors.  The  competition  to  spend  extra 
money rarely ends with the mitigation winning out. 

The lack of data and research on the benefits of mitigation and strong codes also 
poses a barrier to the implementation of mitigation measures. The data that insur-
ers collect as a part of the claims process following a major wind event relates main-
ly  to  documenting  the  damage  that  the  policyholder  needs  compensation  for  and 
making sure the insured is compensated according to the policy coverage in a timely 
manner.  The  role  of  the  insurance  adjuster  in  such  a  scenario  is  to  document,  esti-
mate  and  pay  or  arrange  for  payment  of  covered  expenses.  Typically  there  are  ex-
treme  time  constraints  placed  on  the  adjustors  and  the  companies  they  represent 
to  review  properties  and  act  on  claims  in  a  short  time  frame.  Given  these  respon-
sibilities, it becomes too onerous (particularly in a catastrophe when large amounts 
of  disaster  victims  need  to  begin  their  recovery)  to  expect  that  the  adjuster  would 
be able to determine and document the actual causes of loss and identify mitigation 
measures that could have prevented or reduced the damage. Because of this, insur-
ance data alone provides little insight into the impact that wind mitigation can have 
on total losses. 

In  order  to  produce  meaningful  data  to  assess  the  effect  of  windstorm  mitigation 
activities,  several  things  need  to  be  known.  First,  the  actual  wind  speed  that  the 
building  was  exposed  to  needs  to  be  known.  Then,  details  as  to  what  parts  of  the 
building failed due to excessive wind force need to be documented and most probable 
causes  of  initiation  of  failure  need  to  be  identified.  By  comparing  the  wind  speed 
with  a  careful  study  of  the  failures,  researchers  can  begin  to  make  credible  quan-
tifications of the potential benefits of windstorm mitigation. 

Unfortunately, many of the NOAA Automatic Surface Observing Systems (ASOS) 
lose  power  and  stop  recording  or  reporting  wind  speed  data  during  severe  wind 
storms. There is a clear national need to harden these systems and provide backup 
power so that NOAA and all those affected by these storms have better data on sur-
face  winds  in  various  areas  impacted  by  the  storms.  In  the  interim,  to  get  better 
data on surface winds, IBHS works closely with hurricane researchers from a num-
ber  of  universities.  As  mentioned  earlier,  teams  from  Clemson  University,  the  Uni-
versity of Florida, Texas Tech University and Florida International University have 
for several years now deployed mobile wind data acquisition towers in front of land-
falling  hurricanes  to  provide  ‘‘ground  truth’’  data  on  wind  speeds  so  that  these 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

49

speeds  can  be  correlated  with  building  damage.  Hurricane  Isabel  in  2003  was  the 
first  time  that  these  mobile  towers  were  equipped  with  cellular  modems  that  al-
lowed  for  uploading  of  wind  speed  data  in  real  time  to  the  Internet.  This  informa-
tion  was  relayed  to  NOAA  and  provided  them  with  real  time  ground  truth  data. 
These systems were active in all of the 2004 hurricanes. For 2005, NOAA is making 
access to the GOES satellite available for these instruments so that data can be re-
ported in a more reliable manner and better integrated into NOAA’s analyses. 

Post  storm  analyses  have  also  been  alluded  to  earlier  in  this  testimony.  IBHS  is 
working  with  builders,  state  building  officials,  building  departments,  university  re-
searchers,  and  property  appraisers  to  accumulate  data  from  a  wide  variety  of 
sources  and  to  seek  insights  into  the  merits  of  stronger  building  codes  and  mitiga-
tion efforts. This work is ongoing. 

A  number  of  barriers  to  building  stronger  and  safer  also  relate  to  the  adoption 
and enforcement of building codes and standards. First, a large number of local com-
munities throughout the Nation have not adopted any building codes and standards 
for  residential  construction.  Second,  a  large  majority  of  local  communities  have  not 
adopted the latest model building codes without any local amendments that weaken 
the  model  provisions.  Third,  while  there  is  more  widespread  adoption  of  model 
building codes and standards for commercial properties, there are again many local 
jurisdictions  where  code  adoption  is  non-existent  or  woefully  out  of  date.  Uniform 
and  strong  enforcement  is  another  key  issue,  even  in  local  communities  that  have 
adopted the latest standards. This lack of uniformity in the baseline for construction 
of homes and businesses means that the performance of buildings is less predictable 
and  the  levels  of  risk  vary  dramatically  from  jurisdiction  to  jurisdiction.  We  find 
that  responsible  builders  have  difficulties  competing  in  areas  where  there  are  no 
building codes, which leads to building to the lowest denominator. Furthermore, we 
see national builders building differently in areas with identical design wind speeds, 
simply because the local code adopted in a particular area does not require the same 
level  of  construction  as  the  national  model  code  being  enforced  in  the  other  area. 
All  too  often,  the  local  building  code  is  treated  as  the  maximum  rather  than  the 
minimum. 

While  issues  of  states’  rights  and  local  authority  generally  keep  Federal  agencies 
from trying to mandate building codes except for Federal buildings, there are oppor-
tunities  for  the  Federal  Government  to  initiate  a  number  of  incentives  that  would 
encourage states to adopt and enforce statewide building codes without local amend-
ments  that  weaken  the  minimum  requirements.  FEMA  could  use  the  adoption  and 
enforcement of statewide building codes as criteria for providing additional pre- and 
post-disaster  mitigation  funds  to  states.  Federal  mortgage  agencies  could  provide 
lower  interest  rates  or  lower  fees  for  mortgages  on  properties  built  to  the  latest 
building codes and standards. 

Finally, many of the test and evaluation methods available for assessing the wind-
storm  performance  and  durability  of  materials,  components  and  systems  fall  short 
in  reproducing  the  true  nature  of  the  loads  and  effects  of  severe  windstorms  and/
or the effects of environmental factors on aging and associated degradation of wind-
storm  resistance.  Federal  agencies  can  play  an  important  role  in  funding  research 
and  developing  facilities  that  will  allow  the  more  realistic  simulation  of  windstorm 
loads and effects and in the development of tools and facilities for assessing the ef-
fects of aging. Some efforts along these lines have been supported through the Part-
nership  for  Advancing  Technology  in  Housing  (PATH)  through  research  and  grants 
initiated  by  the  National  Institute  for  Standards  and  Technology  and  the  National 
Science  Foundation.  Much  more  work  is  needed.  One  IBHS  member  company  re-
cently  donated  $400,000  to  Florida  International  University  to  create  a  new  wind-
storm simulation facility capable of testing actual building components and systems 
in a realistic wind and wind-driven rain environment. IBHS staff are assisting with 
the development of this facility. 
Benefit-Cost Analyses of Disaster Resistant Technologies 

As  indicated  earlier  in  this  testimony,  IBHS  with  partners  has  funded  several 
benefit-cost studies for specific building code adoption issues in Florida, North Caro-
lina and Texas. These studies have clearly demonstrated the positive benefit-cost ra-
tios  of  the  particular  provisions  under  consideration.  We  are  aware  of  a  study  con-
ducted  by  Texas  A&M  that  evaluated  the  benefit-cost  ratios  for  specific  individual 
provisions,  combinations  of  provisions  and  the  entire  code  that  related  to  the  pro-
posed  adoption  of  a  Texas  Department  of  Insurance  Wind  Resistant  Construction 
Code.  The  analysis  showed  that  the  benefit-cost  ratios  for  various  individual  provi-
sions  varied  significantly  depending  on  home  size  and  wind  climate  but  that  the 
benefit-cost ratios tended to increase and stabilize as the suite of provisions became 
more complete in addressing the most common sources of losses. For individual pro-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

50

visions, the benefit-cost ratios ranged from less than 1.0 to as high as 60 depending 
on  the  building  size  and  windstorm  intensity.  For  adoption  of  the  entire  code,  the 
benefit-cost ratios were typically in the range of 4 to 7, meaning for every additional 
dollar  spent  on  increased  construction  costs,  losses  were  reduced  by  4  to  7  dollars 
over the expected life of the property. 

FEMA has funded an independent national benefit-cost study of its mitigation ex-
penditures.  This  study  was  contracted  to  the  Multi-hazard  Mitigation  Council 
(MMC)  of  the  National  Institute  for  Building  Sciences  (NIBS).  The  MMC  hired  the 
Applied  Technology  Council  (ATC)  to  conduct  the  independent  study  and  the  ATC 
report is in the final review stages within the MMC. I represent IBHS on the MMC 
and  have  been  involved  in  the  review  of  the  ATC  report.  While  the  report  is  still 
going  through  the  final  review  stages  and  I  cannot  be  precise  in  the  numbers  that 
will  be  finally  reported,  I  can  say  that  my  assessment  is  that  with  one  exception, 
the  study  is  conservative  in  its  assumptions  and  still  shows  a  positive  benefit-cost 
ratio  for  both  the  Nation  as  a  whole  and  for  the  Federal  Treasury.  The  one  poten-
tially non-conservative aspect is the assessment of the number of deaths avoided by 
tornado  shelters  constructed  with  partial  funding  from  mitigation  grants.  However, 
even if the number of deaths avoided is reduced by an order of magnitude, the ben-
efit-cost  ratio  for  the  wind  related  mitigation  measures  is  still  positive.  With  this 
reduction  in  deaths  avoided,  we  expect  that  the  conservative  benefit-cost  ratio  for 
all  the  FEMA  funded  mitigation  measures  will  be  on  the  order  of  3,  both  for  the 
Nation as a whole and directly for the Federal Treasury. 

The  types  of  modeling  tools  needed  to  conduct  benefit-cost  studies  in  the  area  of 
windstorm  mitigation  have  been  improving  in  recent  years.  With  the  data  that  is 
being gleaned from the hurricanes of 2004, there should be significant new opportu-
nities  to  calibrate  and  validate  these  models.  The  time  is  ripe  for  a  major  effort  to 
conduct  benefit-cost  studies  to  assess  the  value  of  adopting  and  enforcing  model 
building  codes  and  standards,  and  for  building  to  code  +  levels  of  protection  from 
natural and man made hazards. 
Summary 

Windstorms  and  other  natural  disasters  happen  every  year  in  the  United  States, 
and impact thousands of homeowners and businesses. Yet we do know how to build 
homes and commercial structures so that impacts from natural disasters are signifi-
cantly  reduced.  Ongoing  research  teaches  us  more  every  year,  and  ongoing  commu-
nication  and  education  to  the  public  has  the  potential  to  reduce  losses  every  year. 
All of the stakeholders can contribute to the creation of a climate where hazard re-
sistant  construction  is  valued  and  demanded  and  where  a  myriad  of  incentives  are 
offered  that  will  encourage  local  communities  and  states  to  build  hazard  resistant 
communities that become known for their resiliency in the face of severe windstorms 
or other natural and manmade hazards. 

There are clear opportunities for the Federal Government to support research and 
the removal of barriers to the development of hazard resistant construction. We be-
lieve  that  a  good  way  would  be  to  create  incentives  for  states  to  adopt  and  enforce 
statewide model building codes and standards. NOAA and other agency support for 
wind field analyses that better communicate expected winds across regions impacted 
by  severe  windstorms  will  help  with  public  communication  of  risks  and  experience. 
We  are  also  interested  in  partnering  with  Federal  agencies  to  conduct  benefit-cost 
studies  for  building  codes  and  natural  hazard  mitigation  measures.  Appropriation 
of  new  funds  in  FY06  and  beyond  to  support  the  National  Windstorm  Hazard  Re-
duction  Program,  that  was  authorized  as  part  of  the  National  Earthquake  Hazard 
Reduction  Program,  will  further  the  IBHS  goal  of  making  communities  safer  from 
coast to coast.

Senator  DEMINT.  Your  credibility  just  went  up  a  good  bit  when 

I found you’d been at Clemson. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator DEMINT. Mr. Ahlberg? 

STATEMENT OF DOUG AHLBERG, DIRECTOR, LINCOLN–

LANCASTER COUNTY EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT 

Mr.  AHLBERG.  Thanks  very  much.  First  of  all,  it’s  an  honor  and 
a privilege to be invited to testify to you this afternoon. I am a Di-
rector  of  Emergency  Management  for  Lincoln-Lancaster  County  in 
Nebraska. As you may or may not know, on the 22nd of May of last 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

51

year,  southern  Lancaster  County  as  well  as  five  other  counties  in 
Southeastern  Nebraska  fell  victim  to  a  tornado  that  was  on  the 
ground for 54 miles. At its widest point it was two and a half miles 
wide,  and  on  the  Fujita  Scale  it  had  an  F  rating  of  four.  Because 
of  the  forecasting  and  this  information  that  was  provided  to  us  by 
the  National  Weather  Service  out  at  Valley,  we  lost  one  person, 
and had 37 injuries that basically did not require an overnight stay 
at the hospital, so we were extremely fortunate. Without those fore-
casts, I think that the numbers would have been considerably high-
er as a direct result of the storm. 

Now, Lincoln and Lancaster and a county called Saline and Gage 
are the only three counties in the State of Nebraska that have been 
certified  by  the  National  Weather  Service  as  being  storm-ready. 
This is kind of an accreditation of our abilities to report and to pro-
vide for advanced warning in the approach of severe weather. Last 
spring, the National Weather Service initiated out of Valley a con-
ference call system where if they are predicting severe weather for 
the  Southeastern  portion  of  the  State  of  Nebraska,  all  emergency 
managers  and  local  broadcasters  are  provided  an  opportunity  to 
participate in that conference call. 

Now,  just  a  couple  of  weeks  ago  we  had  a  conference  call  with 
the anticipation of severe weather, and that was during the NCAA 
baseball  regional  that  was  held  in  Lincoln,  so  it  was  with  quite  a 
bit  of  interest  that  I  participated  in  that  particular  telephone  call. 
We had well over 6,500 people that were in attendance at one ball 
field at that particular time. Ten minutes after the first pitch of the 
evening game, the National Weather Service put Lincoln and Lan-
caster  County  in  a  tornado  warning.  With  the  advanced  informa-
tion  that  we  had  we  were  able  to  have  the  necessary  precautions 
in place to allow for the events that did follow after that announce-
ment  was  made.  But  that  brings  me  to  one  of  the  concerns  that  I 
have  and  the  consideration  I  would  like  for  NOAA  to  look  at,  and 
that  is  a  warning  was  issued,  we  were  begging  and  pleading  with 
people  to  leave  their  seats  to  take  shelter  because  of  the  warning 
that  was  issued,  and  the  response  that  we  got  was,  ‘‘Well,  we’ve 
had  five  or  six  already,  and  nothing’s  occurred,  so  we’ll  just  stay 
here in our seats and see what happens.’’ I really would have liked 
to  see,  it  isn’t  going  to  cost  anybody  a  dime  to  look  at  a  third  tier 
of  warnings  to  be  established,  especially  when  you  talk  about  se-
vere  weather,  it’s  kind  of  like  your  timer,  it’s  green,  yellow,  red,  it 
doesn’t  go  from  green  to  red,  there’s  this  little  intermediate  step 
that’s  in  the  middle,  and  that  would  allow  people  an  opportunity 
to  know  that  there  is  a  tornado  vortex  that  is  present  in  Doppler 
radar,  and  to  add  significance  to  the  word  ‘‘warning,’’  and  that 
would  be  that  a  storm  has  been  confirmed  in  one  form  or  another. 
Right now, people listen to a warning and we issue five or six and 
nothing  occurs,  they  really  don’t  pay  any  attention  to  it.  They 
should,  and  I  think  everybody  knows  that  we  should,  but  I  think 
we  have  a  tendency  to  become  rather  apathetic  after  awhile,  espe-
cially when you’re confronted with it almost on a daily basis during 
the months of April, May and June, especially in Nebraska. 

Now,  several  years  ago,  and  this  is  my  second  concern,  the  Na-
tional Weather Service combined in the Lincoln and Omaha region, 
as far as providing weather service to a particular part of our state. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

52

The  National  Weather  Service  out  of  Valley  covers  30  counties  in 
Nebraska  and  9  in  Western  Iowa,  that  runs  from  the  South  Da-
kota/Nebraska  border  on  the  north,  to  the  Kansas  border  on  the 
south,  and  I  think  that  oftentimes  bigger  is  not  better.  As  far  as 
consolidation  is  concerned,  the  technological  advances  that  you 
have  seen  over  the  past  few  years,  the  total  number  of  improve-
ments  that  you’ve  seen  in  forecasting  still  relies  on  those  fore-
casters  that  are  sitting  there  making  those  predictions  and  pro-
viding us with those forecasts. Now, Lancaster County alone is 864 
square miles, and we have a population of around 246,000. Omaha, 
the  largest  city  in  the  State  of  Nebraska,  is  also  included  in  the 
service area provided by Valley. 

Now  Lincoln  and  Lancaster  County  is  55  miles  away  from  the 
National  Weather  Service  radar  site  in  Valley.  Again,  bigger  isn’t 
necessarily better, and I would hate to see additional forms of con-
solidation of the radar services, and what National Weather Radar 
Sites we presently have across the whole country. 

Now, since September 11, 2001, Homeland Security has invested 
millions of dollars to deter terrorism, and for that, we in Nebraska 
are  very  thankful.  However,  does  Mother  Nature  fit  the  definition 
of  a  terrorist?  I  think  so,  and  I  think  that  moneys  can  be  wisely 
spend  to  improve  NOAA’s  capabilities  to  provide  for  the  safety  of 
those folks that live in those coverage areas. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Ahlberg follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DOUG AHLBERG, DIRECTOR, LINCOLN/LANCASTER COUNTY 

EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT 

I  have  come  here  today  to  discuss  two  topics  which  are  important  to  those  of  us 
who  live  in  the  Midwest  and  both  topics  are  related  to  severe  weather.  The  first 
topic I will discuss is our severe weather warning system and the second topic con-
cerns our weather forecasters. 

On  May  22,  2004,  southern  Lancaster  County,  along  with  5  other  counties,  fell 
victim  to  a  tornado  that  was  on  the  ground  for  54  miles,  had  a  damage  path  at  its 
widest  point  of  21⁄2 miles,  and  an  F4  rating  on  the  Fujita  scale.  One  death  was  re-
ported  and  a  total  of  37  injuries  were  reported  as  this  storm  decimated  the  Village 
of Hallam. 

The National Weather Service in Valley, Nebraska, along with local broadcasters, 
provided  the  citizens  of  southern  Lancaster  County  and  surrounding  counties  with 
a minute by minute forecast of the tornado’s path and projected future movements. 
Without  these  warnings,  there  is  no  doubt  in  my  mind  that  the  number  of  deaths 
and/or injuries would have been much greater. 

Lancaster,  Saline  and  Gage  Counties  were  affected  by  this  particular  storm  and 
are  the  only  3  counties  in  the  State  of  Nebraska,  on  May  22,  2004,  to  have  been 
certified by NOAA as ‘‘Storm Ready’’ counties. Since last spring the Weather Service 
in  Valley  has  initiated  a  conference  call  program  for  all  Emergency  Managers  and 
media  representatives  in  their  coverage  area.  The  purpose  of  this  conference  call  is 
to  provide  information  about  the  possibility  of  severe  weather  on  any  given  date. 
During  a  recent  NCAA  regional  baseball  tournament  in  Lincoln  (where  over  4500 
people  were  seated),  this  advance  information  was  extremely  helpful  in  preparing 
for  the  possibility  of  tornadic  activity  in  the  area  of  Lincoln.  Within  10  minutes  of 
the  first  pitch  of  the  evening  game,  Lincoln  and  Lancaster  County  were  placed  in 
a  tornado  ‘‘warning’’.  Advance  precautionary  information  provided  to  us  allowed  for 
a timely response to this ‘‘warning’’. 

One  suggestion  I  would  like  to  make  with  regard  to  watches  and  warnings  is  to 
provide for three (3) phases of weather warnings rather than the two (2) which are 
currently  being  used.  An  example  of  a  three-tiered  system  would  be  a  tornado 
‘‘watch’’,  tornado  ‘‘alert’’,  and  a  tornado  ‘‘warning’’.  Currently,  a  ‘‘watch’’  and  a 
‘‘warning’’  are  used.  The  addition  of  the  ‘‘alert’’  would  indicate  a  radar  image  of  a 
tornado vortex signature. Then a tornado ‘‘warning’’ would be issued when a tornado 
is confirmed. This would be very similar to a signal light with the green, yellow and 
red.  I  feel  that  often  when  a  ‘‘warning’’  is  issued  and  nothing  happens,  the  general 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

53

public begins to question the validity of the ‘‘warning’’. Adding the additional ‘‘alert’’ 
advisory would allow for the seriousness of the ‘‘warning’’ to have significant impact. 
Several  years  ago  Lincoln  and  Omaha’s  weather  services  were  combined  and 
placed  in  Valley,  Nebraska.  All  Emergency  Managers  would  like  to  have  a  weather 
service in their own backyard and we all understand that is not practical. However, 
the  service  area  for  each  weather  service  site  has  been  increased  dramatically.  The 
service  area  for  the  Valley  Weather  Service  consists  of  30  counties  in  eastern  Ne-
braska  and  8  counties  in  western  Iowa.  This  service  area  extends  from  the  Ne-
braska/South  Dakota  boundary  on  the  north  to  the  Nebraska/Kansas  boundary  on 
the  south.  With  the  consolidation  of  facilities  and  the  increase  of  service  area  size, 
an additional burden has been placed on those forecasters tasked with warning over 
half of the State of Nebraska’s total population. 

Lancaster  County  alone  consists  of  864  square  miles  that  had  become  extremely 
urbanized,  with  a  large  portion  of  the  population  moving  into  a  rural-type  setting. 
With  a  population  of  over  246,000,  Lancaster  County  is  over  55  miles  from  our 
weather  service  provider  in  Valley,  Nebraska.  Sometimes  bigger  is  better,  but  not 
necessarily when dealing with public safety issues. Consolidation of facilities, when 
dealing  with  weather  issues,  is  not  the  solution  that  provides  the  best  service  for 
those living in areas affected by severe weather. 

Since  September  11,  2001,  Homeland  Security  has  invested  millions  of  dollars  to 
prevent  acts  of  terrorism.  Does  ‘‘Mother  Nature’’  meet  the  definition  of  a  terrorist? 
I think so. 

In  conclusion,  I  have  come  here  today  to  ask  that  you  consider  two  issues.  The 
first  one  is  that  you  consider  adding  a  third  tier  to  the  warning  system  used  for 
severe weather. The second issue is that you reconsider the size of the service areas 
that the National Weather Service forecasters have to work with. Our lives depend 
on the accuracy of the weather forecasts and our warning system. 

Thank you.

Senator  DEMINT.  I  think  calling  Mother  Nature  a  terrorist  will 
be  right  up  there  with  some  of  the  great  comments  in  history,  so 
thank you for making that in our Committee today. 

I’m  going  to  yield  to  our  Ranking  Member,  Senator  Nelson,  to 

begin the questions. 

Senator BEN NELSON. Well, thank you, Mr. Chairman, thank you 
for  that  privilege,  and  Mr.  Ahlberg,  it’s  great  to  have  you  here.  I 
think  one  of  the  reasons  you  had  trouble  trying  to  get  the  people 
to  leave  the  stadium  is  Nebraska  was  leading  the  Miami  Hurri-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.
1
b
h
a

l

54

canes,  they  were  a  little  bit  worried  about  their  luck  changing  if 
they left the field. 

Maybe  you  could  give  us  an  idea  of  some  of  the  things  that  you 
do  to  achieve  that  certification  so  that  you  can  show  how  you  deal 
with the communities in the Lincoln and Lancaster outreach in the 
communities  that  provided  some  benefit  in  this  particularly  dev-
astating tornado. 

Mr.  AHLBERG.  The  National  Weather  Service,  by  certifying  us, 
brings  up  a  lot  of  protocols  that  we  have  to  meet.  My  grandfather 
told me a long time ago, if it’s fact, it’s not brag. We are very fortu-
nate in Lancaster County to have one of the premiere spotters net-
works  anywhere  in  the  country.  As  a  matter  of  fact,  2  weeks  ago, 
National  Geographic  sent  a  film  crew  to  my  emergency  operation 
center  to  basically  document  how  we  function  with  that  spotters 
network.  That’s  only  part  of  it.  Our  ability  to  get  warnings  out, 
whether  it’s  through  NOAA’s  weather  radio,  all  hazard  radios, 
whether  it’s  through  tone  alert  receivers,  whether  it’s  through  our 
ability to interrupt cable vision, the use of the VAS systems, all of 
these  things  are  part  of  the  certifications  to  ensure  that  we’re  get-
ting this information out. We have looked at alternatives of getting 
those  particular  warnings  out,  one  of  which  is  a  reverse  911  call-
back  system  on  the  telephone,  but  that’s  something  that’s  ex-
tremely  expensive  to  accomplish.  A  lot  of  people  have  the  feeling, 
we’ll  rely  on  outside  warning  devices,  the  outside  warning  sirens, 
that’s  all  well  and  good  if  you  have  one  in  your  backyard  at  two 
o’clock  in  the  morning,  but  it’s  not  going  to  wake  you  up,  they  are 
outside  warning  devices,  and  we  have  a  large  number  of  those  in 
our  county,  we  looked  at  this  emergency  callback  system  that 
would  make  3,500  phone  calls  a  minute,  I  think  in  the  last  guber-
natorial  race  that  we  had  in  Nebraska,  I  was  receiving  some  of 
those  phone  calls  in  the  evening  with  a  political  message,  but  it  is 
something  that  is  relatively  expensive,  and  when  you  get  into  the 
smaller populated states, the smaller populated counties, that is an 
additional cost that they cannot afford. This particular system, you 
can  GIS  it,  you  can  GPS  it,  you  can  have  it  call  back  by  prefix 
numbers, you can have it call back by zip codes—all of these things 
that will wake a person up when there’s a life-threatening situation 
at  two  o’clock  in  the  morning,  I  think  should  be  looked  at,  and 
that’s technology that we have available right now. The problem is, 
like everything, it costs dollars to pay for it. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Having  toured  the  Hallam,  Nebraska  site 
a  day  after  the  storm,  seeing  the  devastation  that  was  there,  it’s 
remarkable  that  anyone  survived,  and  I  remember  visiting  with  a 
gentleman  whose  house  was  entirely  gone,  including  the  bathtub, 
and  he  survived  by  wrapping  himself  around  the  commode  and 
held on and survived while everything else left him. The power and 
sometimes the suddenness of a tornado, even with a warning, does 
create a need for such devices as the reverse 911, and in your opin-
ion,  are  you  comfortable  with  any  kind  of  reduction  of  funding  for 
the National Weather Service? 

Mr. AHLBERG. No. 
Senator  BEN NELSON.  I  appreciate  that  answer.  As  you  think 
about  it,  are  there  other  ways  to  supplement  the  work  of  the  Na-
tional Weather Service at the local level with what you do? Do you 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

55

work  back  and  forth  and  make  their  job  more  doable,  certainly 
their ability to reach out, better? 

Mr.  AHLBERG.  I  don’t  know  if  I  make  it—sometimes  I  think  I 
make  it  very  uncomfortable  for  them  with  some  of  the  requests 
that  I  make,  as  do  most  of  the  emergency  managers  around  the 
country,  it’s  a  resource  that  I  don’t  think  we  can  do  without,  first 
of  all.  I  don’t  think  with  the  technology  that  we  have,  the  ability 
to  dovetail  all  of  those  technological  advances  with  the  National 
Weather  Service,  with  commercially  produced  weather  sentry  sys-
tems through meteorologics, Accuweather, all of those things dove-
tailed together to give us the best possible solution, to provide ade-
quate  warning  for  severe  weather,  especially  in  the  Midwest.  Like 
you said, Senator, it’s rather spontaneous, it develops rather quick-
ly.  No  offense,  but  hurricanes  basically  take  a  long  time  to  evolve 
and to have a landfall. For example the other night, Seward Coun-
ty, which is west of Lancaster County, was placed in a severe thun-
derstorm warning. That storm moved in and dissipated as it moved 
into  Lancaster  County.  As  it  approached  the  middle  portion  of  our 
county, it again increased in severity, and again, Lancaster County 
was placed in the severe thunderstorm warning, so these things de-
veloped rather quickly. 

I’m not a meteorologist, I’m not a weather forecaster, but we rely 
quite  heavily  on  their  expertise,  and  those  forecasters’  information 
that  they  provide  us,  and  that’s  why  when  you  talk  about  consoli-
dating  facilities,  you’re  still  talking  about  the  human  element  of 
looking at the radar and making that forecast, and you could have 
four  or  five  in  one  particular  geographic  area,  storms  that  develop 
that are taking up every waning minute of those forecasters to en-
sure  that  they  have  proper  information  provided  to  us  as  emer-
gency managers and to the general public. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Well,  thank  you  very  much  for  what  you 

do and for being here today, and thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

Senator  DEMINT.  Thank  you,  Senator,  I’ve  got  pages  worth  of 
questions  I  wish  I  could  ask  all  of  you,  but  I’ve  got  to  run  to  the 
next  meeting.  This  has  been  so  helpful  to  us,  I  assure  all  of  your 
comments will be in the record, and we may be getting back to all 
of  you  on  things  that  we’re  following  up  on.  Mr.  Walsh,  it  is  good 
to  hear  that  you  have  a  good  working  relationship  between  the 
media  and  the  Weather  Service,  just  some  good  things  to  work 
with. We appreciate it, and you are dismissed. 

[Whereupon, at 4:30 p.m., the Subcommittee adjourned.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

A P P E N D I X

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JIM DEMINT TO

MAX MAYFIELD 

Question 1. You testified that intensity prediction is one of the greatest challenges 
facing  hurricane  prediction.  Can  you  explain  why  intensity  is  not  one  of  NOAA’s 
GPRA metrics and whether you plan to include it in the future? 

Answer.  Given  the  large  number  and  variety  of  basic  science  issues  associated 
with  intensity  prediction,  including  questions  concerning  observation  and  modeling 
improvements required to improve hurricane intensity forecasts, it has been difficult 
to  determine  an  appropriate  goal  under  the  Government  Performance  Results  Act 
(GPRA).  To  formulate  an  appropriate  GPRA  measure,  first,  an  internal  NOAA  Na-
tional  Weather  Service  intensity  performance  measure  was  created,  which  calls  for 
a  30  percent  reduction  of  the  intensity  error  by  2015.  Second,  while  we  review  and 
monitor  the  internal  measure  we  must  simultaneously  begin  to  (1)  address  the 
many science issues and surrounding questions, and (2) make progress on the inten-
sity  issue  through  a  multi-pronged  approach  involving:  (a)  improved  observations; 
(b)  improved  models;  and  (c)  an  independent  science  review  team  focused  on  the 
hurricane  intensity  forecast  issue.  A  GPRA  appropriate  measure  will  result  from 
this process. 

NOAA has already committed to improving intensity forecasts by:
• Developing  the  ability  to  collect  high-resolution  data  and  observations  through 
NOAA’s  Gulfsteam-IV  (G–IV)  jet.  The  aircraft  is  being  outfitted  with  Doppler 
tail radar to provide unprecedented precipitation and wind field data to aid our 
understanding of the circulation of a hurricane throughout the depth of the tro-
posphere.
• Installing  seven  new  marine  buoys  at  high  priority  sites  in  the  Caribbean  and 
Atlantic  Ocean.  Forecasters  require  highly  accurate  real-time  measurements  of 
wave  height,  wind  speeds,  and  surface  pressures  to  run  hurricane  models  and 
ground-truth  satellite  observations.  These  new  buoys  address  gaps  in  the  cur-
rent  marine  buoy  network,  providing  forecasters  with  an  early  warning  system 
of marine observations in the open ocean.
• Developing  the  next  generation  hurricane  model,  the  Hurricane  Weather  Re-
search  and  Forecast  model  (HWRF).  The  HWRF  is  a  high-resolution  coupled 
air-sea-land prediction system that relies on advanced physics and will be oper-
ational by 2007. The HWRF will assimilate high-resolution G–IV data from the 
inner  core  of  the  hurricane  with  other  operational  buoy,  aircraft  and  satellite 
observations  surrounding  the  hurricane  system.  NOAA  also  has  committed  to 
increasing  the  computational  speed  required  to  run  this  improved  model,  and 
to  make  the  results  available  to  the  forecasters  in  the  Tropical  Prediction  Cen-
ter/National Hurricane Center on a real-time basis.
• Accelerating  enhancements  to  the  Global  Forecast  System  (GFS)  and  Geo-
physical Fluid Dynamics Laboratory (GFDL) model, which have shown promise 
in improving forecasts of intensity (strength), and structure (size) of hurricanes 
so far this season.
• Establishing  a  Hurricane  Intensity  Research  Working  Group  (HIRWG)  under 
the  auspices  of  the  NOAA  Science  Advisory  Board  to  review  current  plans  and 
make  recommendations  to  accelerate  improvements  in  intensity  forecasts.  The 
HIRWG  can  also  assist  NOAA  in  establishing  credible  goals,  leading  to  mean-
ingful  GPRA  goals,  in  intensity  forecasts  that  can  be  addressed  through  im-
provements in science, observations, and modeling.

Question  2.  Does  the  National  Hurricane  Center  plan  to  link  State  Department 

of Transportation evacuation plans on its website? 

Answer. The Tropical Prediction Center/National Hurricane Center provides links 
to  emergency  management  Internet  sites  for  all  hurricane-vulnerable  states.  Some 
of  these  state  websites  include  information  on  evacuation  zone  and  route  maps. 

(57)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

58

These  are  locally  tailored  products,  which  the  public  can  use  in  their  personal  dis-
aster planning. These maps incorporate the findings from the evacuation plans into 
a format that is more easily used by the public. 

In addition, the NOAA Coastal Services Center is working with hurricane-vulner-
able states to develop a single Internet site that enables citizens to locate and map 
hurricane  evacuation  zones.  Mapping  these  zones  helps  citizens  become  more  pre-
pared  to  evacuate  and  avoid  the  potentially  life-threatening  affects  of  a  hurricane. 
This work-in-progress can be visited at http://www.csc.noaa.gov/hezltool/.

Question  3.  NOAA’s  GPRA  track  error  target  for  2004  was  129-mile  error,  and 
your  actual  performance  was  94-mile  error.  The  2003  actual  track  error  was  107-
mile  and  in  2002  it  was  124-mile  error.  The  Weather  Service  has  been  exceeding 
its 2004 target since 2002. Additionally, your FY 2010 target (124 miles) is the same 
as  its  2002  actual  performance.  Do  you  continue  to  believe  this  target  is  still  of 
value  and  if  not  will  you  be  revising  the  metric?  Are  you  considering  longer  time 
frame  GPRA  targets?  Is  the  recent  performance  anomalous  and  do  you  expect  per-
formance to degrade? 

Answer. Since 1995, we have seen a marked increase in the number of hurricanes 
in  the  deep  tropics.  These  systems  typically  take  long,  primarily  straight  tracks 
through  an  uncomplicated  environment  and,  as  a  result,  are  associated  with  rel-
atively low track forecast errors. For seasons in which much of the hurricane activ-
ity  occurs  at  higher  latitudes  (such  as  in  El  Nin˜ o  years),  the  Tropical  Prediction 
Center/National  Hurricane  Center  usually  registers  higher  average  forecast  errors. 
GPRA  targets  are  developed  based  on  analysis  of  long  term  performance  thereby 
taking into account this year-to-year natural variability. Therefore, it would be pre-
mature to extrapolate the recent downward trend in forecast errors to derive a new 
GPRA  target.  Overall,  however,  we  would  expect  forecast  errors  to  decrease  as  we 
continue  to  make  improvements  to  our  observing  systems  and  forecast  models,  and 
we  continue  to  review  and  analyze  past  performance  to  determine  when  downward 
revision of the GPRA goal may be appropriate.

Question 4. Please detail, with cost estimates, what tools, both computational and 
observational, are necessary to increase the effectiveness of hurricane intensity pre-
dictions. 

Answer.  The  computational  tools  and  observational  platforms  necessary  to  in-
crease our effectiveness of hurricane intensity forecasting are included in current ef-
forts  (FY  2005)  and  planned  for  FY  2006.  Again,  these  efforts  are  consistent  with 
our three-pronged approach to address the hurricane intensity forecast issue, by ad-
dressing:

Observations: 

• Hurricane Buoys. 

—The  procurement  and  deployment  of  hurricane  buoys  provides  forecasters 
highly  accurate  real-time  measurements  and  fills  data  gaps  in  the  current  ma-
rine  buoy  network.  The  Military  Construction  Appropriations  and  Emergency 
Hurricane  Supplemental  Appropriations  Act,  2005  (Pub.L.  108-324)  provided 
$1.8M  for  the  purchase  and  deployment  of  7  Hurricane  Data  Buoys  for  the 
South Atlantic and Caribbean. 

• Satellite observations. 

—Significant  efforts  are  ongoing  in  applying  the  latest  technology  to  future  re-
mote-sensing instrumentation. 

• Reconnaissance and Surveillance Aircraft. 

—Aircraft upgrades, including G–IV Doppler radar, are underway that will pro-
vide  new  data  sources  for  assimilation  into  future  hurricane  models.  The  Mili-
tary  Construction  Appropriations  and  Emergency  Hurricane  Supplemental  Ap-
propriations Act, 2005 (Pub.L. 108-324) provided $3.5M for G–IV Doppler radar.

Modeling: 

• Enhancements to the Global Forecast System (GFS) including data assimilation 
activities  that  effectively  use  satellite  and  high  resolution  ground-based  radar 
data. 
• Implementation  of  the  Hurricane  Weather  and  Research  Forecasting  (HWRF) 
system  is  scheduled  for  2006  with  full  implementation  expected  in  2007.  The 
Military  Construction  Appropriations  and  Emergency  Hurricane  Supplemental 
Appropriations Act, 2005 (Pub.L. 108-324) provided $1.0M to accelerate HWRF. 

Research: 

• The  Joint  Hurricane  Testbed  currently  has  12  projects  active,  focused  on  the 
mission  to  rapidly  and  smoothly  transfer  new  technology,  research  results,  and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

59

observational  advances  of  the  United  States  Weather  Research  Program  into 
operational  forecast  products.  The  Military  Construction  Appropriations  and 
Emergency  Hurricane  Supplemental  Appropriations  Act,  2005  (Pub.L.  108-324) 
provided $0.7M to improve Hurricane Intensity Model development.

Short-term intensity forecasts can be improved indirectly through model guidance 
provided  to  forecasters  and  directly  through  improving  the  surface  observing  net-
work  available  to  the  forecasters.  Proposed  additional  buoys  and  improvements  to 
dropsondes will contribute to such advances. Those platforms, however, provide lim-
ited  spatial  and  temporal  resolution,  e.g.,  relatively  isolated  point  observations  in 
the  case  of  buoys.  A  longer-term  solution  to  specify  at  high  resolution  the  surface 
wind field over the areas covered by hurricanes requires additional advances in sat-
ellite  technology.  At  present,  such  systems  as  Quikscat  and  SSM/I  do  not  provide 
accurate  surface  wind  information  in  areas  of  precipitation.  These  precipitation 
areas are of great importance in hurricanes. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. TED STEVENS TO

DENNIS MCCARTHY 

Question  1.  Dr.  Syun  Akasofu,  the  Director  of  the  International  Arctic  Research 
Center of the University of Alaska has provided my office with satellite photographs 
of a typhoon type storm in the Bering Sea close to Barrow. Additionally, in October 
2004  Alaska’s  West  Coast  (Nome)  experienced  a  ‘‘Coastal  Storm’’  (the  equivalent  in 
millibars  Low  Pressure)  to  a  Category  4  Hurricane.  What  are  the  National  Hurri-
cane  Center  and  the  National  Weather  Service  working  on  to  broaden  ‘‘warning’’ 
and  ‘‘watch’’  notifications  and  to  increase  their  ability  for  all  parts  of  the  country 
and specifically Alaska? 

Answer. The October 2004 coastal storm proved to be one of the strongest storms 
on record for the western Arctic coast of Alaska. While loss of property was unavoid-
able in this instance, lives and personal property were protected through nearly un-
precedented  lead  time,  education,  outreach,  mitigation  and  preparedness  activities 
provided by NOAA’s National Weather Service (NWS), working closely with Alaska’s 
Department of Homeland Security and Emergency Management. NOAA’s numerical 
weather  prediction  and  ocean  wave  models  performed  unusually  well,  especially 
given  that  this  storm  had  its  origins  as  an  ex-typhoon  originating  in  the  western 
Pacific (where lives were lost in Japan). 

NWS  forecasters  provided  3  days  of  lead  time  to  emergency  managers  and  the 
public,  allowing  physical  mitigations  to  be  erected  and  evacuations  to  take  place 
well  in  advance  of  the  initial  winds.  The  NWS,  working  with  emergency  managers, 
has  for  several  years  used  a  special  ‘‘Hurricane-Force  Wind  Warning’’  for  use  in 
these circumstances, to draw attention to non-tropical hurricane-force winds. 

Forecasters and managers do plan for such cases using guidance provided by mod-
els  and  forecasters  at  the  NWS  National  Centers  for  Environmental  Prediction 
(NCEP),  as  well  as  guidance  developed  by  the  NWS  Meteorological  Development 
Laboratory  on  storm  surge  in  Alaska.  These  guidance  sources  need  improvements, 
especially  over  the  North  Pacific,  where  upstream  weather  observation  data  (over 
Asia and the Pacific Ocean) is particularly sparse. NOAA’s efforts to deploy an Inte-
grated Ocean Observing System (IOOS), as part of the Global Earth Observing Sys-
tem of Systems (GEOSS), will help fill the data void.

Question 2. The National Weather Service in Alaska has limited ability to predict 
severe weather and storms. The lower 48 contiguous states have overlapping weath-
er radar, Alaska on the other hand has 7 radar sites, and only about a sixth of the 
state has weather radar coverage. Alaska does have satellite coverage but satellites 
don’t  show  storm  severity.  For  example,  there  is  no  radar  coverage  over  Yakutat, 
so Cape Fair-Weather, when there is heavy traffic of commercial vessels, is literally 
without storm severity forecasts. What is and could be done to improve weather pre-
diction coverage in Alaska? 

Answer.  The  NWS  has  an  effective  weather  warning  program  in  Alaska.  The 
NWS  modernization  resulted  in  significant  improvements  and  advances  in  weather 
technology  and  in  forecast  and  warning  services.  Radar  siting  throughout  the 
United States was carefully considered. Nearly  1⁄3 of Alaska by area, and nearly  2⁄3 
by population, is covered by NWS Doppler radar technology below 10,000 feet. Given 
the terrain and climate, it is cost prohibitive to establish full radar coverage via de-
ployment  of  additional  NEXRAD  radars.  We  are  exploring  the  use  of  other  radars, 
owned by other government agencies and private industry, to supplement the exist-
ing radar coverage. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

60

Significant  improvements  to  Alaska’s  weather  prediction  capabilities,  and  exten-
sion  of  lead  times  for  gale  and  storm  conditions  for  commercial  vessels,  will  come 
mainly  from  improved  modeling.  When  data  is  effectively  assimilated,  increases  in 
satellite  and  in-situ  observations  will  have  the  greatest  direct  impact  to  model  per-
formance.  The  National  Polar  Orbiting  Environmental  Satellite  System  (NPOESS) 
will  greatly  enhance  our  observational  capabilities  in  this  data  sparse  region,  and 
significant  improvements  in  modeling  and  forecasts  are  expected  to  result  from 
NPOESS deployment.

Question 3. Alaska is not part of the National Lightning Detection System, which 
is provided year round to the lower 48 states by the National Weather Service. The 
Bureau of Land Management (BLM) provides lightning information for Alaska—but 
only  from  April  thru  October  (fire  season)  of  each  year,  but  it  does  not  report  data 
to the National Weather Service East of Longitude 140 West (Yakutat). My staff has 
been  briefed  that  the  data  exists,  but  not  supplied  because  it  also  shows  data  be-
longing to Canada. This communications breakdown leaves citizens in cities like Ju-
neau  (the  State  Capital  of  Alaska)  with  no  advanced  storm  warning.  What  is  the 
Department  of  Commerce  doing  to  obtain  an  international  agreement  with  Canada 
to allow lightning detection reporting in South East Alaska? Additionally, why isn’t 
Alaska  part  of  the  National  Weather  Service’s  National  Lightning  Detection  Sys-
tem? 

Answer. The Department of the Interior’s Bureau of Land Management has a con-
tract  with  a  private  vendor  to  supply  lightning  data.  There  is  only  one  vendor  and 
consequently only one National Lightning Detection System at this time. The NWS 
uses  the  BLM  contract  to  obtain  data.  As  of  now,  there  are  no  sensors  in  Alaska. 
Expansion of the National Lightning Detection System into Alaska is under consid-
eration  as  part  of  the  National  contract.  At  the  same  time,  the  NWS  is  developing 
an  agreement  to  acquire  Environment  Canada’s  Canadian  Lightning  Data  (CLD). 
This  will  provide  data  East  of  Longitude  140  West.  As  a  demonstration,  the  NWS 
Alaska Region accessed the CLD data during the current 2005 fire weather season. 
In  addition,  the  NWS  is  also  in  the  process  of  negotiating  with  the  Department  of 
the  Interior’s  Bureau  of  Land  Management  (BLM)  on  expanding  their  sensor  net-
work.  This  negotiation  could  potentially  lead  to  the  BLM  acquiring  two  additional 
sensors  within  the  next  two  years.  These  efforts  will  strengthen  the  CLD  and  the 
BLM Alaska lightning detection network. The NWS and the Meteorological Services 
of Canada have been strong partners for many decades.

Question  4.  Nine  of  the  twelve  remote  weather  facilities  in  Alaska  are  old  and  in 

poor repair. What is NOAA doing to upgrade these facilities? 

Answer.  NOAA’s  National  Weather  Service  has  an  Alaska  Region  facilities  up-
grade program to address safety and building code violations. The program success-
fully acquired new housing at our facilities in Kotzebue and Annette in 2005. In ad-
dition,  the  Saint  Paul  office  is  currently  under  renovation  and  a  contract  for  new 
housing  has  been  awarded.  Housing  at  Cold  Bay  has  also  been  renovated  as  well 
as  the  office  in  Kodiak.  Additionally,  the  Weather  Service  Office  in  Annette  is  in 
the design phase, which includes plans for construction under the U.S. Green Build-
ing  Council’s  Leadership  in  Energy  and  Environment  guidelines.  Future  plans  will 
consider office projects in Nome and Barrow and housing projects in McGrath, Bar-
row,  Nome,  Valdez,  and  Yakutat.  However,  these  are  major  long-term  projects  that 
require significant planning.

Question 5. Climate impacts such as coastal erosion, melting glaciers, drought and 
flooding are all occurrences happening in Alaska. In discussions on Climate Change, 
scientists have been calling Alaska the ‘‘Canary in the Coal Mine’’ implying it is the 
Climate  Change  warning  area  for  the  rest  of  the  world.  We  have  data  scarcity  on 
Global  Climate  change  partially  because  current  technology  and  equipment  are  not 
being placed in Alaska. What is NOAA doing to correct this oversight? 

Answer.  NOAA  is  supporting  enhancement  of  the  International  Arctic  Buoy  Pro-
gram  to  provide  ice  thickness  measurements  in  the  Arctic  Ocean  north  of  Alaska 
to track the changes in thickness of multi-year ice and to learn how changes in the 
atmosphere  and  the  ocean  are  affecting  the  ice.  An  ice  profiling  sonar  system  is  lo-
cated  in  the  Chukchi  Sea  north  of  Alaska  to  determine  changes  in  the  seasonal  ice 
zone that affects the Alaska northern coast. 

The expansion of the Climate Reference Network (CRN) is progressing in Alaska, 
with  two  CRN  sites  installed  in  2002  and  three  sites  in  2005.  These  sites  will  pro-
vide a reliable record of climate variability and change in this climate sensitive envi-
ronment.  NOAA  is  aggressively  partnering  with  other  State,  Federal,  and  non-gov-
ernmental  agencies  (such  as  the  Alaska  Ocean  Observing  System)  to  develop  re-
quirements,  plans,  funding  mechanisms,  and  priorities  for  installation  of  new  cli-
mate observing (and modeling) capabilities in Alaska. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

61

In  2007,  we  will  celebrate  International  Polar  Year.  NOAA  supports  the  concept 
of an International Polar Year. The International Polar Year is an ideal opportunity 
to  advance  observations  of  the  polar  region.  NOAA  uses  polar  observations  in  sup-
port  each  of  its  four  strategic  goals,  and  has  responsibility  for  archiving  and  long-
term stewardship of the data, and its application to societal needs. 

The  question  suggests  that  drought  is  occurring  in  Alaska.  Drought  is  not  cur-
rently  a  problem  in  Alaska.  Visit  http://www.drought.unl.edu/dm/monitor.html  to 
view an up to date U.S. drought monitor map. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO

DENNIS MCCARTHY 

Question  1.  Does  the  National  Weather  Service  (NWS)  plan  to  include  three-di-
mensional ceilometry, a technology developed with NWS funds, into the Automated 
Surface Observation System (ASOS) upgrade plan? 

Answer. The three-dimensional ceilometry technology has been explored under the 
Small  Business  Innovation  Research  (SBIR)  program.  While  the  technology  shows 
some promise, its development is not yet at a stage where we have been able to in-
corporate  it  into  the  Automated  Surface  Observation  System  (ASOS)  upgrade  plan. 
The  Automated  Surface  Observing  System  Product  Improvement  (ASOS  PI)  Pro-
gram  is  currently  replacing  the  existing  ceilometers,  because  (1)  they  are  not 
logistically  supportable  beyond  2007;  (2)  the  height  range  is  to  be  increased  from 
12,000 feet to 25,000 feet [at most sites], and (3) the height range is to be increased 
to 40,000 feet [at ∼240 sites] if it is achievable and affordable. 

Three-dimensional ceilometry could become part of the program in the future. We 
estimate providing the three-dimensional, as compared to the one-dimensional tech-
nologies  now  used,  would  raise  the  cost  of  the  ASOS  PI  effort  by  50  percent  to  60 
percent,  and  would  extend  the  schedule  beyond  the  limits  of  our  ability  to  provide 
logistical  support  to  the  current  network.  The  current  ASOS  processing  capability 
also imposes limits on sensors within its suite. The schedule extension is based upon 
the need to revise, test, and implement a new algorithm to report three-dimensional 
cloud  reports,  and  examine  the  feasibility  of  incorporating  into  the  current  ASOS 
configuration.

Question 2. Does the NWS find utility in the Small Business Innovation Research 

program? 

Answer.  Yes.  The  NWS  has  found  utility  in  the  Small  Business  Innovation  Re-
search program. This program has provided the opportunity for the NWS to perform 
research and development on technologies, observing systems and sensors, and com-
putational  advancements  that  will  contribute  to  the  NWS  mission  of  providing  the 
Nation’s weather, water and climate forecasts and warnings. 

The NWS presently has a Phase 1 program for a ‘‘Self Cleaning Temperature and 
Conductivity Sensor.’’ The NWS also has an ongoing Phase 2 program for a ‘‘Proto-
type  Computer  Grid  Software  Product  for  NOAA.’’  This  year,  the  NWS  is  expected 
to  have  up  to  five  Phase  1  contract  awards  for  innovative  research  in  the  following 
topic areas:

1) NOAA Weather Radio (NWR) Broadcast Simulation 
2) Measurement of Sea Surface Salinity 
3) New Data Telemetry Protocols For Automated Flood Warning System 
4) Predictive Modeling For Solar Insolation 
5) Space Weather Data

The  development  of  these  topics  and  technology  areas  has  the  potential  for  pro-
viding future benefits and improvements to the NWS in meeting its important mis-
sion.

Question  3.  The  Small  Business  Innovation  Research  Policy  Directive  RIN  3245–
AE72  for  Phase  3  transition  of  NWS  funded  technology  development  states  that 
Phase  3  projects  are  not  required  to  be  recompeted  prior  to  the  awarding  of  a  con-
tract.  Does  the  NWS  still  intend  to  abide  by  this  directive?  How  many  Phase  3’s 
have  you  funded?  How  many  of  these  contracts  were  subject  to  further  rounds  of 
competition beyond that associated with Phase 1 and 2? 

Answer. The NWS will abide by this Small Business Innovation Research (SBIR) 
Policy Directive where it is applicable and appropriate under law. The funding and 
execution of a Phase 3 program would be most likely applicable under the existence 
of  the  following  conditions:  (1)  the  Phase  3  program  provides  the  best  value  to  the 
government  and  fulfills  the  best  interest  of  the  government/agency  in  meeting  its 
requirements  and  goals;  (2)  funding  is  available  and  appropriated  (Phase  3  is  not 
funded  from  SBIR  funds);  (3)  the  technology  that  was  developed  from  the  Phase  1 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

62

and  2  programs  meets  the  stated  agency  program  or  procurement  requirements.  If 
these  conditions  exist  and  are  applicable  under  law,  the  NWS  would  appropriately 
abide by this SBIR policy directive. 

No Phase 3 programs have been funded by the NWS. 
Under  the  above  stated  conditions  no  NWS  Phase  1  or  Phase  2  programs  would 

have been or have been subject to further competition. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. E. BENJAMIN NELSON TO

DENNIS MCCARTHY 

Question  1.  If  the  President’s  FY  2006  budget  for  the  National  Weather  Service 
(NWS)  is  enacted  as  it  was  submitted  to  Congress,  will  it  sustain  NWS  operations 
at  last  year’s  level?  How  much  of  a  shortfall  will  there  be?  Is  $40  million  a  good 
rough estimate? 

Answer.  Yes,  if  the  President’s  FY  2006  budget  for  the  NWS  is  enacted  as  sub-
mitted  it  will  sustain  NWS  core  operations  at  FY  2005  levels  while  providing  tar-
geted  improvements.  However,  the  President’s  Budget  assumes  a  2.3  percent  pay 
raise. If the enacted pay raise differs from this assumption NWS will have to iden-
tify measures to absorb the additional costs to maintain core operations in FY 2006. 
NWS is particularly vulnerable to the cumulative effect of pay increases above budg-
eted  amounts  with  approximately  67  percent  of  the  NWS  operational  budget  dedi-
cated to labor costs associated with its nationwide 24/7 weather forecast and warn-
ing mission.

Question  2.  What  National  Weather  Service  programs  and  services,  including 
maintenance and hiring decisions, would have to be reduced, deferred, or eliminated 
under the President’s budget? 

Answer. As stated above, the FY 2006 President’s Budget will sustain current op-
erations at the FY 2005 level. As with FY 2005, our FY 2006 strategy will continue 
to  prioritize  continuity  of  service  operations.  If  NWS  labor  cost  reductions  are  con-
sidered, NWS will, to the maximum extent possible, limit these labor cost reductions 
to avoid degradation of current services.

Question 3. Would the National Weather Service be able to keep all of its current 

positions filled under the President’s budget? 

Answer.  The  President’s  Request  incorporates  a  ‘‘labor  lapse’’  rate  assumption, 
which accounts for normal turnover and employee time to recruit and fill vacancies 
as they occur. In addition, in order to mitigate unfunded FY 2005 requirements, the 
NWS increased its labor lapse rates for its Headquarters components (+3.4 percent) 
and  for  its  field  components  (+0.4  percent).  The  NWS  plans  to  continue  the  in-
creased  FY  2005  lapse  rates  into  FY  2006  and,  depending  on  the  viability  of  other 
options,  may  increase  them.  NWS  is  focused  on  ensuring  that  critical  forecast  and 
warning vacancies are filled.

Question  4.  You  testified  that  there  are  several  upgrades  in  the  NWS  radar  sys-
tem  planned  for  the  next  few  years.  Would  the  timeline  for  these  upgrades  be  af-
fected by the President’s budget? 

Answer.  The  President’s  FY  2006  Budget  Request  does  not  impact  the  timeline. 
Major upgrades to the radar system are funded through NEXRAD Product Improve-
ment  (NPI),  administered  by  NWS  but  funded  by:  the  National  Weather  Service 
(Department  of  Commerce),  the  U.S.  Air  Force  (Department  of  Defense),  and  the 
Federal Aviation Administration (Department of Transportation).

Question 5. The Committee has been informed that training programs at the Na-
tional  Weather  Service  Training  Center  (NWSTC)  in  Kansas  City  were  seriously 
curtailed  this  year  due  to  budgetary  shortfalls.  How  much  money  is  needed  to  re-
store  the  training  program  to  its  prior  status?  Is  the  training  program  likely  to  be 
further curtailed under the President’s budget for FY 2006? 

Answer.  In  FY  2005  the  NWS  National  Training  budget  for  the  NWSTC  was  re-
duced  by  $1.5M.  At  this  time  no  additional  FY  2006  reductions  are  anticipated  for 
the  NWSTC.  As  with  the  FY  2005  reductions,  NWSTC  training  priorities  will  con-
tinue to focus on maintaining core operational training (meteorological, hydrological 
and  technical/electronic  training  requirements).  Also,  as  with  our  FY  2005  NWSTC 
curriculum and to offset the $1.5M reduction, we are increasingly focused on the use 
of  remote/distance  training,  which  is  more  economical  and  can  reach  more  of  our 
workforce than traditional in-residence training.

Question  6.  How  much  of  an  increase  in  the  FY  2006  budget  would  the  National 

Weather Service need in order to make up for shortfalls incurred in FY 2005? 

Answer. As stated earlier, the FY 2006 President’s Budget will sustain operations 

consistent with FY 2005 levels.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

63

Question 7. The Committee has been informed that the National Weather Service 
is  considering  plans  to  further  consolidate  its  Forecast  Offices  into  a  dozen  or  so 
larger offices with greater areas of responsibility. Is this true? 

Answer. There are no plans to consolidate forecast offices. As technology continues 
to  evolve  and  science  advances,  we  are  exploring  ways  to  take  advantage  of  new 
science and technology to make the best use of our workforce and to provide a high-
er  level  of  service.  All  options  we  are  exploring  are  based  on  the  existing  com-
plement of 122 weather forecast offices (WFOs), each maintaining responsibility and 
accountability  for  their  existing  areas.  The  only  consolidation  being  considered  is 
some  routine  production,  which  will  allow  forecasters  in  all  WFOs  to  work  in  an 
event-driven  mode  to  focus  on  significant  impacts  and  provide  more  direct  decision 
assistance to partner agencies (i.e., the emergency management community). 

Note: Although there are no plans to consolidate any of the 122 WFOs, there are 
three smaller weather service offices, which were originally scheduled for closure as 
part  of  the  NWS  Modernization  and  Restructuring  effort  of  the  1990s.  These  three 
weather service offices (Williston, ND; Erie, PA; and Evansville, IN) each have miti-
gation efforts underway to improve radar coverage, and may be proposed for closure 
depending on the results of these efforts.

Question  8.  What  process  will  be  used  to  decide  which  offices  are  eliminated  or 

Answer.  There  are  currently  no  plans  for  office  elimination  or  consolidation. 
Should  future  plans  call  for  consideration  of  office  elimination  or  consolidation, 
NOAA will keep Congress informed of these plans.

Question  9.  How  would  such  consolidation  affect  weather  coverage  and  forecasts 

consolidated? 

in Nebraska? 

Answer.  There  are  no  plans  for  office  elimination  or  consolidation.  We  expect  to 
be able to continue improving services from our existing 122 weather forecast offices 
in the coming years, including Nebraska.

Question  10.  Will  the  agency  be  able  to  certify  that  there  will  be  no  degradation 

of service to the public? 

Answer.  Any  upgrades  to  our  forecast  and  warning  service  will  be  coordinated 
closely  with  public  officials.  We  monitor  our  forecast  and  warning  performance 
metrics  very  closely,  even  posting  them  for  display  in  our  forecast  offices.  The  ‘‘non 
degradation of service’’ standard was adopted to direct the NWS Modernization and 
Restructuring  effort  of  the  1990s.  As  we  look  at  upgrades  to  our  services,  we  are 
certainly committed to meet the ‘‘non degradation of service’’ standard, but our focus 
is on improving services, not merely maintaining them.

Question  11.  How  many  National  Weather  Service  buoys  experienced  failed  or 

faulty sensors during FY 2005? How many buoys failed completely? 

Answer.  The  National  Weather  Service  maintains  101  buoys.  As  of  August  1, 
2005, 33 of these buoys failed meaning that data was not being transmitted. Of the 
33  buoys,  15  of  the  failures  were  caused  by  severe  weather,  7  by  a  collision  and/
or  tampering,  and  the  remaining  11  failures  were  caused  by  communications  or 
power failures. 

Status  of  buoys:  28  of  the  33  have  been  repaired.  Of  the  remaining  five,  four  are 
expected  to  be  back  in  service  by  the  end  of  September  (pending  availability  of  a 
U.S. Coast Guard vessel for deployment), and two will be repaired in FY 2006.

Question 12. Has the repair of these buoys been delayed as a result of insufficient 

Answer. In order to best manage our funding, we sought to reduce costs by allow-
ing  tolerable  delays  in  servicing  some  buoys.  Instead  of  paying  the  cost  of  renting 
a  ship  to  perform  a  repair,  we  waited  for  opportunities  to  group  multiple  repairs 
into a single voyage, preferably using a ship for which we did not have to pay rent, 
such as a U.S. Coast Guard ship. 

The  most  common  cause  of  delay  in  repair  of  the  buoys  is  the  time  of  year  and 
scheduling  of  vessels  to  complete  the  repair.  Buoys  located  in  the  northern  Pacific 
Ocean  are  difficult  to  service  in  the  winter  months,  causing  delays  until  conditions 
are safe for a vessel to service the buoy.

funding? 

Question  13.  Has  the  National  Weather  Service  had  to  defer  the  acquisition  of 
spare NOAA weather radio transmitters due to budgetary constraints? Has this had 
an impact on weather radio coverage? 

Answer.  In  FY  2005  NOAA  deferred  the  purchase  of  spares  for  NOAA  Weather 
Radio  (NWR)  transmitters.  These  spares  would  have  served  as  on-site  spares,  thus 
allowing a technician to repair a transmitter within a shorter time frame and with-
out the expense of making separate trips to diagnose and then repair failures. These 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

64

on-site spares are redundant and without them the NWR stations remained in oper-
ation via the backup transmitter until the primary transmitter was repaired. 

With  the  funding  requested  in  FY  2006  to  complete  and  sustain  NWR,  NOAA’s 
National  Weather  Service  will  begin  replacement  of  the  1970’s  era  transmitters, 
many  of  which  are  not  redundant.  By  replacing  old  transmitters  with  modern,  re-
dundant,  solid-state  transmitters,  overall  reliability  and  availability  of  the  NWR 
network will increase.

Question 14. What technology or analytical approach currently holds the most im-

mediate promise for reducing the number of false tornado warnings? 

Answer.  In  the  short-term  (a  few  years),  NOAA  NWS  is  planning  evolutionary 
changes  and  upgrades  to  the  existing  Doppler  radar  network  that  are  expected  to 
reduce tornado false alarm rates (in approximate chronological order):

1)  NOAA  will  access  data  from  the  Federal  Aviation  Administration  Terminal 
Doppler  Weather  Radar  (TDWR),  as  these  radars  are  better  able  to  discern 
storm  winds  than  NEXRAD  (under  certain  conditions  at  the  same  range).  The 
combination  of  NEXRAD  and  TDWR  data  across  the  United  States  will  result 
in finer sampling of winds and weather and will improve overall coverage.
2) New radar software (i.e. Open Radar Data Acquisition) will allow measuring 
the  distribution  of  winds  in  small  chunks  of  atmosphere  (i.e.,  resolution  vol-
umes). Particular wind signatures that can be detected by radars with improved 
resolution can discern tornadoes; this data can reduce tornado false alarm rates.
3) Dual polarization radar and improved spectral analysis promise improved de-
tection  of  tornadoes  indirectly  by  identifying  debris,  key  storm  structures  (e.g., 
mesocyclones,  precipitation  types  known  to  affect  tornado  formation),  and 
tornadic  wind  signatures.  Recent  research  indicates  there  may  be  predictive 
value  in  knowing  whether  rain  or  hail  is  falling  near  the  region  of  storm  rota-
tion at low levels, and dual polarized radar provides this information.

A  longer-term  approach  to  reduce  tornado  false  alarm  rates  is  the  use  of  high-
resolution  numerical  weather  models  capable  of  assimilating  radar  and  surface 
weather data to generate detailed near-real time information on storm development 
and  evolution.  Forecasters  will  be  better  able  to  estimate  storm  tornado  potential 
and  reduce  false  alarms  with  supplemental  information  about  the  inside  of  the 
storm. These models are undergoing research and development. 

The ideal way to reduce tornadic false alarm rates is to have high-resolution real-
time measurements of winds within the storm cloud, as this affords the best chance 
of  directly  detecting  actual  tornadic  conditions.  These  measurements  could  be 
achieved by systems such as networks of phased array radars at extremely high fre-
quency  combined  with  high-density  surface  observational  networks.  These  tech-
nologies are currently being investigated. 

From  the  perspective  of  our  partners  in  the  emergency  management  community, 
tornado  false  alarm  rates  are  not  considered  a  critical  metric,  as  compared  to  im-
proved detection and longer warning lead times. The feedback from emergency man-
agers is that the cost of tornado false alarm rates is rather low in terms of warning 
communities  whereas  the  cost  of  missing  tornadoes  is  much  higher  and  remains 
their  key  concern.  In  general,  the  decreased  rate  of  false  alarms  is  a  consequence 
of improved detection and not a primary goal, as the technologies that improve tor-
nado  detection  generally  reduce  false  alarm  rates  as  well  (e.g.,  NEXRAD),  as  long 
as appropriate training is provided. 

We  are  testing  a  new  approach  toward  increasing  the  precision  of  our  severe 
thunderstorm/tornado  watches  and  warnings  by  redefining  the  areal  extent  they 
cover. This approach is called the ‘‘polygon warning’’ concept. This approach reduces 
the geographic area defined in most warnings (allowing us to warn for areas smaller 
than  a  full  county),  thereby  reducing  false  alarms  in  terms  of  area  and  population 
warned. Preliminary results are quite promising. 

We  will  begin  another  upgrade  on  the  WSR-88D  (NEXRAD)  radar  network  late 
this summer: the Open Radar Data Acquisition unit. In addition to improving main-
tainability  of  the  network,  this  technology  will  pave  the  way  for  future  improve-
ments in radar operations that will improve detection and warning. 

We conduct annual training for all of our forecasters who issue warnings to make 
sure they are aware of the latest advances in the science of severe storm forecasting 
to provide the most accurate tornado warnings.

Question 15. What are the barriers to implementing this approach? 
Answer.  There  are  no  real  technical  barriers  to  improving  and  implementing  the 
evolutionary changes and upgrades to the existing weather radar network to achieve 
the short-term reductions in tornado false alarms. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

65

Continued  support  for  the  ‘‘NEXRAD  Product  Improvement’’  program,  along  with 
substantial investment in research and development, will be required to improve the 
radar data processing/analysis and storm-scale model development. 

Studies of the economic value of tornado false alarm rates and probabilities of de-
tection  should  continue.  Unless  there  is  a  major  improvement  in  technology  and 
science, a change in the false alarm rates will be accompanied by a similarly signed 
change  in  the  Probability  Of  Detection.  There  is  insufficient  scientific  knowledge 
available  to  assess  the  relative  value  of  a  high  false  alarm  rate  versus  a  low  prob-
ability of detection. 

Regarding reducing tornado false alarms in the long-term, developing and deploy-
ing networks of phased array radars across the United States, along with boundary-
layer  radars,  are  promising  technologies.  NOAA  has  a  research  effort  underway  to 
assess the long-term use of phased array radar.

Question  16.  Are  there  gaps  that  the  Committee  should  consider  addressing? 

What are they? 

Answer.  We  appreciate  the  Committee’s  willingness  to  work  closely  with  NOAA 
on future gaps that impact NOAA’s operations and research activities. As technology 
and  other  advances  move  forward  in  the  fields  of  weather,  climate,  and  environ-
mental  research,  we  will  advise  and  look  forward  to  working  with  the  Committee 
on  our  efforts  to  engage  the  stakeholders,  organizations  and  individuals  impacted 
by NOAA’s mission.

Question 17. I understand that the U.S. Weather Research Program was intended 
to  facilitate  the  transition  of  new  forecasting  technologies  and  techniques  from  re-
search to operations. What is the status of the USWRP today? 

Answer.  Yes,  the  U.S.  Weather  Research  Program  (USWRP)  is  focused  on  facili-
tating  and  accelerating  the  transition  of  new  forecasting  science  and  technology 
from  research  to  operations.  The  Interagency  Working  Group  (IWG),  which  is  the 
decision-making body for the USWRP, is currently reviewing the program including 
its overall strategy and priorities. Although the program’s focus and resource alloca-
tions  may  change  as  a  result  of  the  IWG’s  review,  it  is  highly  likely  that  the 
USWRP  will  continue  to 
focus  on  coordinating  weather  research  and  on 
transitioning research to operations. 

Specifically,  the  USWRP  has  prioritized  research  and  development  aimed  at  im-
proving  hurricane  prediction,  precipitation  prediction,  atmospheric  observation 
strategies,  and  socio-economic  impacts.  The  USWRP-supported  Joint  Hurricane 
Testbed  (JHT)  enables  the  transfer  and  operational  implementation  of  new  hurri-
cane  prediction  techniques  and  technologies  from  the  research  community  to 
NOAA’s  Tropical  Prediction  Center/National  Hurricane  Center.  The  USWRP  also 
sponsors  the  Developmental  Test  Center  (DTC)  in  Boulder,  CO,  which  enables  the 
transfer of new numerical modeling science to operations.

Question  18.  Is  the  Hazardous  Weather  Testbed  in  Norman,  OK  the  NWS’s  only 
such center? This type of facility seems to hold promise for moving new technologies 
from research to application. Are there plans for establishing more such centers? 

Answer.  No,  the  Hazardous  Weather  Testbed  is  not  the  only  center  of  this  type. 
Other  test  beds  include  the  Joint  Hurricane  Testbed,  the  Developmental  Testbed 
Center,  the  Hydrometeorological  Testbed,  and  the  Climate  Testbed.  All  of  these 
testbeds,  including  the  Hazardous  Weather  Testbed,  are  designed  to  accelerate  the 
transition of new science and techniques from research to operations. 

The  Hazardous  Weather  Testbed  accelerates  improved  techniques  for  forecasting 
the  initiation  of  severe  thunderstorms  and  early  detection  of  tornados  into  oper-
ational implementation. The Joint Hurricane Testbed at NOAA’s Tropical Prediction 
Center/National  Hurricane  Center  in  Miami,  FL,  has  been  operating  for  five  years 
and  is  accelerating  research  results  into  hurricane  forecast  guidance  products,  in-
cluding  hurricane  model  improvements.  The  Developmental  Test  Center  (DTC)  in 
Boulder,  CO,  focuses  on  improvements  to  regional  weather  modeling  using  the 
Weather  Research 
The 
Hydrometeorological Testbed (HMT) is being established to accelerate improvements 
in heavy precipitation and flood forecasts. 

community  model. 

The NOAA entities in Norman, OK, have an illustrious history of cooperation and 
collaboration  in  the  exploration  of  new  science  and  technology.  The  most  out-
standing  example  is  the  evolution,  application,  and  deployment  of  Doppler  weather 
radar.  The  Hazardous  Weather  Testbed  is  the  latest  iteration  of  this  ongoing  col-
laborative  process,  which  we  hope  to  emulate  in  other  parts  of  the  country  where 
these kinds of partnerships and opportunities exist. 

In  addition  to  supporting  the  establishment  of  testbed  facilities,  NOAA  has  also 
established a research to operations policy and a committee to monitor, oversee, and 

(WRF) 

and 

Forecasting 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

improve the transition from research to operations, not only for weather and water, 
but also for climate, oceans and ecosystems.

66

Question  19.  How  should  NOAA  partner  with  academia  and  industry  to  improve 

its forecasts of severe storms and their impacts? 

Answer.  NOAA  collaborates  with  academia,  industry,  and  other  governmental 
partners to develop goals, roles, and plans for improving severe storm forecasts and 
warnings.  The  newly  formed  American  Meteorological  Society’s  Weather  and  Cli-
mate  Enterprise  Commission,  the  NOAA  Science  Advisory  Board,  and  the  U.S. 
Weather  Research  Program  are  examples  of  venues  that  help  facilitate  this  inter-
action.  We  also  work  with  individual  researchers  and  professors  to  bring  state-of-
the-art  training  to  our  forecasters  through  tele-training,  workshops,  and  seminars. 
NOAA  will  enhance  its  collaborative  peer-reviewed  research  activities  with  aca-
demia  and  enhance  data  dissemination  and  warnings  through  the  private  sector  in 
coordination  with  other  Federal  agencies  with  similar  requirements.  Any  funded 
peer-reviewed  projects  should  include  those  proposed  by  both  the  academic  and  the 
private sectors.

Question 20. I understand that Phased Array Radar systems have great potential 
for  increasing  the  accuracy  of  tornado  forecasting  but  I  also  know  that  they  carry 
a big price tag. How exactly would a new PAR system improve the ability to predict 
tornados in Nebraska? 

Answer.  Changes  in  environmental  conditions  leading  to  tornado  formation  and 
continuing  through  a  tornado’s  evolution  occur  on  very  small  time  scales.  The  new 
Phased  Array  Radar  (PAR)  system  is  capable  of  providing  rapid  updates  on  chang-
ing  environmental  conditions,  five  to  six  times  faster  then  our  current  operational 
radars.  Further,  the  phased  array  allows  adaptive  pointing  of  the  antenna  beam  in 
directions  where  a  tornado  might  be  spawning,  and  allows  in  depth  examination  of 
such ‘‘hot’’ spots. The increase in resolution (number of data samples per time incre-
ment)  is  required  to  properly  initialize  high-resolution  storm  scale  models.  This  is 
a  developing  area  of  research,  but  we  feel  there  is  a  potential  to  blend  real  time 
observations with very short term forecasts (from minutes to tens of minutes), lead-
ing  to  the  idea  of  ‘‘warning  on  forecast’’  rather  than  our  current  mode  of  ‘‘warning 
on observation.’’ Warnings based on forecasts could increase the lead time of tornado 
warnings out to 25–30 minutes.

Question 21. What is the relative cost of a PAR system as compared to the current 

Oklahoma? 

NEXRAD system? 

Answer.  The  National  Severe  Storms  Laboratory  (NSSL)  in  Norman,  OK,  has 
been working closely with government, university and private sector partners to an-
swer  this  question.  According  to  the  latest  information  from  industry,  by  2012  the 
cost  of  the  phased  array  radar  modules  that  make  up  the  antenna  array  (the  most 
expensive part of the radar; each antennae face has over 4,300 modules) is predicted 
to be reduced by a factor of 50. This means that the modules currently in use today 
at  NSSL,  which  each  cost  $2,000  when  they  were  produced  in  the  late  1970s  will 
cost $40 per module in 2012. This will reduce the cost of a four-faced antenna PAR 
system down to approximately $10–$15 Million per radar. 

It  is  inappropriate  to  compare  the  two  systems,  especially  since  NEXRAD  radars 
are  no  longer  in  production.  Commercially  developed  Doppler  radars  are  available, 
but  come  with  many  challenges  to  integrate  the  data  into  the  NEXRAD  network. 
The hardware for a commercial radar costs approximately $4M.

Question 22. Is there a difference in the total area each system can cover? 
Answer. No.
Question 23. Is there a difference in the manpower required for each system? 
Answer.  At  this  time,  it  is  not  likely  there  will  be  any  difference  in  manpower 
requirements  between  the  two  systems.  More  information  on  manpower  require-
ments will become available as the phased array radar design progresses.

Question  24.  What  is  the  current  status  of  the  PAR  system  testing  in  Norman, 

Answer. The PAR system testing in Norman is on schedule. The system has been 
modified  from  a  missile  detection  and  tracking  system  used  by  the  U.S.  Navy  to  a 
system capable of collecting weather data. In the last 15 months, a limited amount 
of  weather  data  on  tornadic  storms  has  been  collected.  Data  quality  appears  quite 
good  and  compares  well  to  the  NWS  WSR-88D.  We  are  currently  awaiting  more 
weather  events  and  are  actively  improving  the  radar  features  to  speed  up  the  data 
acquisition.  At  the  same  time,  our  partners  at  the  Federal  Aviation  Administration 
(FAA) have developed an aircraft tracking processor as part of the plan to make the 
PAR  a  multi-function  system.  The  FAA  software  will  be  tested  on  the  PAR  in  late 
August. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

67

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JIM DEMINT TO

TIMOTHY A. REINHOLDT 

Question  1.  In  your  testimony  you  discuss  how  risk  modeling  coupled  with  vari-
able insurance pricing is helping to encourage homeowners to build storm resistant 
buildings. Do you know if this practice is widespread outside of the Southeast? 

Answer.  The  practice  is  not  even  widespread  in  the  Southeast,  much  less  in  the 
rest  of  the  country.  The  two  broad-based  programs  are  in  Florida  and  Texas  where 
discounts have been mandated as part of a move towards more stringent codes and 
standards.  Having  said  that,  what  is  widespread  is  the  use  of  basic  catastrophe 
modeling to assess loss exposure and establish reserves and reinsurance needs. The 
move towards using these models to assess the value of mitigation measures is still 
somewhat  in  its  infancy  and  has  been  driven  largely  by  FEMA  sponsored  research 
and the need to establish some sort of a basis for the mandated discounts in Florida 
and Texas. While it is being used in these instances out of necessity, there are typi-
cally  wide  ranges  in  the  overall  loss  estimates  and  even  greater  variability  in  the 
estimated benefits of particular mitigation measures.

Question  2.  How  successful  has  this  approach  been  in  Florida  in  terms  of  getting 
people covered by insurance? Has it made insurers more willing to stay in the mar-
ket? 

Answer.  I  can’t  comment  on  the  influence  of  mitigation  activities  on  availability 
or  cost  of  insurance.  However,  where  we  are  beginning  to  see  movement  in  getting 
people to take protective measures has been when the amount of money on the table 
becomes  large  enough  to  make  a  difference  in  the  return  on  investment.  That  has 
been  particularly  evident  for  properties  in  the  Florida  Wind  Pool  (Citizens)  where 
large increases in premiums coupled with larger percentage reductions in premiums 
for mitigated properties have generated savings that can run into thousands of dol-
lars.

Question  3.  Ultimately,  what  do  you  think  needs  to  be  done  to  have  more  stand-

ardized building codes? 

Answer. I do not believe that we are likely to see a federalization of building codes 
and  standards.  However,  we  have  seen  a  merger  of  the  National  Model  Building 
Codes  (Standard  Building  Code,  Uniform  Building  Code  and  Building  Officials  and 
Code  Administrators  Code)  into  a  single  International  Code  Council  set  of  codes. 
These codes and standards are debated and developed in a consensus process at the 
national  level  and  provide  for  local  variations  in  hazards  and  risk.  Unfortunately, 
in  most  states,  the  adoption  is  left  to  individual  jurisdictions  (counties,  parishes, 
municipalities  and  cities)  and  these  frequently  change  the  model  code  provisions  to 
suit  the  desires  of  local  special  interest  groups.  We  believe  that  the  states  need  to 
move towards statewide adoption of the model codes without local amendments that 
would weaken the provisions. We think that the Federal Government can help with 
this  process  by  helping  to  create  incentives  for  the  states  to  adopt  the  model  codes 
and ensure that they are well administered and enforced.

Question 4. What needs to be done or can be done to make older buildings safer? 
Answer. Without a doubt, it is more effective and less costly to build well the first 
time  than  to  come  back  and  apply  remedial  measures  after  the  fact.  Having  said 
that, I would offer the following suggestions for reducing the vulnerability of homes 
to  windstorm  or  hurricane  related  damage.  The  first  list  is  one  that  is  best  suited 
for  construction  of  new  homes.  Following  that,  I  have  prepared  a  shortened  list  of 
the most practical items for retrofit. 
The  Key  Structural  Features  for  Hurricane  Resistance  of  Homes  Include: 

prevent damage or failure from scouring of the beach.

• Enough elevation to avoid storm surge or flooding.
• If  you  are  in  a  storm  surge  area,  the  pile  foundation  must  be  deep  enough  to 
• The home needs to be well built with all parts tied together with appropriately 
sized  metal  connectors  and  structural  sheathing  (plywood  or  oriented  strand 
board)  for  wood  frame  construction  or  reinforcing  if  it  is  masonry  construction.
• The roof structure needs to be well anchored to the walls using hurricane straps 
and the roof sheathing needs to be fastened to the roof structure using the lat-
est code requirements for nails or preferably attached with ring-shank nails.
• If  the  home  has  one  or  more  gable  ends  with  a  gable  that  is  more  than  about 
3-feet tall, the gable should be braced to keep it and the wall below from blow-
ing in or being sucked out.
• Porches and carports should be well anchored to their foundations and support 
structure and pool enclosures should have hefty anchors at the end columns and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

68

substantial diagonal bracing (cables or metal tubes running along diagonals) to 
keep them from blowing over.

• If  the  home  is  located  in  an  area  where  the  building  code  specifies  gust  design 
wind  speeds  of  120  mph  or  higher  or  if  the  home  is  within  1-mile  of  the  coast 
and the design wind speed is greater than 110 mph, it should be outfitted with 
a code approved protection for windows and doors and a wind pressure and de-
bris impact rated garage door.

• Purchasers  of  newer  homes  should  be  aware  that  some  codes  have  allowed 
homebuilders to choose to strengthen the structure and connections as an alter-
native  to  providing  window  and  door  protection.  If  that  is  the  case,  you  may 
well have a stronger house structure but you may have wind and water blowing 
through your house, ruining the contents and interior, if you get hit by a strong 
storm.

For Older Homes: 

The  structural  wish  list  for  older  homes  is  similar  to  the  one  listed  above  for 
newer homes. However, if there are no hurricane straps or the house is not particu-
larly well tied together, it can be very costly to fix the structural connections. If this 
is the case, then the priority for installing window and door protection and ensuring 
that  the  garage  door  is  wind  and  impact  rated  or  protected  goes  way  up.  Keeping 
wind  out  of  the  home  by  protecting  the  openings  can  give  the  home  a  fighting 
chance  when  a  hurricane  strikes,  even  if  the  structural  connections  are  not  what 
we would want in a home built today. If your home is not well connected, make your 
preparations early and evacuate to a better built refuge. 

The  easiest  thing  to  add  that  will  have  an  impact  on  protecting  the  structure  is 
protection  for  windows  and  doors.  If  the  house  has  a  shingle  roof,  when  the  house 
is  re-roofed,  the  home  owner  can  also  have  the  roof  sheathing  re-nailed  and  a  self 
adhesive flashing tape installed over the joints between the roof sheathing for a rel-
atively  nominal  cost.  A  high-wind  rated  roof  covering  should  be  selected  and  in-
stalled  according  to  the  manufacturer’s  recommendations  for  high  wind  areas.  An-
chorage  of  porches,  carports  and  pool  cages  can  be  improved  at  a  reasonable  cost. 
Gable  end  bracing  can  also  be  installed  to  reduce  the  chances  that  the  gable  ends 
will give way. Most of these things can be added later, but when someone is financ-
ing the home, they may want to see if they can add some of these retrofits into the 
purchase price or loan. 

Take  a  good  look  at  the  area  surrounding  the  home.  If  there  are  significant 
sources of wind borne debris like flat roofs with gravel or tile roofs, then protection 
of  glass  becomes  even  more  important.  Evaluate  trees  in  the  area  surrounding  the 
home.  Trees  can  be  helpful  in  reducing  wind  loads  on  the  house  up  to  the  point 
where  they  blow  over  onto  the  home.  Tall  pine  trees  are  a  particular  concern  be-
cause  they  can  crash  through  the  roof  and  walls  like  a  guillotine.  Pruning  of  trees 
to  reduce  their  sail  area  can  be  an  important  mitigation  measure  if  there  are  lots 
of trees near the house. 

There  are  real  limits  to  what  can  be  done  for  tile  roofs  short  of  removing  them 
and  re-installing  tile  with  mechanical  or  adhesive  products  or  a  combination  of  the 
two.  Tile  roofs  do  seem  to  have  a  higher  failure  wind  speed  threshold  than  older 
shingle  roofs,  but  the  repair  costs  are  much  higher  when  they  do  fail.  For  shingle 
roofs, homeowners can adhere the tabs to the shingles below using an asphalt roof-
ing  cement  as  a  stop-gap  measure  until  the  house  is  re-roofed.  Start  with  shingles 
around  the  edges  of  the  roof  and  work  towards  the  interior  if  the  shingle  tabs  are 
not well sealed. 

There  is  at  least  one  bracing  system  for  garage  doors  that  has  Florida  Building 
Code  approval.  In  other  cases,  garage  doors  are  either  being  shuttered  or  replaced 
with a wind pressure and debris impact rated product. The effective bracing of exist-
ing  garage  doors  requires  structural  braces  that  keep  the  door  from  bowing  and 
buckling as well as bracing of or replacing the tracks that support the rollers. 

A  lot  of  soffits  were  blown  out  during  the  Florida  hurricanes  last  year  and  water 
got  into  the  attics  and  walls.  Vinyl  and  aluminum  soffit  material  that  is  not  at-
tached to a backup wood structure should be strengthened. Sealing around windows 
and  openings  in  walls  can  also  help  keep  water  from  getting  into  the  walls  of  the 
home.

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:25 May 04, 2006 Jkt 026822 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

